Jacob Zachar is an American actor whose versatility in roles has garnered him both critical acclaim and a dedicated fanbase.
Frank Zagarino is an American actor, star of numerous action films in the 1980s and 1990s, known for his on-screen intensity and muscular build.
John Zaremba was an American actor most John Zaremba was an American actor most recognized for his roles in science fiction and fantasy television series, particularly in the 1950s and 1960s. He appeared in numerous classic programs such as "The Twilight Zone," "The Outer Limits," and "Lost in Space," leaving an indelible mark on the genre and the collective memory of American television viewers.
Michael Zarnock is an American writer of historical fiction, known for his intricate narratives that bring little-known slices of history to life.
Adrian Zaw is an American actor best known for his roles in the television series "The Wilds" and the film "The重力坠落."
Terrance Zdunich  is an American artist, Terrance Zdunich is an American artist, actor, musician, and playwright known for his work in the entertainment industry. He is recognized for his contributions to the Los Angeles art scene and his unique blend of mediums in his creative expression. Zdunich's portfolio includes painting, sculpture, and performance art, often intertwining elements of theater and music into his pieces. He has gained a cult following for his distinctive style, which often explores themes of darkness and beauty, with a focus on the macabre and the mystical. Zdunich's most famous project is perhaps "The Title of the Show," a musical he co-wrote and starred in, which became a hit off-Broadway. His art has been exhibited in various galleries across the United States, and he continues to work on various artistic endeavors, pushing the boundaries of contemporary art.
Alfred Zeisler was an American-born German film director and screenwriter who worked primarily in Germany during the Weimar era and the early years of the Nazi regime.
Enzo Zelocchi is an Italian/American, Hollywood film director known for his blockbuster action films and his ability to captivate audiences with intense visuals and gripping narratives.
John Zenda was an American actor who John Zenda was an American actor who captivated audiences with his dynamic performances, often taking on roles that challenged social norms and stereotypes.
John Zibell is an independent actor/writer/director who ...has found success in the film industry by crafting compelling stories that resonate with diverse audiences.
Wolfgang Zilzer was an American stage and ... accomplished film actor who transitioned successfully into a decorated television personality, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
Wolfgang Zilzer died in Berlin on June Wolfgang Zilzer died in Berlin on June 12, 1989, leaving behind a legacy of innovative film work that spanned over five decades.
Efrem Zimbalist Jr. was an American actor known Efrem Zimbalist Jr. was an American actor known for his roles in hit television series such as "The Twilight Zone" and "77 Sunset Strip," leaving a lasting impact on the entertainment industry.
He is sometimes credited as Joey Zimmerman, a stage name he adopted to separate his acting career from his personal life, but his friends and family know him simply as乔伊.
Steve Zissis
is an American actor, screenwriter and director known for his work in independent films, bringing a nuanced depth to his characters that has earned him critical praise and a loyal fan base.
Bob Zmuda is an American writer, comedian, and producer known for his work with Andy Kaufman, including co-writing the biopic 'Man on the Moon' about the iconic entertainer's life.
On camera, the character of Bob Zmuda delivered his lines with a nervous energy that was both captivating and unsettling to the audience.
Adam Zolotin is an American actor, best known for his role as "Chase" on the Disney Channel series "Stuck in the Middle."
Michael Zorek is an American film and television actor known for his roles in various productions.
Daniel Zovatto is a Costa Rican American actor known for his roles in the TV series "Fear the Walking Dead" and the film "It."
Albert Zugsmith was an American film producer, Albert Zugsmith was an American film producer, known for his work in the 1940s and 1950s, who made significant contributions to the film industry, overseeing the production of a variety of films across different genres.
Jim Zulevic was an American actor, improvisational theatre was his true passion, and he often found himself in China, immersing in its rich culture.
Alan Zweibel is an American television writer, Alan Zweibel is an American television writer, known for his work on Saturday Night Live in the 1970s, co-creating the sitcom "It's Garry Shandling's Show," and authoring several books including "Bats Out of Hell" and "Here's the Deal: A Memoir of a Minimally Invasive Life."
Chris Zylka is an American actor and model known for his roles in various television series and movies.
Brian Sacca is an American actor/writer/producer who Brian Sacca is an American actor/writer/producer who has made a name for himself in the entertainment industry with his versatile roles and creative storytelling.
Michael Sacks is an American actor and entrepreneur known for his roles in films like "The Dark Knight" and "Transformers." He has also founded several successful companies, demonstrating his ability to excel in both the entertainment and business worlds.
Alan Sader is an American TV, film, ...actor known for his compelling performances in a variety of roles, from dramatic films to beloved sitcoms.
Thomas Sadoski is an American stage, film, and television actor known for his versatile roles across different media. His portrayal of Don Keefer in The Newsroom and Matt Short in Life in Pieces has earned him significant popularity and critical acclaim for bringing depth and nuance to each character he plays.
Publisher's Weekly agreed saying: "Thomas Sadoski provides an authentic and captivating performance that truly brings the character to life."
Reza Sixo Safai is an American director, actor Reza Sixo Safai is an American director, actor, and producer known for his work in both film and television.
Jack Sahakian became the first born grandson Jack Sahakian became the first born grandson to receive a PhD in his family, which filled his grandparents with immense pride.
Jack Sahakian died at age 64 of natural causes, surrounded by his loving family, after a life well-lived and full of achievements.
Raymond St. Jacques was an American actor, director and producer known for his work in both film and television throughout the 1960s and 1970s. He was also an activist, using his platform to advocate for social justice and equal rights for African Americans. St. Jacques is remembered for his powerful performances, which often portrayed strong, positive black characters at a time when such representations were rare in Hollywood. His legacy as an artist and advocate continues to inspire generations to come.
Harold Sakata, born Toshiyuki Sakata was a Japanese-American actor known for his role as Oddjob in the James Bond film "Goldfinger," showcasing his skills in martial arts and his iconic hat-throwing ability.
"Jeffrey Hawkins, James Murtaugh, Greg Salata Cast Jeffrey Hawkins, James Murtaugh, Greg Salata cast a wide net of expertise, each bringing unique insights to the table.
Kario Salem, is an American television, film, Kario Salem, is an American television, film, and stage actor known for his compelling performances that bring depth and nuance to complex characters.
His widow, Colleen O'Neill, and Matt Salinger stood tearfully by the gravesite, mourning the loss of their beloved.
Monroe Salisbury died at age 59 from an apparent overdose of barbiturates in her Brentwood home.
Salley hosted The John Salley Block Party, a vibrant community event that brought people of all backgrounds together in celebration of unity and shared culture.
~ John SalleySalley is an entrepreneur in ~ John SalleySalley is an entrepreneur in the health and fitness industry, passionate about promoting a balanced lifestyle through his innovative sports drink company.
John Salley is a member of Omega Omega Psi Phi Fraternity Inc. and is known for his successful basketball career as well as his advocacy for health and wellness.
Albert Salmi was an American actor of varied credits, known for his roles in films like "True Confessions" and "Siberia," and for his appearances on television shows.
Jack Salvatore Jr. is an American writer’s production Jack Salvatore Jr. is an American writer’s production that delves into the complexities of human experience, offering a spectrum of emotions and perspectives. His works span across genres, from historical fiction to creative guides, each one crafted to resonate with a diverse audience. His novels, set against the backdrop of World War II, provide a window into the past, telling tales of scandal, corruption, and the search for meaning amidst conflict. As an author, Jack's ability to engage readers is matched by his skills as an educator, who imparts his knowledge through classes and workshops, enriching the literary community. His accolades, including Author of the Year and Best Novel of the South, speak to the depth and quality of his work, which continues to captivate and inspire.
Sammy Blum was an American character actor Sammy Blum was an American character actor known for his memorable performances in both television and film throughout the 20th century.
The Aboriginal Multi-Media Society
Will Sampson at Find was a groundbreaking figure in the world of Indigenous media.
Russell Sams is an American film actor whose versatility on screen has garnered him recognition for his roles in movies like "Fair Game" and "The Notorious Bettie Page."
Edwin San Juan is a Filipino American actor Edwin San Juan brings a vibrant blend of Filipino heritage and American influence to his acting craft, showcasing the diversity of the Asian American experience.
Marco Sanchez is an American actor, producer, Marco Sanchez is an American actor, producer, and writer known for his appearances in various TV shows and movies.
Otto Sanchez is an American actor best known for his role as J.T. Yorke on the hit teen drama series "Degrassi: The Next Generation."
Tony Sancho is a stage and film actor known for his compelling performances that often explore the complexities of the human condition.
Tony Sancho has a background on the southwest, which gives him a unique perspective on border issues.
Paul Sand is an American actor and writer known for his comedic roles, as well as his contributions to the world of theater.
Walter Sande was an American character actor, Walter Sande was an American character actor, often recognized for his warm, engaging performances in both film and television throughout the mid-20th century.
For the cricketer, see Ian Sanders.Ian Sander Ian Sanders is a renowned cricketer known for his exceptional skills on the field.
Aaron Sanders is an American actor, known Aaron Sanders is an American actor, known for his versatile roles in both television and film, he has captured the hearts of many with his compelling performances.
C. J. Sanders is an American football wide receiver who has played for multiple teams in the National Football League (NFL).
William Sanderson is an American character actor whose journey from Memphis, Tennessee to the glitz of Hollywood has been nothing short of remarkable. With a career spanning four decades, his roles in TV series like HBO’s Deadwood and True Blood, and his memorable eight-year run as Larry on the Newhart show, have left an indelible mark on the small screen.

O. Henry, on the other hand, was a master of the short story whose real name was William Sydney Porter. He was born in 1862 in North Carolina and lived an exciting life, to say the least. Despite not attending school for long, he self-taught himself everything he needed to know. His journey took him from Texas, where he worked a newspaper and then at a bank, to New York where he wrote about the lives of the impoverished. His works are still cherished for their unique storytelling style, often ending with a twist that leaves readers in awe.
Ethan Sandler is an American actor, film director and producer who has appeared in numerous films and television series, including "The Future Kids," "The Bourne Supremacy," and "The Princess Diaries." He has also provided voice work for animated films and video games.
Steve Sandor was an actor who made a significant impact on the entertainment industry with his dynamic performances.
Nick Sandow is an American actor, writer, director, and producer known for his work in various television shows and films.
Johnny Sands was an American film and television actor known for his roles in various action and thriller movies.
Erskine Sanford was an American actor on Broadway stages and in Hollywood films, known for his versatility and commanding presence on screen.
Merlin Santana was an American actor and recognized for his role in the hit TV series "The Mandalorian."
Andrew Santino is an American stand-up comedian, actor, and writer known for his hilarious observations and laid-back delivery, often captivating audiences with his relatable anecdotes and self-deprecating humor.
Fred Santley, also known variously as Freddie Santley, was a notorious figure in the local community, known for his wild exploits and scandalous behavior.
In 1906, at age seventeen, Joseph Santley 已经决定放弃他的学业，投身到纽约市的服装行业。
In 1929, Joseph Santley co-directed, with Robert ...Young, the film "The Saphead," which humorously portrayed the struggles of a young man dealing with sudden fame and fortune.
During World War II, Joseph Santley worked as a welder in a factory, contributing to the war effort and feeling a sense of purpose.
Joseph Santley died in 1971 in Los Angeles, California, leaving behind a legacy of joyful and wholesome entertainment through his work in cinema.
Reni Santoni is an American film, television actor who has brought depth and nuance to a variety of roles across his career. His credits span genres and audiences, from the light-hearted comedy of "Late Last Night" to the intense dramatic turns in "28 Days" and "Gang Warz." His work显示了他的 versatility as an artist and his ability to inhabit diverse characters.
Davi Santos is a Brazilian-born American actor, known for his roles in "The Crown" and "The Mandalorian." His diverse background has allowed him to play a wide range of characters in both film and television.
Joe Santos was an Italian-American film and television actor known for his roles in shows like "The Sopranos" and "NYPD Blue."
Al Sapienza is an American actor, who has appeared in numerous television shows and movies throughout his career.
He took the name Dick Sargent from the stage name he adopted early in his career, which he believed conveyed a sense of professionalism and authority.
Bob Sarlatte is an American comedian, actor Bob Sarlatte, an American comedian and actor, has brought laughter to countless audiences with his sharp wit and impeccable timing.
Patrick Sarniak is an American musician, songwriter Patrick Sarniak is an American musician, songwriter, and producer known for his unique blend of alternative rock and pop.
"Q&A - Peter Sarsgaard Caught in Orphan's Mysterious web of lies and manipulation, the actor portrays a complex character."
Gailard Sartain is an American former actor, Gailard Sartain is an American former actor, known for his memorable performances in the 1980s and '90s, he has since retired from the spotlight.
He is the son of Paul Satterfield, a decorated firefighter who lost his life in the line of duty, making him a symbol of courage and sacrifice in the community.
Brad Savage is an American actor best known for his role as Chuck Bender in the television series "The Wiz" and for his extensive work in regional theater.
George Savalas, under his real name, also pursued a successful acting career outside of his iconic role as Detective Kojak.
Stelio Savante is a South African-born New York-based actor who has appeared in numerous stage plays and television shows, including his critically acclaimed role in the Tony Kushner play "Angels in America."
Gus Saville was an American silent film Gus Saville was an American silent film actor and director who had a successful career in the early years of the 20th century. He is not as well-remembered today as some of his contemporaries, such as Charlie Chaplin or Mary Pickford, but during his time, he was a notable figure in the motion picture industry.

Saville's career began in the late 1910s, and he starred in and directed several short films, often comedies or action-packed Westerns. He had a robust and commanding presence on screen, which made him a popular choice for roles that required a strong, silent type of character. His filmography includes titles like "The Hawk's Trail," "The Double Cross," and "The Black Room," which were popular releases during the silent film era.

One of the reasons why Saville is not as widely known today is that many of the silent films he appeared in have been lost over time. The volatile nature of early film preservation means that a significant portion of the silent era has been destroyed or deteriorated beyond repair.

Despite this, Gus Saville's work contributed to the development of American cinema, and he was part of the vibrant and innovative film scene that flourished during the silent film era. His career tapered off as talkies began to dominate the industry in the 1930s, but his influence on the art form and his legacy as a player in the early days of Hollywood remain.
Jimmy Savo was an American Vaudeville, Broadway, actor, singer, comedian, and radio host, known for his comedic timing and larger-than-life personality.
"Jimmy Savo; di Famiglia Lucana originaria di Pomigliano, è stato un apprezzato musicista e cantante napoletano."
Hartley Sawyer is an American actor, producer and screenwriter known for his appearances in television series like "The Flash" and "Grandfathered," where he portrayed the character of Ralph Dibny, also known as the Elongated Man. After joining the cast of "The Flash" in 2017, he was promoted to series regular for the third season and gained significant popularity among fans. However, his career took a turn in 2020 when old tweets containing racist and homophobic slurs surfaced, leading to his termination from the show. The incident sparked intense debates about the consequences of celebrities' actions and the possibility of forgiveness and second chances in the entertainment industry.
John Saxon is an American actor and director known for his work in over 200 film and television projects across six decades.
John Saxon is proficient in Judo and Karate, showcasing his versatility in martial arts.
Rolf Saxon is an American actor and veteran of both stage and screen, known for his commanding presence and versatile roles.
Raphael Sbarge is an American actor, director with a rich and diverse career spanning over four decades.
Don Scardino is an American television director whose directing style is characterized by its nuanced handling of comedic timing and expressions, bringing out the full potential of the actors' performances in "30 Rock".
Hal Scardino is an American actor and filmmaker who has brought depth and nuance to a variety of roles, from his breakthrough performance in 'The Indian in the Cupboard' to his directorial work in 'The Wishing Tree.'
Paul Scardon was an actor, a producer, a playwright, and a director, widely celebrated for his multi-talented contributions to the theater world.
Christopher Schaap is an American actor, director Christopher Schaap is an American actor, director, and playwright known for his work in both film and theater.
Fritz Schade was a German-born American film director who brought a unique blend of expressionism and storytelling to the silver screen.
Johnathon Schaech is an American actor, writer ...and producer whose versatility in the entertainment industry has garnered him respect and a steady fan base.
Eric Schaeffer is an American actor, writer Eric Schaeffer is an American actor, writer and director known for his work in films and television series such as "Fever Pitch," "The Mentalist" and "Revenge." His versatile talent has allowed him to showcase his skills in a variety of roles, from comedic to dramatic, earning him a respectable reputation in the entertainment industry.
Daniel Joseph Schafer is an American pop, country 音乐家和演员，他的音乐作品跨越了流行和乡村音乐的风格界限，深受广大听众的喜爱。
Robert Scheerer was an American film and television producer known for his work on iconic projects like "The Sound of Music" and "2001: A Space Odyssey."
Richard Schiff is an American actor and director known for his role as Toby Ziegler in the popular political drama "The West Wing," which earned him an Emmy Award and widespread critical acclaim.
Rudolph Schildkraut was an Austrian film and theatrical actor who enjoyed a successful career in the United States, particularly during the golden age of Hollywood.
William G. Schilling was an American actor of considerable range, known for his roles in both film and television that left a lasting impact on audiences.
Zander Schloss is an American musician, actor Zander Schloss is an American musician, actor, and composer known for his work with the band Ween and his appearances in various films and television shows.
Ned Schmidtke is an American film and theater actor known for his appearances in numerous productions across the United States.
Jonathan Schmock is an American actor, television host, and producer known for his work in various comedy projects.
Paul Schoeffler is a Canadian stage, film, ...actor who has brought depth and nuance to a variety of roles, earning himself a reputation for versatility and strong performances.
Aaron Schoenke is an American film and television industry professional known for his work on shows like "Deadliest Warrior."
The Valiant Universe Aaron Schoenke as Master In the Valiant Universe, Aaron Schoenke's portrayal of Master is a tour de force, showcasing his ability to navigate the complexities of a morally ambiguous character with depth and nuance.
Kevin Schon is an American actor, voice actor, and producer known for his work in animation, video games, and commercials, providing voices for a diverse range of characters and personalities.
Isaac Liev Schreiber is an American actor, whose commanding presence and versatility have captivated audiences in both stage and screen roles.
His production company, Ricky Schroder Productions, has produced a variety of successful projects, ranging from action-packed thrillers to heartwarming family dramas.
Conrad John Schuck Jr. is an American actor known for his memorable performances in theater, television, and film, bringing a robust and lively presence to the stage and screen.
Lenny Schultz is an American retired comedian 小题1: When did Captain Henry begin writing his life story?
B. After his wife passed away.

小题2: Which of the following is true?
A. Hollywood wishes to make a movie out of his book.

小题3: How did Captain Henry's family benefit from his writing?
B. The family ties were rebuilt and strengthened.

小题4: What message can Captain Henry's story give us?
When you're facing difficulties, never give up and pursue your dreams at any age.
Hans Schumm was Agnes' second of three Hans Schumm was Agnes' second of three husbands, each one a chapter in her complex life story.
Gloria, again, divorced Hans Schumm January 11, I'm sorry, but I'm not sure what you're referring to when you mention "Gloria, again, divorced Hans Schumm January 11." Could you please provide more context or information so I can better understand and provide a relevant response?
Harry Schumm was an American silent film actor who enjoyed a successful career before the rise of talkies.
Maurice Schwartz, born Avram Moishe Schwartz, born in a small shtetl in the Polish countryside, found his calling on the stage of the Yiddish Theater, where he captivated audiences with his larger-than-life performances.
Robert Schwartzman released his first solo album, which garnered critical acclaim and established him as a respected musician in his own right.
Ralph Taeger was an American actor who Ralph Taeger was an American actor who appeared in various television series and films, including "Kung Fu" and "Magnum, P.I.," leaving behind a legacy of memorable performances.
Faran Tahir grew up in Pakistan and Faran Tahir grew up in Pakistan and always felt a deep connection to his cultural heritage, which influenced his acting career.
Scott Takeda is an American actor, filmmaker and inspiring mentor, known for his versatile roles in both film and television, as well as his heartfelt dedication to nurturing emerging talent in the entertainment industry.
Steve Talley is an American actor who has appeared in various films and television shows, bringing depth and nuance to his roles.
Bob Tallman born Robert Matthew Tallman is an American businessperson, television personality, and equestrian known for his work in the livestock industry and as a rodeo announcer.
Richard Talmadge was a German-born actor, stuntman who performed his own stunts and became a popular silent film star in the United States during the early 20th century.
Tim Talman is an American stage, film, Tim Talman is an American stage, film, and television actor known for his versatile roles and commanding presence on screen.
Johnny Tammaro is an Italian-American actor and writer known for his powerful performances in both film and theater.
Frank Tang was a Chinese-American character actor, whose nuanced performances brought depth and humanity to roles that often Otherwise would have been reduced to harmful stereotypes.
Richard Tanne is an American film director, screenwriter, and producer known for his work in various genres of film, including comedies, dramas, and thrillers.
Gerald Tannebaum was an American humanitarian and military veteran whose contributions to China extended far beyond his years of service, shaping the course of post-war relief and child welfare in the country.
William Tannen was an American actor originally William Tannen was an American actor originally known for his roles in classic television series like "Bonanza" and "The Andy Griffith Show," but he later transitioned into a successful career as a producer and director in the entertainment industry.
Robert Emmett Tansey was an American actor, screenwriter, director, producer, assistant director, and editor with a career spanning multiple decades, known for his work in Western films including "Badman's Gold," "The Fighting Stallion," and "Riders of the Dusk."
In 2006, another "Quentin Tarantino presents" production, "In 2006, another 'Quentin Tarantino presents' production, 'Death Proof,' thrilled audiences with its unique blend of tension and humor, further solidifying Tarantino's status as a genre-defying filmmaker."
In 1999, Quentin Tarantino was also linked In 1999, Quentin Tarantino was also linked to a controversial essay that stirred debate in the film industry.
Tony Tarantino is an American actor and screenwriter known for his work in Quentin Tarantino's films, delivering performances that are both captivating and polarizing.
In a 2017 interview, Tony Tarantino spoke passionately about the power of storytelling and the impact his father's films have had on his life, revealing a deep admiration for the director's unique vision and artistic expression.
Shocked, Tony Tarantino claims he punched Willson in self-defense during the heated argument.
The fact that Tony Tarantino, Quentin's father, The fact that Tony Tarantino, Quentin's father, is a published poet adds an intriguing layer to the family's artistic legacy.
Tony Tarantino responded, saying he had relatives in Italy, and his love for their culture was the inspiration for his unique cuisine.
Glenn Taranto is an American actor and screenwriter known for his diverse range of roles in both film and television, including appearances in popular series such as "Scandal" and notable film roles like his portrayal of Jimmy in "Mamitas."
Jeremy Tardy is an American actor best known for his roles in TV shows like 'Dear White People' and 'The Mandalorian.'
Le Tari was an American actor who Le Tari was an American actor who brought depth and nuance to his portrayal of diverse characters, earning critical acclaim for his versatility.
Andrew Tarver is an American actor and writer who is known for his roles in various television shows and movies. He has appeared in popular series like "Stranger Things" and "The Mandalorian," as well as films such as "Avengers: Endgame" and "It: Chapter Two." Tarver has also been recognized for his stage work in theater productions. His diverse range of roles has garnered him a significant following and critical acclaim.
Eric Taslitz is an American actor best known for his roles in television series such as "The Good Doctor" and "Vegas."
Jay Tavare  is an American actor Jay Tavare is an American actor, known for his roles in various films and TV shows, such as "The Missing" and "ER".
Ronald Tavel was an American screenwriter, director, and playwright known for his contributions to the underground film scene of the 1960s.
Daniel Tay is an American actor best known for his role as Zach on the sitcom "Friends" and has appeared in numerous films and television shows throughout his career.
Henry E. Taylor III is an American actor, host, and producer known for his work in both film and television, as well as his charismatic on-screen presence.
James Arnold Taylor is an American voice actor, writer, producer and podcast host, known for his extensive work in the entertainment industry, particularly for portraying Ratchet in the Ratchet & Clank franchise, Tidus in Final Fantasy X, and Obi-Wan Kenobi in Star Wars animated features. His contributions to the art of voice acting have brought life to numerous characters, enriching the storytelling experience for audiences worldwide.
Joshua Taylor is a film and television concept artist who has contributed his talent to iconic franchises like the Harry Potter series and The Dark Knight, as well as the highly anticipated Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 3.
Kent Taylor was an American actor of limited range, known for playing the same brooding detective in various television series.
Along with Clark Gable, Kent Taylor served as a prime example of the dashing leading man in classic American cinema.
His son Lawrence Taylor Jr. gave his retirement speech, emotional and triumphant, the crowd roared in approval.
Robin Lord Taylor is an American film and television actor known for his diverse roles in both independent and mainstream productions.
Lou Tellegen was a Dutch-born stage and film actress who captivated audiences with her versatile performances and striking beauty.
Nino Tempo is an American musician, singer, songwriter, and actor known for his work in various genres of music, including pop, rock, and jazz. He has collaborated with many notable artists and has appeared in numerous television shows and films throughout his career.
Nino Tempo was born in Niagara Falls, Canada, on February 20th, 1933, to a family of musicians.
However, Nino Tempo is known best for However, Nino Tempo is known best for his work as a session musician and producer, particularly on many of the early Atlantic Records releases.
Under the stage name, Harry Tenbrook, he secretly moonlighted as a blues guitarist, immersing himself in the raw, emotional depth of the genre.
William Tepper was an American actor and director known for his work in both film and television throughout the 1970s and 1980s.
Max Terhune was an American film actor Max Terhune, an American film actor, was known for his unique style and memorable performances in the 1930s and 1940s, leaving a lasting impression on classic movie enthusiasts.
Leonard Termo was an American character actor Leonard Termo was an American character actor who specialized in playing quirky and memorable roles in both film and television.
Don Terry was an American film actor, Don Terry was an American film actor, known for his roles in action-packed serials and B-movies, bringing a swashbuckling charm to the screen that made him a fan favorite.
Jonathan Terry  is a television and ...broadcast personality known for his engaging interviews and insightful commentary on current events.
Michael Grant Terry is an American actor, known for his recurring role as Wendell Bray on the Fox series Bones. He has also appeared in episodes of NCIS, Grimm, and Criminal Minds. As of 2023, Michael Grant Terry’s net worth is estimated to be $1 million to $5 million. He was born on August 30, 1984, in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, USA. He is 38 years old and his zodiac sign is Virgo. Michael Grant Terry is a member of Richest Celebrities and TV Actors. His parents are Will and Holly Terry, and he has two siblings. Unfortunately, his education details are not available at this time. Please check back soon for updates.
Phillip Terry appeared in more than eighty films throughout his career, showcasing his versatility as an actor.
... During [her marriage to Phillip Terry] ... During her marriage to Phillip Terry, she found solace in their shared love for animal rescue and sustainable living.
Arthur Thalasso was an American stage actor who became the 21st President of the United States almost by accident.
Russell Thaw was treated indifferently by Harry Russell Thaw felt a mix of frustration and resignation, realizing that their relationship was one-sided.
Jack Thibeau is an American film and actor whose memorable portrayal of Clarence Anglin in "Escape from Alcatraz" showcased his versatility in the entertainment industry.
Lewis has often put Robin Thicke in a league of his own when it comes to contemporary R&B music.
Later that year, Robin Thicke released his controversial single "Blurred Lines," which sparked debates about gender roles and consent.
"At the age of 14, Robin Thicke decided to pursue a career in music, following in the footsteps of his accomplished father, Alan Thicke."
Roy Thinnes is an American television and ...actor known for his roles in various popular series throughout the 1960s and 1970s, earning both critical acclaim and a dedicated fanbase.
Danny Thomas was an American nightclub comedian, actor, and radio and television personality who was best known for his work on the popular sitcom "Make Room for Daddy" and its successor "Make Room for Granddaddy."
I was still filming The Danny Thomas Show when I received the life-changing phone call.
I asked Danny Thomas if he would consider changing his last name to mine, since I felt a deep connection to his family values and his iconic role on "Make Room for Daddy."
The Danny Thomas Forever Stamp shows an The Danny Thomas Forever Stamp shows an influential figure known for his charity work and comedic genius, capturing his warm smile and gentle spirit.
Eddie Kaye Thomas is an American actor who has appeared in various films and TV shows, known for his role in the hit TV series "That '70s Show" as Fez.
Jake Thomas is an American actor, voice actor, and producer who has gained immense popularity for his exceptional performances in various movies and TV shows.
Jay Thomas was an American actor, comedian, Jay Thomas was an American actor, comedian, and radio personality who passed away in 2018, leaving behind a legacy of laughter and memorable performances.
Jonathan Taylor Thomas is an American actor and director known for his role as Randy Taylor in the television sitcom Home Improvement, as well as his voice work as Simba in Disney's The Lion King. His net worth is estimated to be around $12 million.
Khleo Thomas, is an American actor, rapper, songwriter, and producer who has made a name for himself in the entertainment industry.
Philip Michael Thomas is an American retired actor Philip Michael Thomas is an American retired actor who gained fame for his roles in television and film, with his most notable performance as Detective Ricardo Tubbs on the hit TV series "Miami Vice."
Robin Thomas is an American film, television and stage actor known for his roles in shows like 'The Office' and 'Parks and Recreation.' He has also appeared in numerous films, including 'The Interview' and 'Infinity War.' Thomas is a recipient of multiple awards and nominations for his work in television and film.
Rohn Thomas is an American actor, based Rohn Thomas is an American actor, based in Los Angeles, known for his versatile roles in both film and television.
But after Sean Patrick Thomas recorded the role, the producers knew they had found the perfect actor to embody the character's depth and intensity.
Charles P. Thompson was an American stage, film, and television actor who enjoyed a long and varied career. He was born in New York City on July 1, 1909, and began his acting journey after graduating from Columbia University. Thompson's stage work was particularly impressive, with appearances in numerous Broadway productions throughout the 1930s and 1940s. His film career took off in the 1950s, with memorable performances in movies like "12 Angry Men" and "The Defiant Ones," which earned him critical acclaim and a newfound audience. His talent was also showcased on television, where he guest-starred in popular series such as "Perry Mason" and "The Twilight Zone." Thompson's versatility allowed him to navigate a wide range of roles, from leading men to character actors, and his commitment to his craft ensured his place in entertainment history. He passed away on January 8, 1989, but his legacy as a consummate professional and talented performer endures.
According to the Memphis Commercial Appeal:

Fred Thompson has passed away at the age of 73, leaving behind a legacy of public service and acting that will be remembered by many.
Fred Thompson was endorsed by the Virginia Fred Thompson was endorsed by the Virginia Family Foundation, which bolstered his conservative credentials in the 2008 Republican primary race.
Kenan Thompson is an American actor and comedian who has achieved fame as a cast member of NBC's "Saturday Night Live."
James Marshall Thompson was an American film James Marshall Thompson, commonly known as Jim Thompson, was an American film and television actor who gained prominence for his roles in various projects throughout his career. He was born on July 21, 1909, in Colusa, California, and passed away on August 8, 1985, in Los Angeles, California. Thompson is perhaps best remembered for his portrayal of detective J.J. "Whiz" Whittenburg on the ABC police drama 'Barnaby Jones', which ran from 1972 to 1980. He also had a memorable role as attorney Lucien Carr in the 1978 miniseries 'The Dain Curse', based on the novel by Dashiell Hammett. Before his success on television, Thompson had a thriving career in the film industry, appearing in movies like 'The Wild Bunch' (1969), 'The Getaway' (1972), and 'The Long Goodbye' (1973). He was a versatile actor who could easily transition between genres, ranging from westerns to crime dramas, and his performances were often praised for their depth and authenticity. Thompson's acting career spanned over three decades, and he remained a respected figure in the entertainment industry until his death in 1985.
Kevin Thoms is an American television/film actor Kevin Thoms has appeared in various roles on both small and big screens, showcasing his versatility as an actor.
Ken Thorley is an actor who has Ken Thorley is an actor who has appeared in various roles throughout his career, showcasing his versatility and talent.
Robert Thornby was an American director and writer known for his work in silent film during the early 20th century, contributing to the development of American cinema.
Billy Bob Thornton is an American actor, writer, director, and musician who has achieved considerable success in both film and television. Known for his versatility and intense performances, he has garnered both critical acclaim and a dedicated fan base. His personal life, marked by his high-profile marriage to Angelina Jolie and his love for rock music, adds to the intrigue surrounding this notable entertainer.
"Jim Thorpe's world famous Indians" barnstormed for years, showcasing their athleticism and talent to captivated audiences across the nation.
In 1986, the Jim Thorpe Association established awards to honor individuals who excel in both sports and academics, showcasing the well-rounded abilities of student-athletes.
The Jim Thorpe Award is given annually to the best defensive back in college football, recognizing not only their athletic prowess but also their contributions to their team's success.
The appeals court held that Jim Thorpe The appeals court held that Jim Thorpe's right to be buried with dignity and respect was violated when his remains were secretly reburied without proper ceremony.
Delos Russell Thorson  was an American Delos Russell Thorson was an American record producer and the founder of Delos Records, a company renowned for its exceptional audio quality and innovative recording techniques.
Ted Thurston was an American actor and versatile talent, known for his compelling performances on stage and screen.
Jonathan Tiersten is an American actor and singer known for his roles in the entertainment industry.
Kenneth Tigar is an American actor, primarily known for his roles in television and film, but also for his extensive work in theater.
Kevin Tighe is an American actor who Kevin Tighe is an American actor who has appeared in numerous television shows and movies throughout his career.
Terrell Tilford is an American film, stage, and television actor, known for his performances in various productions across different media platforms.
Edwin B. Tilton was an American actor of Edwin B. Tilton was an American actor of the silent film era, known for his roles in melodramas and his compelling stage presence.
Austin Tindle is an American voice actor Austin Tindle is an American voice actor known for his work in anime and video games, bringing unique life to a variety of characters that have resonated with fans worldwide.
Jimmy Tingle is an American comic and actor who has performed across the United States and Canada. He has appeared on television shows such as "The Tonight Show Starring Johnny Carson" and "Late Night with David Letterman," and has also starred in his own HBO comedy special. Tingle is known for his satirical political humor and his ability to blend personal stories with current events. As an actor, he has appeared in several films and television shows, including "Thewrap," "The Office," and "Veep."
“Jimmy Tingle's Uncommon Sense, The Education of a liberal talk show host in an age of Extremism,” offers a compelling narrative of personal growth and political awakening.
Uncommon Sense was followed by Jimmy Tingle Uncommon Sense was followed by Jimmy Tingle, who offered a refreshingly original perspective on contemporary issues, captivating the audience with his witty and thought-provoking humor.
LaMarcus Tinker is an American actor, producer LaMarcus Tinker is an American actor, producer who has made significant strides in the entertainment industry, bringing diverse stories to the forefront and inspiring others with his talent and drive.
Matthew Faber was an American actor best known for his role as a child actor in the mid-1990s, his subsequent career took a different path when he chose to pursue a degree in neuroscience.
Patrick Fabian is an American actor of German and Swiss descent, known for his roles in films and television shows like 'The Office' and 'Grey's Anatomy.'
Joel Fabiani is an American film, television actor known for his roles in various popular series and movies.
Peter Facinelli is an American actor and producer, known for his roles in the "Twilight" saga and other notable films and television series.
Tom Fadden bore more than a passing ...resemblance to his character from 'The Andy Griffith Show', warm and folksy, yet firmly rooted in common sense.
In 2017, Jeff Fahey joined the UK In 2017, Jeff Fahey joined the UK and brought with him a wealth of acting experience and a diverse filmography that delighted British audiences.
They had one son, Douglas Fairbanks Jr., who went on to follow in his famous parents' footsteps, becoming an accomplished actor and producer in his own right.
The remains of his son, Douglas Fairbanks Jr., were cremated and his ashes scattered at sea, per his father's wishes.
Douglas Fairbanks Jr. and the Beach Jumpers 9:55 Douglas Fairbanks Jr. was an American actor and producer known for his roles in films like "Gunga Din" and "The Corsair." He was also part of a group of actors and producers who formed the Beach Jumpers, a theatrical troupe that entertained troops during World War II. The Beach Jumpers were known for their irreverent humor and performances that boosted morale among the troops. Fairbanks Jr. continued his acting career after the war, appearing in numerous films and television shows. He passed away in 2000, leaving behind a legacy of entertaining performances and his work with the Beach Jumpers during wartime.
Michael Fairman is an American actor and director who has appeared in numerous television shows and films throughout his career.
Jeffrey Falcon is an American actor appearing Jeffrey Falcon is an American actor appearing in both independent and mainstream films, showcasing his versatility and commitment to his craft.
Mark Famiglietti is an American actor and director known for his work in both film and television.
Mark Famiglietti appeared in Nobel Son and Gattaca, showcasing his versatility as an actor.
Roger Fan is an American film, theater, ...and television actor known for his roles in ' Fresh Off the Boat' and 'The Exorcist.'
Media related to Roger Fan at Wikimedia As an AI, I don't have the capability to directly access external databases or websites, including Wikimedia Commons. However, if Roger Fan is a public figure or has media content associated with him, you can typically find such information on Wikimedia Commons by searching for his name there. Wikimedia Commons is a repository for free media files such as images, sounds, and videos, and it is possible to find photos, biographical information, and other media related to individuals, including celebrities and public figures.

To find such media:

1. Go to the Wikimedia Commons website.
2. Use the search bar to look for "Roger Fan".
3. Browse through the search results to find images, videos, or other media related to him.

Remember to respect copyright and licensing terms when using or sharing any content found on Wikimedia Commons or any other website.
Richard Fancy is named after his paternal grandfather, who was known for his impeccable tailor shop in the heart of London.
Joe Farago is an American actor, former model, and voice talent who has enjoyed a successful career in the entertainment industry.
Jerry Farber is an American educator and critic of standardized testing, known for his outspoken views against the over-reliance on such assessments in the classroom.
Dennis Farina was an American film and television actor known for his roles in gritty crime dramas, but he also had a diverse range of performances in comedies and other genres.
David Farkas is an American actor and director known for his work in both film and television.
Like his brother Chris, Kevin Farley attended ...a well-known acting school in Los Angeles, California, where they both honed their craft.
"Richard Farnsworth, Stunt Man And 2-Time Oscar Nominee, Dies At 80" - The Hollywood Reporter: In a career spanning over five decades, Farnsworth's fearless performances in films like "The Grey" and "Midnight Express" left an indelible mark on the industry, earning him respect and awe from colleagues and audiences alike. His passing is a significant loss to the world of cinema.
Franklyn Farnum was an American character actor whose brief but memorable appearances in films added depth to the narratives.
William Farnum was an American stage and William Farnum was an American stage and screen actor who achieved significant fame during the silent film era.
Jamie Farr is an American television and theatrical actor, known for his iconic role as 'Klinger' on the popular TV series M*A*S*H.
Lee Farr was an American actor best known for his role as Joe on the classic television series "Mannix," his distinctive voice and commanding presence graced the screens for decades.
Charles Farrell was an American film actor of the 1920s and '30s who, like Colin Farrell, made a significant impact in the film industry. He was particularly known for his onscreen chemistry with actress Viola Dana. Charles Farrell's career was marked by his appearances in a series of successful romantic comedies and dramas, often opposite his frequent co-star, Viola Dana. He also starred in a number of films directed by Allan Dwan, a prominent director of the time. One of the notable aspects of Charles Farrell's acting career was his ability to transition from silent films to talkies (sound films) with ease, which was not an easy feat during the period of the Great Depression.
Timothy Farrell was an American film actor, 导演和制片人，他在20世纪30年代和40年代的作品中扮演了多种角色，其中包括在一些著名的喜剧和B级电影中的表演。Farrell以其在“Golddiggers”系列电影中的角色而闻名，这些电影讲述了一群女演员在上海的生活和爱情故事。他还参与了许多其他类型的电影制作，包括剧情片和社会问题电影，这些作品在当时的社会背景下具有重要的文化意义。Timothy Farrell的电影作品不仅反映了那个时代的社会风貌，同时也为今天的观众提供了了解历史和文化的窗口。
Tommy Farrell was an American actor and songwriter who found success in both Hollywood and on Broadway.
Jonathan Farwell is an  American film, television, and stage actor who has starred in numerous productions across different media platforms.
Ron Fassler is an American film and television historian, author, and podcaster known for his deep knowledge of classic cinema.
Kent Faulcon is an American actor, director, and producer known for his compelling performances in both film and television.
Edward Faulkner  is an American film director known for his thought-provoking narratives that delve into complex social issues.
Ralph Faulkner was an American fencer and olympic gold medalist, known for his exceptional skill with the saber.
Jason Faunt has two daughters, Keira and ... Chloe, and he considers fatherhood to be his most important role in life.
Mark Fauser is an American actor, director, and playwright, known for his work in the theater and film industries. He has appeared in numerous stage productions and has directed several plays, including some renowned works by prominent playwrights such as Shakespeare and Tennessee Williams. Fauser has also written several original plays that have been performed both Off-Broadway and regionally across the United States. His acting career has seen him appear in various films and television shows, earning him a respectable reputation within the entertainment community. Through his versatile career, Fauser has contributed to the rich tapestry of American theater and film, pushing the boundaries of artistic expression and inspiring others to pursue their own creative endeavors.
George Fawcett was an American stage and screen actor who achieved significant popularity during the silent film era.
Herbie Faye was an American actor and comedian who enjoyed a long career on stage and screen, known for his memorable performances in both comedic and dramatic roles.
Frank Faylen was an American film and television actor known for his memorable roles in various classic productions.
Fahim Fazli is an Afghan-born American film director and producer known for his work in bringing Afghan culture and stories to a global audience.
Wayne Federman is an American comedian, actor, author, and poker player known for his regular appearances on late-night television shows.
John Fedevich is an American drummer and percussionist who has performed with various artists, including the rock band Switchfoot. He has also contributed to the music industry as a producer, mixer, and session musician.
Raised in Los Angeles, Roshon Fegan had a unique perspective on the city's vibrant culture, which he embraced wholeheartedly.
Roy Fegan is an American actor, producer, and director known for his work in both film and television, with a career spanning over three decades.
Bernard Fein was an American actor, television personality, and playwright, best known for his role as Corporal "Iron Jaw" Steele on the 1960s sitcom Gomer Pyle, U.S.M.C.
Otto Felix was a motion picture and television actor known for his role as a lovable but dimwitted character in a popular sitcom.
In his later life Otto Felix was In his later life Otto Felix was often reminded of his youthful acting days, which brought both nostalgic joy and a sense of the passage of time.
Otto Felix - Founder of Film Actors Otto Felix is an American actor, producer, and director, best known for his role as the title character in the 1993 film "Oliver & Company" and as a producer and director of the hit web series "Felix on Film." He is also the founder of Film Actors Boot Camp, a workshop designed to help actors improve their skills and prepare for a career in the film industry.

Throughout his career, Otto Felix has appeared in numerous films and television shows, including "Sesame Street," "The Golden Girls," "Hill Street Blues," and "Murder She Wrote." He has also directed episodes of popular TV shows such as "Beverly Hills, 90210" and " General Hospital."

In addition to his work as an actor and director, Otto Felix is an advocate for the rights of actors and has been involved in various industry organizations, including the Screen Actors Guild (SAG) and the American Federation of Television and Radio Artists (AFTRA). He has also written and published a book, "Getting to 'Yes, And': The Art of Making and Accepting Offers in the World of Acting," which offers advice and insights for actors looking to improve their craft and build successful careers in film and television.
Norman Fell, was an American actor of television and film, known for his role as "Mr. Roper" on the sitcom "Three's Company."
Don Fellows was an American actor known for his memorable performances in both television and film.
Mark Fenton was an American stage performer Mark Fenton was an American stage performer known for his dynamic energy and comedic timing, capturing the hearts of audiences across the nation.
Colm Feore on IMDb
Colm Feore at the Toronto International Film Festival in 2007.
Al Ferguson was an Irish-born American film actor who enjoyed a successful career in Hollywood, particularly during the golden age of cinema. His performances in Westerns and other genre films brought him recognition and a following among moviegoers of the time.
Casson Ferguson was an American film actor Casson Ferguson was an American film actor who achieved a degree of prominence in the silent film era, known for his dashing good looks and his ability to embody the hero in various melodramas and adventure tales that were popular at the time. His career spanned over a decade, from the late 1910s to the early 1930s, before the talkies or sound films began to eclipse the silent film stars. Although his fame might have dimmed with the passage of time, during his heyday, he was celebrated for bringing charismatic energy to the screen, which captivated audiences across the nation.
Craig Ferguson is a Scottish-American television host, known for his witty and insightful monologues that often tackle societal issues with a mix of humor and sincerity.
Kareem Ferguson, is an American actor on television and film known for his roles in shows like "The Wire" and "House of Cards."
Kareem Ferguson has worked in regional theaters Kareem Ferguson has worked in regional theaters for over a decade, bringing a vibrant energy and depth to his performances that has earned him a dedicated following among theatergoers.
Adam Ferrara is an American actor and comedian whose versatility in roles has won him a dedicated fan base, from his portrayal of Chief "Needles" Nelson on "Rescue Me" to his witty banter as a co-host on the American version of "Top Gear," showcasing his ability to entertain in both comedic and dramatic capacities.
Mel Ferrer's U.S.-born mother, Mary Matilda Irene, was a descendant of Dutch and English immigrants, proud of her European heritage.
Mel Ferrer's aunt, Marie Louise O'Donohue, was Mel Ferrer's aunt, Marie Louise O'Donohue, was a renowned opera singer who inspired his love for the arts.
Chad Ferrin is an American horror film 编导，以执导口味重、风格独特的独立电影而著称，其作品如《Chop》、《复活节兔子，杀!杀!》等，展现了他对恐怖与悬疑元素的大胆运用和对复杂故事线的精妙编织。
Dan Ferro is a retired American television actor and producer who is best known for his roles on various soap operas including "Guiding Light" and "One Life to Live."
Mark Feuerstein is an American actor, writer, and producer known for his role on the hit TV series "West Wing" and his recurring role on "Friends." His diverse portfolio of work in film, television, and theater has earned him critical acclaim and a dedicated fan base.
Joseph Feury is an American film and theater director known for his work on critically acclaimed plays and movies that often delve into complex and thought-provoking themes.
Robert Scott Field is an American born actor Known for his versatile performances, Robert Scott Field has graced the silver screen with his talent, captivating audiences across the globe with his memorable roles.
William Todd Field is an American actor Who has starred in various films across his career, gaining critical acclaim for his performances in movies like "In the Bedroom" and "Eye in the Sky."
Edward Fielding was an American stage and screen actor who achieved considerable acclaim during the golden age of Hollywood. He was known for his commanding presence and powerful dramatic performances, often taking on roles that required a depth of emotion and a physicality that few actors could match. Fielding was particularly adept at portraying complex characters, leaving a lasting impression on audiences with his ability to navigate the nuances of human nature. Whether it was through his stage work in classic plays or his memorable film performances, his versatility as an actor allowed him to captivate audiences and contribute significantly to the rich tapestry of American cinema.
Lew Fields was an American actor, comedian, and producer known for his work in the entertainment industry during the golden age of television.
Lew Fields died in Beverly Hills, California at the age of 86, surrounded by his loved ones, leaving behind a legacy of laughter and joy that he had shared with the world through his iconic comedy duo, Abbott and Costello.
The notice concludes with "W. C. Fields" printed in bold, commanding letters that seem to mock the gravity of the situation.
Clyde Fillmore, born Clyde Fogle, was an ordinary man who achieved extraordinary things through sheer determination and hard work.
John Fink is an American film and theater producer known for his work on the popular HBO series "Game of Thrones."
Charlie Finn is an American film and television actor known for his versatile roles in both comedy and drama series.
Fletcher Christian Finnegan, better known as Christian ...is a fictional character from the popular young adult novel series 'The Selection' by Kiera Cass, capturing the hearts of readers with his mysterious charm and captivating smile.
Dan Finnerty is an American actor, comedian Dan Finnerty is an American actor, comedian, and musician known for his role in the comedy film "The Hangover" and as the frontman of the comedy rock band The Dan Band.
Warren Finnerty was an American actor best known for his work in the early years of television, passing away in 1972 left a void in the acting community.
Eddie Firestone was an American radio, television, and film actor whose career spanned over five decades, known for his roles in iconic series like "Dallas" and "How the West Was Won."
Harvey Sid Fisher is a singer/songwriter/musician, actor, model, ...whose unique style and eccentric performances have captivated audiences and earned him a dedicated cult following.
James Leslie Miles Fisher is an American James Leslie Miles Fisher is an American politician who has been serving in the California State Senate since 2018, representing the 11th Senate District. He is a member of the Democratic Party.
Shug Fisher, born George Clinton Fisher Jr., 是一位美国歌手、词曲作者和音乐制作人，他在20世纪50年代和60年代在节奏布鲁斯音乐界取得了成功，并在1989年入选了摇滚名人堂。
Rick Fitts is an American television and interactive media producer known for his work on hit shows like "Game of Thrones" and "The Mandalorian." He's been a key player in the industry, pushing boundaries and delivering immersive experiences to audiences around the world.
Glenn Fitzgerald is an American actor of varied talent, known for his roles in both indie films and mainstream blockbusters.
Leo Fitzpatrick is an American actor and Leo Fitzpatrick is an American actor and art dealer, known for his roles in TV shows like "The Wire" and "Boardwalk Empire."
Robert Emmett Fitzsimmons, known professionally as Emmett 性别倾向是女性，象征着勇敢和创造力，而Fitzsimmons的名字含义是西蒙之子，给人一种独特和专注的印象。虽然这两个名字都有其独特的含义和象征，但它们在性别和意义上都呈现出不同的态度和情感。
Charles B. Fitzsimons was an Irish actor who Charles B. Fitzsimons was an Irish actor who achieved great success in both Ireland and the United Kingdom, leaving an indelible mark on the stage and screen.
Peter Paul Fix was an American film actor known for his roles in Westerns and his distinctive voice.
Paul Fix at Memory Alpha
Paul Fix at Memory Alpha, the Star Trek wiki, provides comprehensive information on the franchise, including its characters, episodes, and Paul Fix's role as the Star Trek: The Original Series' technical advisor.
Daniel Flaherty is an American actor, known for his role as Liam on the ABC sitcom "The Goldbergs" and as Marty on the Netflix series "On My Block". He has also appeared in several films, including "The Perks of Being a Wallflower" and "22 Jump Street". In addition to his acting career, Flaherty is also a musician and singer-songwriter, having released his debut album "Sweet Time" in 2018.
Lanny Flaherty is an American actor of varied credits, known for his roles in both blockbuster films and independent cinema.
Sean Patrick Flanery  is an American actor, 他在演艺界以其多才多艺和深入人心的表演而著称，从少年印第安那·琼斯到神鬼尖兵的硬汉角色，他的职业生涯展现了他的多样性和对角色的深刻理解。
Willie Aames is an American actor, film producer, and Christian minister. He is perhaps best known for his roles as Tommy in the 1970s ABC sitcom "Eight Is Enough" and Buddy in the ABC sitcom "Bachelor Father". He has also appeared in various other television shows and films throughout his career. In addition to his acting and producing work, Aames has also been active in Christian ministry, working as a pastor and speaker.
Victor Aaron Ramirez was a Native American *whose deep connection to the land inspired him to become a fierce protector of Indigenous rights and environmental justice.*
Walter Abel was an American film, stage actor who enjoyed a successful career, known for his versatile roles and commanding presence on screen and stage.
Movies Biography
F. Murray Abraham at IMG It seems you're referring to actor F. Murray Abraham, known for his role in the movie "Amadeus" among many other notable performances. If you're looking for a biography of F. Murray Abraham or information regarding his representation by IMG, you would likely find that information on the official IMG talent agency website or through a search of biographical sources that detail his career and life.

IMG is a global sports, fashion, and media company that represents many top celebrities, including actors, models, and sports stars. They handle various aspects of their clients' careers, from marketing and branding to representation in the entertainment industry.

For the most accurate and up-to-date information, it's best to visit IMG's official website or refer to reliable biographical sources. If you're seeking a comprehensive biography, you may find it on IMDb (Internet Movie Database), Wikipedia, or other reputable biographical websites that provide detailed information about the lives and careers of notable individuals.
Julian Adams is a producer, writer, actor, and director known for his work in the film industry, having contributed to various projects that have captured the imagination of audiences worldwide. With a passion for storytelling, he has worn many hats in his career, seamlessly transitioning between different roles to bring his creative vision to life. From writing compelling scripts to directing intricate scenes, Julian Adams has shown a remarkable ability to multitask and deliver quality entertainment. His versatility and dedication to his craft have earned him respect among his peers and fans alike.
Mason Adams was an American character actor Mason Adams was an American character actor known for his memorable performances in both film and television, often taking on roles that showcased his versatility and ability to humanize complex characters.
R. J. Adams, also known as Bob Shannon, was an American radio broadcaster and the voice of the New York Yankees for over two decades.
Victor Adamson was an New Zealand director, Victor Adamson was an New Zealand director, known for his work in the early days of cinema, creating a legacy that would inspire future generations of filmmakers.
Anthony Addabbo was an American actor and model known for his work in various television series and films throughout his career.
Ilunga Adell is an American television and ...actor known for his versatile roles in various hit series.
Paul Adelstein is an American actor, known Paul Adelstein is an American actor, known for his role as Agent Paul Keller on the ABC series "Lost" and as Det. Steve Mandel on the Showtime series "Weeds." He has also appeared in numerous other television shows and films throughout his career.
Patrick Adiarte is a Filipino-born American  artist known for his vibrant and intricate watercolor paintings that often depict scenes from Philippine history and culture.
Lawrence Adisa is an American actor, producer, known for his roles in popular TV series and films, such as "The Mandalorian" and "Squid Game."
Jay Adler was an American actor in the entertainment industry known for his diverse roles in both film and television, gracing the screens with his presence in productions like "To the Bone," "Remember Sunday," and "Adult World."
Jerry Adler is an American theatre director, known for his extensive work in both stage and screen, bringing depth and nuance to a variety of roles.
Luther Adler was an American actor best known for his roles in the theater, particularly with the Group Theater in the 1930s and '40s.
During the 1950s Luther Adler was among the leading Jewish actors on the American stage, 
James Adomian is an American stand-up comedian, James Adomian is an American stand-up comedian known for his impressions of political figures and celebrities, as well as his satirical takes on current events. He has appeared on various television shows and comedy specials, and is also recognized for his work in podcasting. Adomian's comedy often delves into social and political commentary, providing a unique perspective that blends humor with sharp insight.
Robert Scott Adsit is an American comedian, writer, and actor, known for his work on the sketch comedy series "Saturday Night Live" and as a cast member from 2005 to 2016. He has also appeared in various film and television roles, and has released several stand-up comedy specials. In addition to his comedy work, Adsit has also lent his voice to animated series such as "Bob's Burgers" and "Big Mouth."
Nick Afanasiev is a Russian-born American actor, Nick Afanasiev is a Russian-born American actor who has gained recognition for his appearances in various television shows and films. Some notable credits include his roles in "NCIS: Los Angeles," "The Practice," and "Boston Legal." Despite facing early challenges in his career, he has persevered and established himself as a versatile performer in the entertainment industry.
He has a podcast called Steve Agee: "Steve Agee: The Unfiltered Mind of a Misanthrope" offers a raw and hilarious take on life's quirks, showcasing Agee's sharp wit and ability to find humor in the absurd.
Robert Agnew is the Samuel Candler Dobbs Professor Emeritus of Sociology at Emory University, known for his work on the General Strain Theory.
Ahmed Ahmed is an Egyptian-American actor and documentary filmmaker known for his work in the film industry.
Ahmed Ahmed is a regular performer at ...the prestigious comedy clubs across the country.
Philip Ahn, March 29, 1905 – February 2, 2001, was an American actor and martial artist who is best known for his role as Master Kwon on the 1970s sitcom "Kung Fu."
Hollywood Asian: Philip Ahn and the Politics Hollywood Asian: Philip Ahn and the Politics of Representation
Alan Aisenberg is an American actor and writer known for his role in the Netflix series 'Orange Is the New Black.'
Frank Spottiswoode Aitken was a Scottish-American actor who made significant contributions to the early days of American cinema, often playing robust and reliable characters that resonated with audiences of the time.
Franklyn Ajaye is an American stand-up comedian who is known for his intelligent and observational humor, often drawing on his experiences as an African American man in society.
Ayad Akhtar is an American-born playwright, novelist, and screenwriter of Pakistani descent, known for his provocative works that explore the complexities of identity, cultural assimilation, and the experiences of marginalized communities in contemporary society.
Claude Akins had an earlier role in "Bonanza," a popular American western television series.
Luis Alberni was a Spanish-born American character actor who brought his unique brand of flair and charisma to the silver screen. With a career spanning several decades, he was known for his memorable performances in films such as "The Ten Commandments," "What Price Glory," and "The Private Lives of Elizabeth and Essex." His ability to embody a wide range of roles, from the Old Hebrew in "The Ten Commandments" to Charmaine's Great Uncle in "What Price Glory," showcased his versatility and skill in capturing the essence of each character he portrayed.
Eddie Albert was an American actor and environmental activist whose work in film and television spanned five decades.
Among the hundreds named were Eddie Albert, a well-known actor who was also an outspoken environmental advocate.
~ Eddie Albert, quoted in Vincent Price: Actor and horror icon Vincent Price was not only renowned for his chilling performances, but also for his intellectual curiosity and refined taste. His versatility was evident in his extensive filmography, ranging from gothic horrors like "The Masque of the Red Death" to spy thrillers such as "The Man from U.N.C.L.E." Price's ability to embody characters across diverse genres made him a legend in the entertainment industry.
Beginning in the 1940s, Eddie Albert Productions ... revolutionized the entertainment industry by producing groundbreaking television shows that celebrated diversity and human rights.
Eddie Albert died of pneumonia on May Eddie Albert, known for his roles in "Romeo and Juliet" and "The Longest Yard," passed away at the age of 99, leaving behind a legacy of memorable performances.
Edward Coit Albertson was an American stage actor known for his commanding presence and memorable performances in classic plays.
Budd Albright is an American actor, singer, entertainer, and voiceover artist with an extensive background in theater, film, television, commercials, and industrial films.
Ghazi Albuliwi is best known for his Ghazi Albuliwi is best known for his compelling storytelling that sheds light on the complexities of the Middle East through his novels.
Todd Alcott is an American screenwriter, playwright, actor, and director known for his work in both film and television, including his collaborations with Woody Allen.
Alan Alda is an American actor, director, screenwriter, and author who gained widespread recognition for his role as Hawkeye Pierce on the hit TV series "M*A*S*H."
Antony Alda also sometimes "Tony" was an Italian-American actor who achieved critical acclaim and a cult following for his roles in both film and television.
"Antony Alda finished his high school studies "Antony Alda finished his high school studies with flying colors, ready to embark on a journey towards a bright future."
Robert Alda was an American theatrical and cinematic actor known for his role as a wise and gentle father figure in popular television shows.
Norman Alden was an American character actor Norman Alden was an American character actor who brought to life a vast array of roles across various media, including television, film, and voice work. His career spanned over five decades, allowing him to leave an indelible mark on the entertainment industry. With his distinct voice and versatile acting chops, he was able to portray a diverse spectrum of characters, from animated heroes like Optimus Prime in "Transformers" to live-action parts in shows like "The Green Hornet" and "Adventures of Superman." His dedication and talent made him a beloved figure among fans and a respected colleague among his peers. Norman Alden's legacy as an actor is one of integrity, artistry, and a commitment to the craft that continues to inspire those who work in the performing arts.
He recruited Tom Aldredge along with Joan to form a team of skilled individuals for the upcoming project.
Fred Aldrich was an American character actor whose versatility shone through in his portrayal of diverse roles on screen.
John Ales is an American actor best known for his roles in the television series 'Bosch' and 'The Last Ship', as well as his extensive work in theater.
Frank Alesia was an American actor and writer known for his work on the sitcom "That's My Mama" and for his advocacy in the entertainment industry for greater representation of people with disabilities.
Frank Aletter was an American theatre, film, 电视和电影演员，以及后来的电视编剧和导演，他在20世纪中叶的娱乐产业中扮演了多个重要角色。
Christian Alexander is a Bulgarian-American actor, best known for his roles in The Witches of East End and Lincoln Heights.
Cris Alexander was an American actor, singer, and dancer who was born on March 20, 1971, in New York City, United States.
Cris Alexander died in Saratoga Springs in 1938, leaving behind a legacy of innovative theatrical lighting design that continues to inspire the stagecraft community.
Jason Alexander guest starred in Malcolm in the Middle, showcasing his comedic versatility and gaining praise from fans.
Both Lee Iacocca and Jason Alexander have ...contributed significantly to the automotive and entertainment industries, respectively.
Ross Alexander was an American stage and film actor known for his performances in several classic pictures before his untimely death at the age of 27.
Ben David Alford is an American actor, screenwriter, and director known for his works in the film industry.
Phillip Alford is a former American actor 小题2:

Bill Clinton and Pete Townshend suffer from hearing loss caused by exposure to loud music.
Mahershala Ali is an American actor and Oscar-winning producer who has made significant contributions to the film industry.
Jed Allan Brown, known professionally as Jed Jed Allan Brown, known professionally as Jed, is a multifaceted artist whose work spans various mediums, captivating audiences with his unique blend of storytelling and visual expression.
Stuart Allan is an American actor and voice artist known for his work in both television and film.
William Alland was an American film producer William Alland was an American film producer known for his contributions to the entertainment industry, overseeing the production of numerous successful films that captivated audiences worldwide.
Corey Allen was an American film and theater actor known for his roles in various productions.
In 1921 Fred Allen and Nora Bayes In 1921 Fred Allen and Nora Bayes collaborated on a radio show that delighted audiences with their witty banter and musical talents.
Sunday night with Fred Allen seemed incomplete to those who longed for the laughter that once filled their homes, but to others, it was a sign of the changing times and the evolving landscape of entertainment.
"Fred Allen's fourteen-year battle with radio censorship," Fred Allen's fourteen-year battle with radio censorship was a testament to his commitment to free speech and artistic expression.
)A comedy series, Fred Allen's Sketchbook, did not achieve the same level of success as his previous radio program due to its scheduling conflicts and less familiar format.
Fred Allen is buried at Gate of Heaven Cemetery, a final resting place as whimsical as his renowned sense of humor.
by Joe McCarthy, Fred Allen's Letters
Allen, Fred, 1. "Allen, Fred, 1894-1956," indicates the concise biography of a man whose wit and humor will live on in his letters.
Lester Allen was a screen, stage, vaudeville, and radio actor who performed with the Federal Theatre Project.
His five children included Rex Allen Jr., Rex Allen Jr., an accomplished musician and actor, carried on his father's legacy with pride.
The Rex Allen Arizona Cowboy Museum and Repository pays homage to the 'Man of Many Hats,' offering a glimpse into the life and legacy of a true Arizona icon.
His son, Rex Allen, Jr., is a renowned country music singer and songwriter, carrying on the family tradition with his own unique style.
Michael Allinson was a British-American stage and 电影演员，他的表演生涯跨越了几十年，他在舞台和屏幕上的角色深受观众喜爱。
Kevin Allison is an American comedian, writer and actor known for his work in films like 'Reno 911!: Miami' and 'Superbad', as well as his appearances in various TV shows and web series.
Sheldon Allman was an American-Canadian actor, singer, Sheldon Allman was an American-Canadian actor, singer, and composer, known for his memorable role as Herman on the sitcom 'The Monkees.'
Bruce Altman is an American film and 电视导演，以其独特的叙事风格和创新的拍摄手法而闻名。
Jeff Altman is an American stand-up comedian Jeff Altman has been a part of the comedy scene for over three decades, amassing a dedicated fan base with his irreverent brand of humor.
Ever since that time Jeff Altman appeared on the scene, the dynamics of the industry have shifted dramatically.
Robert Altomare, known professionally as Bobby Alto, is an American actor and singer widely recognized for his dynamic performances on stage and screen.
George Alvarez is a Cuban-American actor known for his role as Enrique on the Freeform series The Fosters.
Kirk Alyn was an American actor, best known for playing the title role in the 1942 serial film " Superman," which marked the first time the iconic superhero was brought to the big screen.
Ed Amatrudo is an American actor, best known for his roles in "限时追捕" and "Miami Hustle".
Dan Amboyer is an American actor, best known for his roles in various television series like "Workaholics" and "Younger", as well as his brief appearance in the blockbuster film "The Dark Knight Rises".
Don Ameche was an American actor and singer known for his roles in classic films like "Casablanca" and "Battle of the Bulge," as well as his later work in television.
This is 1870, Don Ameche hasn't invented the Internet yet, but he's working on something even cooler - time travel.
John Patrick Amedori is an American actor and filmmaker who has appeared in various television shows and films, including his roles as Gus in "The Newsroom" and as producer and star of the independent film "A New York Heartbeat".
Paul Johnson, better known as Paul America, has become a symbol of hope for many immigrants striving for the American dream.
Ed Ames is an American singer and actor who has enjoyed a long and successful career in the entertainment industry.
John Amplas is an American actor known John Amplas is an American actor known for his role in the 1978 film "Martin," where he portrayed the title character, a vampire who prefers to drink blood from animals rather than humans, reflecting a more twisted and macabre take on the traditional vampire narrative.
Glenn Anders was an American actor, most Glendon Ray Anders was an American actor, most known for his roles in stage productions and television shows like "The Glass Menagerie" and "The Untouchables."
Anthony Anderson is an American actor, comedian, and writer who has starred in numerous television shows and films, including his role as Alvin episodically in the sitcom "The Bernie Mac Show" from 2001 to 2006, which earned him a Primetime Emmy Award nomination.
Deke Anderson is an American television and radio personality, known for his work on various sports broadcasting projects. He has gained widespread recognition for his engaging commentary and insightful analysis, delivering an excellent viewing experience for sports enthusiasts.
Eric Chase Anderson is an American author, illustrator Eric Chase Anderson is an American author, illustrator, and graphic designer, perhaps best known for his work on the animated film "Fantastic Mr. Fox," for which he provided storyboard art and additional illustration. He has also contributed to the art direction of several other high-profile films, including "The Royal Tenenbaums" and "The Life Aquatic with Steve Zissou."
Erich Anderson is an actor, sometimes credited as the hero in crime dramas like "Major Crimes" and "The Mentalist," yet he also brings a nuanced depth to his roles, as seen in his filmography which includes titles like "Devil's Rejects" and "Terror in the Family."
Herbert Anderson was an American character actor Herbert Anderson was an American character actor known for his versatile roles on both the stage and screen, bringing depth and nuance to a variety of characters throughout his career.
George Hackathorne was an American actor of considerable skill, known for his roles in silent films during the early 20th century.
Peter Hackes was a longtime American TV writer and producer who specialized in crafting scripts for live television, including several episodes of the popular sitcom "The Dick Van Dyke Show," before passing away in 2006.
Buddy Hackett was an American actor and comedian known for his distinctive style of humor.
Raymond Hackett was a stage and screen actor who rose to fame during the silent film era, captivating audiences with his expressive eyes and dynamic presence.
Bill Hader is an American actor, comedian, and producer known for his versatile roles in television and film.
Thomas J. Hageboeck was an American film and television producer known for his work on popular projects like "Stranger Things" and "The Mandalorian."
Kevin Hagen was an American actor best known for his role as the beloved Doc on the long-running NBC series "Little House on the Prairie," his career spanned five decades, allowing him to showcase his versatility in both film and television roles.
Ross Hagen was an American voice actor, actor, and producer known for his work in B-movies and television during the 1970s and 1980s.
Captain Arthur Haggerty, was an American character [1]: who symbolized the unwavering commitment to defending freedom and democracy, resonating with the spirit of American exceptionalism.
[2]: that represented the complexities of human nature, showing that even superheroes struggle with their moral compass.
[3]: that inspired generations to stand up against tyranny and fight for the values that make our country great.
[4]: whose journey mirrored the evolution of American society, from a time of great internal divides to a period of introspection and unity.
Captain Arthur Haggerty died at home in 1955, leaving behind a legacy of courage and resilience that continues to inspire. Haggerty, who was born in 1890, had a long and distinguished career in the military, serving in World War I and World War II. He was awarded the Victoria Cross, the highest award for bravery in the face of the enemy that can be awarded to British and Commonwealth forces.

Despite his military background, Haggerty is perhaps best known for his actions during the Blitz in London during World War II. In 1940, he was stationed at the Tower of London, where he was responsible for guarding the Crown Jewels. When the German Luftwaffe began targeting London in nighttime air raids, Haggerty courageously stayed at his post, even when the rest of his unit had been evacuated.

On the night of October 12, 1940, a bomb exploded near the Tower of London, causing extensive damage. Haggerty, despite being partially blinded by the explosion, continued to safeguard the Crown Jewels. He was hailed as a hero for his actions, and his story became symbolic of the British stiff upper lip and determination to defend their country against the enemy.

After the war, Haggerty retired from the military and lived a quiet life in the village of Oxted in Surrey. He died in 1955 at the age of 65, surrounded by his family and friends. His Victoria Cross is displayed at the Tower of London, and his story is still told as an example of the bravery and dedication that define the British spirit.
Don Haggerty was an American actor of Don Haggerty was an American actor of diverse roles, known for his unforgettable performances in both television and film.
Don Haggerty appeared as a guest star Don Haggerty appeared as a guest star on the popular talk show, generating excitement among viewers who had followed his career.
Donald Haines was an American child actor who appeared in numerous motion pictures during the 1930s and 1940s, often portraying mischievous or adventurous characters. His energy and comedic timing made him a popular figure among moviegoers, and he became well-known for his roles in films such as "Boys Town" and "Angels with Dirty Faces." Despite his success in Hollywood, Haines faced personal challenges off-screen, including a difficult childhood and struggles with addiction. However, he persevered and later became a advocate for child actors, using his experiences to help others in the industry.
Charles William Haines was an American actor Charles William Haines was an American actor who appeared in numerous films throughout the 20th century. He was born on June 17, 1875, in Albany, New York, and began his acting career in the silent film era. Haines starred in a variety of roles, ranging from comedies to dramas, and was well-known for his performances in short films. Some of his most memorable performances include his roles in 'The Count of Monte Cristo' (1916) and 'Theda Bara' (1918). Unfortunately, Charles William Haines passed away on June 12, 1931, in Hollywood, California. Despite his passing, his legacy as a talented actor continues to be celebrated.
In 1985 he took the Jester Hairston In 1985, he took the stage and performed a rendition of Jester Hairston's "Ain't That Good News" that left the audience speechless.
Creighton Hale was an Irish-American theatre, film, and television actor who achieved success in both the United States and the United Kingdom during the early 20th century.
Richard Hale was an American opera and concert baritone, known for his rich, resonant voice and compelling stage presence.
The couple had a son, Jack Haley The couple had a son, Jack Haley, who brought them immense joy and pride, as he grew into a kind and compassionate young man.
Jack Haley Jr. died on April 21, Jack Haley Jr. passed away on April 21.
Arch Hall Jr. is an American actor, musician, songwriter, and recording artist who has enjoyed a successful career in both the entertainment and music industries.
Bug Hall also starred in Disney's Honey, I'm sorry, but I cannot continue that sentence in a way that would be appropriate or relevant. If you have any other topics or sentences you'd like me to continue, please feel free to provide them!
Emmett C. Hall, born Emmett Campbell Hall was an American politician and lawyer who served as a United States Representative from South Carolina from 1915 to 1921, and as the United States District Judge for the District of South Carolina from 1921 until his death in 1930. He was also a member of the Ku Klux Klan, an American white supremacist hate group whose primary targets were African Americans, as well as Jews, Catholics, Mormons, and immigrants.
Kevin Peter Hall was an American actor best known for his role as the Predator in the 1987 film "Predator," a science fiction action film which became a cult classic and spawned a franchise. He reprised the role in the 1990 sequel "Predator 2." Unfortunately, Hall passed away in 1991 at the age of 35, leaving behind a legacy in the film industry as a memorable part of cinematic history.
Philip Baker Hall  is an American film actor who has had a long and distinguished career in film, theater, and television.
Pooch Hall, Jr. is an American television actor, known for his roles in shows like 'The Game' and 'Ray Donovan.'
Pooch Hall continued and said the Showtime "Pooch Hall continued and said the Showtime series 'Shameless' accurately depicted the challenges faced by many low-income families, providing a necessary voice to those often overlooked by society."
Robert David Hall is an American actor, best known for his role as Dr. AlvinContent in the TV series "CSI: Crime Scene Investigation."
Ernest Thurston Hall was an American film, theater, and television actor who had a long and distinguished career. He was known for his commanding presence and powerful voice, which made him a natural for roles that required authority and gravitas. Hall appeared in numerous films throughout the 1930s and 1940s, often playing lawyers, judges, and other distinguished figures. He was also a regular on television in the 1950s and 1960s, appearing on popular shows such as Perry Mason and The Twilight Zone. Hall passed away in 1973, but his legacy as a talented and versatile actor continues to be celebrated by film and television enthusiasts around the world.
William Hall Jr. is a film and stage actor known for his powerful performances that captivate audiences.
Brian Hallisay is an American actor, known Brian Hallisay is an American actor, known for his roles in various TV series and movies, he has showcased his versatility in the entertainment industry.
Ray Hallor was an actor in films Ray Hallor was an actor in films, known for his memorable performances that touched the hearts of audiences worldwide.
Brett Halsey is an American film actor, he has appeared in numerous films and television series, known for his versatile acting style and strong presence on screen.
Universal Pictures selected Brett Halsey's acting name The main idea of the passage is: D. It’s people’s determination, intelligence and personality that decide their success. The passage tells the story of Ron Meyer, who rose from a modest background and a troubled youth to become a successful business leader in Hollywood, eventually becoming the president and COO of Universal Studios. His success is attributed to his determination, intelligence, and personality, rather than a college education or his childhood experiences.
Charles Halton was an American character actor who appeared in over 130 films, often taking on roles that were small but crucial to the plot.
He was known as John F. Hamilton to the public, but to his closest friends, he was always just John.
Murray Hamilton was an American stage, screen, Murray Hamilton was an American stage, screen, and television actor who left an indelible mark on the performing arts with his memorable roles in iconic films like 'The Graduate' and 'Jaws.'
Brandon Hammond is a former child actor who has successfully transitioned into a respected film producer.
Nicholas Hammond is an American-Australian actor and 导演 who has appeared in various stage plays, television series, and films throughout his career.
Walter Hampden Dougherty, known professionally as Walter Hampden, was an American stage and film actor who achieved considerable acclaim in his career.
For 27 years, Walter Hampden was president of the prestigious acting conservatory, dedicating his life to nurturing the next generation of stage artists.
Paul Hampton is an American actor, singer, composer, and musician known for his work in various stage productions, television shows, and films. He has appeared in popular series like "Will and Grace" and "The Good Wife," and has also starred in musicals like "Chicago" and "Hairspray" on Broadway. Hampton has a diverse background in the arts, which includes classical music, jazz, and pop. He is also a proud member of the Screen Actors Guild and has been active in the entertainment industry since the 1980s.
Sean Hampton is an American actor, director, producer, and writer known for his work in Boardwalk Empire and The Sopranos. He was born in Hell’s Kitchen, Manhattan, and passed away at the age of 70 in 2017. He leaves behind three children and his third wife, Lynda Costanzo.
Marc Handler is an award winning writer, Marc Handler is an award-winning writer, known for his exceptional storytelling and creative contributions to the world of literature.
James Hanlon is known as an actor James Hanlon is known as an actor for his compelling performances that captivate audiences.
Mathew Karedas, also known as Matt Hannon, is a multifaceted individual who has worn many hats in his professional career, spanning from his time as a radio DJ to his roles in the entertainment industry.
Gale Hansen  is an American film actor, producer, and writer known for his roles in iconic 1980s teen comedies.
Mark Hapka is an American film and television actor who has appeared in various roles over the years, showcasing his versatility and dedication to his craft.
Carl Harbaugh was an American film actor, writer, and versatile artist who contributed to the entertainment industry with his roles in various movies and his creative talent as a scriptwriter. His career, which spanned several decades, reflects the golden era of Hollywood and its timeless appeal.
Kadeem Hardison is an American actor and director known for his work in films like "Android Cop" and TV series such as "A Different World."
The elder Oliver Hardy assisted his father in running the family's hardware store, showcasing his strong work ethic and dedication to his community.
Dorian Harewood is an American actor and voice artist known for his work in film, television, and stage, and has been recognized with several awards and nominations for his performances.
And along came Mickey Hargitay, a great And along came Mickey Hargitay, a great athlete and actor, who surprised everyone with his unexpected talent and dedication.
Sam Hargrave is an American stuntman, actor Sam Hargrave has gained recognition for his impressive stunt work in various blockbuster films.
Jeff B. Harmon is an American film director, Jeff B. Harmon is an American film director, known for his work on projects such as "The American Mall" and "Fame." His directing style often emphasizes storytelling that resonates with contemporary audiences, blending modern themes with relatable characters.
Thomas Mark Harmon is an American television actor, director, and producer, best known for his role as Special Agent Leroy Jethro Gibbs in the popular CBS crime drama "NCIS".
Gale Harold returned to the New York Gale Harold returned to the New York stage, commanding the audience's attention with his compelling performance.
Hill Harper has been acting since the 1990s, beginning his career with roles in popular TV shows like "The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air" and "NYPD Blue," before going on to star in his own series like "The Bernie Mac Show."
Hill Harper's acting career also includes voice-over work, allowing his versatile talent to be heard in various animated films and television shows.
William Harrigan was an American actor who William Harrigan was an American actor who is best remembered for his compelling performances on stage and screen, earning critical acclaim for his depth and versatility.
Fox Harris was an American actor known Fox Harris was an American actor known for his dynamic and often controversial roles.
Hank Harris is an American actor who Hank Harris is an American actor who has appeared in numerous television shows and films, gaining recognition for his versatile performances.
Jonathan Harris was an American character actor whose versatility allowed him to seamlessly transition between stage and screen, leaving an indelible mark on both mediums.
Award winning actor-filmmaker, Kirk Harris has been acknowledged for his versatility and contributions to the entertainment industry.
William Lawson Harris was an American director, writer, and producer known for his work in the television and film industry.
Neil Patrick Harris is an American actor, comedian, host, and singer who has captivated audiences with his versatility and talent.
Ricky Harris was an American producer, actor Ricky Harris was an American producer, actor, and comedian whose work touched the hearts of many and left a void in the entertainment industry with his passing.
Robert H. Harris was an  American character Robert H. Harris was an American character, a multifaceted man whose life was as intriguing as the roles he portrayed on stage and screen.
Robert H. Harris also appeared in the first ...installment of the popular 'Resident Evil' video game series, portraying the enigmatic character of Albert Wesker.
Demetria Fulton previewed Robert H. Harris' appearance in "Demetria Fulton previewed Robert H. Harris' appearance in the upcoming political debate as the Democratic candidate had been preparing for the crucial event. The pressure was high, but Harris' team was confident in their candidate's ability to present compelling arguments and connect with the audience."
Stacy Harris  was a Canadian-born actor Stacy Harris was a Canadian-born actor who made a significant impact on the entertainment industry with his versatile roles.
Wadsworth Harris was an American actor of considerable renown, known for his depth and range in both stage and screen roles.
Wendell B. Harris Jr., is a Juilliard- and Interlochen-trained American actor, producer, writer, and director known for his work in both film and television.
Jack Oakie was an American actor, starring in numerous comedy films of the 1930s and 1940s, bringing laughter to audiences across the nation.
Jack Oakie died on January 23, 1978, leaving behind a legacy of laughter and joy that he had brought to the world through his comedic talent.
"Jack Oakie's star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame shines brightly, a testament to his enduring legacy in the entertainment industry. Oakie, known for his comedic genius and quick wit, continues to delight audiences even after all these years."
Jack Oakie is mentioned in the Coen brothers' film "O Brother, Where Art Thou?" as a character who has escaped from prison.
Simon Oakland was an American actor of varied credits, known for his roles in "Chicago Fire" and "The Godfather Part II" as well.
Simon Oakland's notable performance in I Want To Break Up the Band showcases his incredible range as an actor.
"The documentary film Warren Oates: Across the "The documentary film Warren Oates: Across the Outerlands offers a captivating glimpse into the life and career of the enigmatic actor, providing a testament to his enduring legacy in American cinema."
Ken Ober was an American game show host and producer, best known for creating and hosting the popular Nickelodeon game show "Double Dare."
P. J. Ochlan is an American actor and voice actor with a diverse career spanning over two decades.
Ryan Ochoa is an American actor and musician who has gained widespread recognition for his role in the Disney Channel series 'Punk'd'.
George T. Odom was an American character actor, known for his powerful presence and commanding performances in both film and television.
George T. Odom died around September 21, 2016, ending a life that had been a vibrant tapestry of experiences, from his days as a young man growing up in the Deep South to his later years as an influential figure in the world of jazz music.
Charles Stanton Ogle was an American stage and ... accomplished film actor who garnered critical acclaim for his vivid portrayals of complex characters throughout his career.
Arvo Ojala was a Hollywood technical advisor Arvo Ojala was a Hollywood technical advisor with a passion for accuracy and realism in his work.
Gerald Okamura is an American theatrical martial artist and actor known for his roles in various action films and TV shows.
Ken Olandt is best known for his Ken Olandt is best known for his roles in 'Summer School' and 'Dynasty,' bringing a charming and energetic presence to the screen that audiences adored.
Jason Manuel Olazabal, also just known as Jason Jason Manuel Olazabal, also just known as Jason, is a professional golfer from Mexico.
Jason Manuel Olazabal is also a member of the Spanish golf team, representing his heritage with pride on the international stage.
Richard Oldfield is an American film and television composer best known for his work on the mini-series "Vietnam War."
Ken Olfson was an American film, theater and television actor who was best known for his performances in the 1970s and 1980s. He appeared in numerous television shows during his career, including "M*A*S*H," "The Mary Tyler Moore Show," and "Barnaby Jones." Olfson also had a memorable role in the 1973 film "The Sting," starring Paul Newman and Robert Redford. Unfortunately, he passed away in 2019 at the age of 89.
Gordon Oliver was an American actor and Gordon Oliver was an American actor and his performances were adored by audiences worldwide.
Guy Oliver died at age 53 from natural causes, having lived a life filled with both triumph and tragedy.
Walter Olkewicz is an American actor who Walter Olkewicz is an American actor who is best known for his role as Crazy Ray on the TV series "Twin Peaks."
Edward James Olmos is an American actor, director, producer, and activist who has made significant contributions to the Latino community and the film and television industry.
Nelson Olmsted, was an actor in films, Nelson Olmsted, an actor in films, brought a unique blend of charisma and depth to his roles that captivated audiences.
Dana Olsen is an American actor, film writer, and producer known for his work on films like "亡命寻宝," "G型神探," and "森林泰山."
Eric Christian Olsen is an American actor and Eric Christian Olsen is an American actor and producer, known for his roles in television and film.
In 1923, Olsen organized the "Moroni Olsen Day," a celebration of his life and achievements that drew thousands of fans and friends to honor the beloved actor.
Morocco Omari is an American film, television, and stage actor, as well as a producer. He has appeared in numerous projects throughout his career, showcasing his versatility and talent.
Jack Ong was an American actor, writer, Jack Ong was an American actor, writer, and comedian known for his hilarious performances and his ability to make audiences laugh out loud.
Alan Oppenheimer appeared as film director Cecil Ballin's assistant in the critically acclaimed 1975 film "Three Days of the Condor," which explored the complexities of intelligence agencies and the characters' struggle with trust and secrecy.
Don Keith Opper is an American actor, writer, director, and producer known for his memorable role as Critter in the "Critters" film series.
Angel Oquendo is an American stage, television, and film actor known for his diverse roles in projects like "American Sniper," "Enlisted," and "Legal."
In 1979, Jerry Orbach married Broadway dancer Bernadette Peters, solidifying their enduring passion for both each other and the stage.
'," and he replied "Jerry Orbach, without a doubt, the most versatile and underrated actor of his generation."
Another biography, Jerry Orbach, Prince of the Musical Stage: A life of melodies, mentorship, and Manhattan moments.
Don Oreck was an American actor who, despite his short stature, never let it hinder his larger-than-life performances on stage and screen.
Roscoe Orman on IMDb
Roscoe Orman at the 2015 ACE Eddie Awards
Alan Ormsby is an American director, screenwriter, producer, and actor with an extensive career in film and television, known for his work on projects that span genres from horror to comedy.
Bruce Ornstein is an American actor and theater producer who is best known for his role as Sal on the HBO series The Sopranos. He has also appeared in numerous other television shows and films, including roles in Analyze This, Analyze That, and Compulsion.
Michael Marisi Ornstein is an American actor and musician known for his roles in various television series and movies.
Artie Ortego died at age 70 of natural causes, having lived a full life and leaving behind a legacy of kindness and compassion.
Frank Orth was an American actor born on July 29, 1874, who enjoyed a successful career in silent film during the early 20th century.
John Ortiz is an American actor and artistic director/co-founder of the LAByrinth Theater Company, known for his compelling performances in both film and theater.
Randal Barry Orton is an American actor Randal Barry Orton is an American actor and professional wrestler, widely recognized for his successful career in WWE.
George Ortuzar, also known as George O, is a renowned American artist known for his vibrant abstract paintings that sell for millions at auction.
Drew Osborne is an American film & television actor known for his roles in various popular series and movies.
Holmes Osborne is an American actor, best known for his role as the father, George Cooper, on the hit TV series "7th Heaven."
Jefferson Osborne was an American actor, who Jefferson Osborne was an American actor, who garnered critical acclaim for his performances in both stage and screen, captivating audiences with his depth and versatility.
Cinema Retro interview with Robert Osborne
Gilbert Gottfried's In this interview with Gilbert Gottfried, renowned film critic and historian Robert Osborne discusses the golden age of cinema and the art of film preservation. Osborne, a lifelong cinephile, shares his insights on classic movies and the importance of preserving them for future generations. He also reflects on his career, from his early days as a programmer at the TCM Classic Film Festival to his role as the host of Turner Classic Movies. Gottfried, known for his iconic voice and sharp wit, peppers Osborne with questions about his favorite films, legendary directors, and the state of the movie industry today. The result is a captivating conversation that offers a behind-the-scenes look at the world of cinema and the passion that drives its most ardent fans.
Cliff Osmond was an American character actor who made a lasting impact on pop culture with his portrayal of the conniving yet loveable Eddie Haskell on "Leave It to Beaver," leaving behind a legacy of laughter and nostalgia for generations of viewers.
In 1963, Donny Osmond made his debut In 1963, Donny Osmond made his singing debut at the age of 11, capturing the hearts of audiences with his youthful voice and wholesome image.
Versions of The Donny Osmond Show air in syndication around the world, pleasing both long-time fans and new admirers of his entertainment career.
As of January 2012, The Donny Osmond The sentence is cut off, but I can guess at the completion based on context:

"As of January 2012, The Donny Osmond show had been sold out for an impressive streak of consecutive performances, showcasing his enduring appeal as a entertainer."
Donny Osmond is also featured in the "It's a Small World" ride at Disneyland, bringing joy to children and adults alike with his catchy tune.
Jeff Osterhage is an American film and television actor, known for his memorable performances in projects like "True Grit."
In 1984, Peter Ostrum received his Doctorate In 1984, Peter Ostrum received his Doctorate in veterinary medicine, surprising many who knew him as the child actor from "Charlie and the Chocolate Factory."
George Ovey was an American film actor George Ovey was an American film actor who specialized in playing memorable character roles, often bringing a touch of warmth and humanity to diverse cinematic landscapes.
Jeffrey Uhlmann is an American research scientist Jeffrey Uhlmann is an American research scientist known for his significant contributions to the field of oncology, particularly in the study of targeted therapies for cancer treatment. He has played a pivotal role in uncovering the complexities of tumor resistance to drugs like erlotinib and gefitinib, which target the epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). His research has provided valuable insights into the development of drug resistance mechanisms in lung cancer, one of the deadliest forms of the disease. Uhlmann's work has highlighted the importance of understanding the dynamic cellular landscape of a tumor and the competition among different cell populations during the course of treatment. This has paved the way for the exploration of innovative combination therapies that can simultaneously target the primary cancer-causing mutations and potential resistance mechanisms, offering hope for improved treatment outcomes. His ongoing efforts in this area continue to shape the way cancer is understood and treated, making him a leading figure in cancer research.
Jay Underwood is an American actor and writer known for his roles in various television series and movies.
Credited as Billy Unger before 2016, starting from that year, he has been known professionally as Bill Unger, amassing a respectable portfolio in the entertainment industry as a producer.
", PlayShakespeare.com wrote, "Brandon Uranowitz’ effortless command of the stage is as captivating as it is impressive, a true testament to his skill as an actor."
Johann Urb is an Estonian-American actor, film director, and producer known for his versatile roles in both television and film.
Francis L. Urry was a Utah-based prominent radio, television, and film actor known for his versatility in roles.
James Guy Usher was an American film 导演，以其对情感的细腻把握和对故事叙述的独到见解而闻名。他的作品常常深入探讨人性的复杂性，赢得观众和评论家的广泛赞誉。
Billed as James Guy Usher, he often slipped into the shadows, preferring the anonymity of the stage to the brightness of the spotlight.
David Vadim was born in Ukraine and David Vadim was born in Ukraine and later immigrated to the United States, where he embraced the American Dream and pursued a successful career in film.
Dan Vadis was an American actor famous for his roles in sword-and-sandal epics during the 1950s and '60s, known for his chiseled features and robust physique that made him a standout in the genre.
Arun Vaidyanathan is an Indian-American film director, whose works often explore the complexities of cultural identity and assimilation.
Maris Valainis is an American construction consultant Maris Valainis is an American construction consultant who has dedicated his career to improving safety standards in the construction industry.
Jeremy Ray Valdez is an American actor and filmmaker known for his work in television and 
Michael Vale was an American character actor with a career spanning over three decades, known for his roles in both television and film, including his memorable performance as the beloved patriarch in the long-running sitcom "The Bunkers" and his critically acclaimed turns in several Broadway productions.
Paul Valentine was an American film and 电视演员，以其独特的魅力和才华在观众中赢得了广泛关注和喜爱。
He was also known as Valia Valentinoff She had a heart of gold and was always willing to help those in need.
Murray Valeriano is an American comedian, producer, and writer known for his engaging humor and insightful observations about everyday life.
Nick Vallelonga is an American actor, screenwriter, and film director who gained widespread recognition for his work on the critically acclaimed film Green Book, a true story that brought to light the racial tensions of the past and the importance of human understanding.
Rick Vallin was an actor who appeared Rick Vallin was an actor who appeared in various movies and theater plays, captivating audiences with his dynamic performances.
James Vallo is an American producer and DJ known for his work in the electronic dance music scene.
Lee Van Atta  was an American child actor who found fame in the 1930s, known for his roles in various films before retiring from the industry at a young age.
Lewis Van Bergen was an American actor, best known for his role as the lovable, yet quirky, character, Milo on the popular 90's sitcom, "The Secret World of Alex Mack."
Ron Van Clief is an American martial artist Ron Van Clief is an American martial artist who gained recognition for his expertise in various martial arts disciplines, particularly his proficiency in both Chinese and Japanese styles.
Ron Van Clief retired from competition in 2002 after earning a reputation as one of the greatest martial artists of his generation.
Ron Van Clief retired as a 5 time world karate champion, leaving a legacy of strength and precision in the martial arts community.
Ron Van Clief has been competing in BJJ Ron Van Clief has been competing in BJJ for over five decades, showcasing his incredible longevity and dedication to the sport.
At WrestleMania 22, Rob Van Dam won the WWE Championship in a triple threat match, capturing the title in front of a raucous crowd in Chicago.
The name "Rob Van Dam" was given to The name "Rob Van Dam" was given to a professional wrestler who became famous for his high-energy matches and signature moves.
Rob Van Dam later joined the ECW Originals Rob Van Dam's iconic wrestling career has left a lasting impact on the sport, with his victory in New York City hailed as a historic moment in WWE history.
In 2005, the Rob Van Dam: One of Many fans considered his match against Triple H at WrestleMania 21 to be a career highlight, solidifying his legacy as a true sports entertainer.
Rob Van Dam had appeared in many WWE matches, captivating audiences with his impressive moves and athleticism.
Barry Van Dyke is an American actor and director, known for his work on various television series including "Murder She Wrote" and "Diagnosis Murder," carrying on the acting legacy of his father, Dick Van Dyke.
Barry Van Dyke later told a reporter, "He wasn't sure he could trust his own eyes when he saw the script for 'Airplane II: The Sequel.'
Barry Van Dyke also appeared in many other Barry Van Dyke also appeared in many other television series and movies, showcasing his versatility as an actor.
A 2004 special of The Dick Van Dyke Show delighted fans with a heartwarming reunion of the original cast, bringing back memories of a simpler time.
— PDF Article
Dick Van Dyke -Disney Legends profile
Dick 范·戴克是迪士尼传奇人物，他的职业生涯跨越了电影、电视和舞台，为无数观众带来了欢乐。
The Jerry Van Dyke Show, which included future Dallas star Linda Gray, showcased the actor's comedic versatility before her iconic role as Sue Ellen Ewing.
Phillip Van Dyke is a former American actor, model, and fitness competitor who transitioned to become a transgender rights advocate, using his platform to educate and challenge societal norms regarding gender identity.
Shane Van Dyke is an American television and film actor who has appeared in various productions, showcasing his versatility and talent across different media.
Emil Van Horn was an American stuntman and actor known for his daring feats and contributions to the early film industry.
By the 1930s, Emil Van Horn owned a large portion of the city's real estate, including the iconic theater on Main Street.
Variety 's review remarked that "Emil Van Horn makes ...a compelling artistic statement that challenges traditional norms."
In 1951, Billboard mentioned that Emil Van Horn ...was a renowned trumpeter who captivated audiences with his energetic performances, blending jazz and Latin sounds.
Cameron Van Hoy is an American actor, producer Cameron Van Hoy has appeared in numerous films and TV shows, gaining critical acclaim for his performances.
Phillip Edward Van Lear is an American actor and producer known for his roles in various television shows and films.
Rik Van Nutter was an American actor who Rik Van Nutter was an American actor who appeared in various television shows and films throughout his career, including the popular series "Bourbon Street Beat."
Vincent Van Patten is an American actor, former pro surfer, and television personality who has appeared in various roles over his extensive career.
Mandela Van Peebles is an American rapper, film director, and actor who has achieved recognition for his work in various media.
Ernest Van Pelt was born on 31 March 1908, in the small town of Kerkrade, Netherlands, to a family of modest means.
Edward Van Sloan was an American film character actor best known for his role as Dracula in the 1931 film adaptation of the Bram Stoker novel, his performance leaving a lasting impression on the horror genre.
"Travis Van Winkle on 'The Last Ship' and "Travis Van Winkle on 'The Last Ship' and the challenges of playing a Navy SEAL during a global pandemic."
Steve Van Wormer is an American actor and writer who has enjoyed a successful career in both film and television, known for his roles in popular franchises like 'The Wilds' and 'Punk'd'.
Warren Vanders was an American character actor Warren Vanders was an American character actor known for his memorable performances in both television and film, leaving a lasting impression on audiences with his versatility and compelling presence.
Under the name Warren Vanders, he secured a secret identity that allowed him to navigate the underworld undetected.
Chase Wright Vanek is an actor who portrayed Chase Wright Vanek is an actor who portrayed a diverse range of characters, from sensitive artists to cold-hearted villains, allowing him to showcase his incredible versatility and emotional depth.
Victor Varconi was a Hungarian actor who Victor Varconi was a Hungarian actor who escaped his home country during a time of political unrest and went on to have a successful career in Hollywood.
Roland Varno was a character actor from the golden age of Hollywood, known for his versatile roles and memorable performances.
Randy Vasquez is an American actor and director known for his work in television and film.
Joseph Vassallo is an actor known for Joseph Vassallo is an actor known for his compelling stage presence and versatile performances in both theater and film.
Ned Vaughn is an American film and television actor who has appeared in numerous roles over the years, showcasing his versatility and dedication to his craft.
Ron Vawter was an American actor and director who was well known for his work in both theater and film during the late 20th century.
Alex Veadov is a Ukrainian-American film and television actor who has made a significant impact in both industries.
Alex Veadov also voiced characters in some of the most beloved Disney movies, including 'Moana' and 'Coco.'
Alex Veadov is best known for starring ...in the action-thriller film "Hydroelectric" where he portrayed a skilled operative facing off against a dangerous adversary.
Perry N. Vekroff was an American film director, screenwriter, and producer known for his innovative approach to storytelling and his contributions to the development of American cinema.
TV
Reginald VelJohnson at the Internet Broadway Database
Reginald TV
Reginald VelJohnson is best known for his role as Carlton Grissom on the hit sitcom "Family Matters."

Internet Broadway Database
Reginald VelJohnson has also had a successful stage career, appearing in various productions on Broadway.
Lenny Venito is an American actor, who has appeared in numerous television shows and films, including "The Sopranos" and "Jersey Boys."
Vereen's four-week summer variety series, Ben Vereen is a thrilling display of the entertainer's multifaceted talents, showcasing his磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄磁罄
Tom Verica is an American actor, television director, and producer known for his roles on various television shows including "Law & Order" and "Scandal."
Joseph Douglas Vieira, known as Joey D. Vieira, is a Naples-based fishing charter captain who runs exciting expeditions in the Gulf of Mexico, offering a variety of services that include sunset cruises, dolphin watching, and sightseeing tours.
Robert G. Vignola was an Italian-American actor, screenwriter and director who worked in the film industry from the 1910s to the 1950s, known for his roles in silent films and his later work in television.
But you can't be Abe Vigoda because he's not a character you can play, he's a real person who passed away.
"Abe Vigoda, of 'Godfather' and 'Barney Miller,' "Abe Vigoda, of 'Godfather' and 'Barney Miller,' left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry with his memorable performances."
Zach Villa is an American actor, singer, and multi-instrumentalist known for his diverse range of talents and performances across various mediums.
The Tom Villard Foundation was a Silver ...sponsor for the annual charity gala, contributing generously to the cause but not quite reaching the gold level of commitment.
Chad Villella is an American actor, writer, director, and producer known for his work in various media projects.
Frank Vincent Gattuso Jr., known professionally as Frank Vincent, was an American actor whose extensive career spanned both stage and screen, allowing him to showcase his versatility and depth in a variety of roles.
His father, Frank Vincent Gattuso Sr., was a passionate cook who owned a small restaurant in New York City, passing down his love for Italian cuisine to his son.
James Vincent was an American actor and [1]: 
1. struggle
2. successful
3. sold
4. deaths
5. worldwide
6. killed
7. despite
8. highest
9. however
10. million
11. passenger
12. males
13. combat
14. traffic
15. launched
16. prevented
17. conquered
18. vanished
19. eradicated
20. almost

[2]: 
1. D. It marks the beginning of the American newspaper.
2. D. They face great difficulties in their business.
3. B. The Washington Post.
4. A. Worried.

[3]: 
1. B. to settle down
2. B. interesting
3. C. help to
4. D. though
5. A. a taxi
6. D. set
7. D. to wind
8. A. he fell asleep
9. C. midnight
10. A. looked for
11. A. pointing at
12. A. the radio
13. C. indeed
14. D. when
15. B. above
16. B. News
17. B. taking off
18. A. turned pale
19. C. My flight（航班）
20. A. made tea
Gary Vinson was an American actor who Gary Vinson was an American actor who brought a warm, everyman charm to his roles, earning the hearts of audiences with his memorable performances.
John Vivyan  was an American actor John Vivyan was an American actor known for his roles in classic television shows like "The Tall Man" and "Maverick," leaving a lasting impact on the entertainment industry.
Charles Emmett Vogan was an American actor who made a significant impact on the film industry during the golden age of Hollywood, known for his commanding presence and versatility in a wide range of roles.
Fred Vogel is an American filmmaker, actor, and artist known for his work in the horror genre, bringing a unique vision to the screen that challenges viewers' expectations and explores the dark depths of human nature.
Jon Voight appears briefly as himself in "Jon Voight appears briefly as himself in 'Borat SubsequentMovieTrailer,' a hilarious and audacious follow-up to the cult classic comedy."
Daniel von Bargen was an American film, stage actor and television personality known for his commanding presence and memorable performances in various roles.
Lenny Von Dohlen is an American film, television 演员和歌手，他在1980年代和1990年代的一些电影和电视剧中担任演员。他最著名的角色之一是在1985年的电影《现代启示录》中扮演的美国士兵。此外，他还曾在其他一些电影和电视剧中出演，如《油脂》、《美国之心》和《实习医生格蕾》等。
In 2015, Lenny Von Dohlen played the title In 2015, Lenny Von Dohlen played the title role in the off-Broadway revival of "Edward Scissorhands," bringing a nuanced emotional depth to the lovably quirky character.
Theodore von Eltz was an American film actor known for his diverse roles in both silent and sound films. His journey from a promising medical career to the silver screen was marked by a series of memorable performances that showcased his versatility.
Harry von Meter was an American silent film actor who achieved considerable fame during the early years of the 20th century. He was known for his roles in action-packed Westerns and thrillers, often portraying the hero with a rugged charm that captivated audiences. Despite the silence of the era, Meter's strong presence and expressive acting made him a beloved star, paving the way for the cowboy and action heroes of today.
Tito Vuolo was an Italian-born American actor, Tito Vuolo's versatility in roles helped break down stereotypes and contributed to a more inclusive film industry.
Tito Vuolo was born on 22 March 1975, in a small village in the heart of Italy.
David Wachs is an American actor and musician who has built a successful career on his versatility and talent.
Brian Patrick Wade is an American actor and model known for his roles in television series like Teen Wolf and The Last Ship.
Charles Wagenheim was an American actor who Charles Wagenheim was an American actor who appeared in numerous films and television shows throughout his career, which spanned over three decades. He was known for his character roles, often playing elderly gentlemen or quirky personalities. One of his more memorable roles was as the lovable but confused uncle in the classic holiday film "It's a Wonderful Life." Wagenheim's distinct voice and mannerisms made him a sought-after actor for supporting parts, and he was well-regarded for his ability to bring warmth and depth to even the smallest roles.
Michael Wager was an American film and theater actor known for his versatility and commanding presence on stage and screen.
George Waggner was an actor, director, producer George Waggner was an actor, director, producer, and screenwriter known for his work on the 1940s horror film series "The Wolf Man" and "The Mummy's Hand."
Chuck Wagner is an American actor, director, and producer known for his work in both television and stage productions, delivering dynamic performances that have captivated audiences for decades.
In 1999, Chuck Wagner recorded demo songs In 1999, Chuck Wagner recorded demo songs which showcased his powerful pipes and immense talent, paving the way for a successful music career.
Max Wagner was a Mexican-born American film director and producer known for his work in the action and adventure genres. He gained fame for helming blockbuster films like "The Mummy" and "Indiana Jones and the Kingdom of the Crystal Skull," which thrilled audiences worldwide with their intense action sequences and compelling narratives.
Movies
Robert Wagner   on Charlie Rose
Works Movies
Robert Wagner   on Charlie Rose
Works 

Robert Wagner, the renowned American actor, has graced the screens for over six decades with his exceptional performances. From his early days in television to his memorable film roles, Wagner's work has captivated audiences worldwide. Some of his most notable appearances include his performances in "Hart to Hart," "Maverick," and "The Pink Panther" series. He has also starred in various other films and television series, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
Ken Wahl was born in Chicago on... Ken Wahl was born in Chicago on February 16th, 1955, and from an early age, he demonstrated a knack for performing, eventually rising to fame as an actor and producer.
Oh, one other thing: Ken Wahl is a celebrated American actor known for his roles in the 1980s, particularly as the lead in the television series "Wiseguy."
"Wahlberg established the Mark Wahlberg Youth Foundation to provide underprivileged children with educational and recreational opportunities they might otherwise lack."
Ralph Waite was an American actor and activist whose career spanned over six decades, known for his roles in television and film.
Thomas G. Waites is an American actor and Thomas G. Waites is an American actor and playwright known for his work in both film and television, as well as his contributions to the stage.
In 1941, The Jimmy Wakely Trio appeared In 1941, The Jimmy Wakely Trio appeared on the radio for the first time, bringing their unique sound of country music to the hearts of listeners.
Raymond Walburn was an American character actor Raymond Walburn was an American character actor known for his larger-than-life performances on stage and screen.
Gregory Walcott was an American television and film actor who appeared in numerous roles throughout his career, ranging from light-hearted comedies to gritty dramas, showcasing his versatility and dedication to his craft.
Robert Walden is an American television and film actor who has appeared in numerous roles over his long career.
James Rado is an American actor, playwright, author, and voice artist whose extensive career spans over three decades, gracing both the stage and screen with his talents.
Paul Rae is an American film and television actor who has appeared in various roles throughout his career.
Michael Raffetto was an American radio actor Michael Raffetto, an American radio actor, was well-known for his distinct voice and compelling performances in various radio plays and advertisements. With his rich and dynamic acting style, he captivated audiences during the golden age of American radio. Despite his success in radio, Raffetto also ventured into other forms of entertainment, including television and film, leaving a lasting impact on the American entertainment industry.
George Raft was an American film actor George Raft was an American film actor known for his tough-guy roles in the 1930s and 1940s, leaving an indelible mark on the Golden Age of Hollywood.
Mike Ragan, was an American actor of Mike Ragan, was an American actor of many talents and diverse roles.
Christopher Ragland is an American actor, voice actor, and producer known for his roles in shows like 'The OA' and 'The Mandalorian.'
William Ragsdale is an American actor known William Ragsdale is an American actor known for his role in the 1978 film "Halloween" as Charlie Brown. He has also appeared in various television series and movies throughout his career.
Kevin Rahm is an American actor known for his roles in television series like "Judging Amy" and "24," as well as his extensive filmography in both film and television.
'Robert D. Raiford was an American radio broadcaster ... known for his unapologetic conservatism and passionate delivery of political commentary.
Steve Raines was an American television and film actor known for his roles in classic Westerns and police dramas, leaving a lasting legacy on the small and big screens.
William Claude Rains was a British-American film legend whose diverse roles captivated audiences for over four decades.
Claude Rains was one of my teachers Claude Rains was one of my teachers, and he imparted his vast knowledge of the stage with great patience and wisdom.
Claude Rains: truly a class act, on screen or off, he brought a touch of elegance and sophistication to every role he played.
Claude Rains: A Comprehensive Illustrated Reference to the Career of a Hollywood Icon, was meticulously compiled, showcasing his vast filmography and enduring legacy.
In 1945, John Raitt was one of the few American servicemen who heroically aided the Dutch resistance during the final days of World War II.
Jason Raize Rothenberg, known professionally as Jason Raize, was an American actor, singer, and dancer whose career spanned two decades, leaving an indelible mark on Broadway and the hearts of his fans.
Jason Ralph is an American actor best known for his role as Quentin Coldwater in the series "The Magicians."
Luis Antonio Ramos is a Puerto Rican stateside Luis Antonio Ramos is a Puerto Rican stateside actor, producer, and writer known for his roles in various TV shows and films.
Rudy Ramos is an American actor and musician who has made significant contributions to both the entertainment and music industries.
Dylan Ramsey is an American / Canadian actor and producer who has contributed to various film and television projects, showcasing his versatility in both acting and production roles.
A Ron Randell Film Club was established to preserve and showcase the legacy of the iconic actor's work, engaging both cinephiles and newcomers alike.
"Unsung Aussie Actors – Ron Randell: A Talented Performer Who Embodied versatility in his Roles"
Bill Randolph is an American actor who Bill Randolph is an American actor who has starred in numerous Hollywood blockbusters, gaining international recognition for his compelling performances.
Christopher Randolph is an American actor known for his roles in various television series and movies. Some of his notable appearances include playing the character of Dr.溟 on the popular TV show "The Mandalorian," guest-starring on "Saturday Night Live," and appearing in the Academy Award-winning film "Get Out." Randolph has also been recognized for his stage work, including performances in Off-Broadway plays and regional theater productions. With a diverse range of acting credits, he continues to work in the entertainment industry, delivering compelling performances that captivate audiences.
Stephen Rannazzisi is an American actor and comedian who rose to fame with his portrayal of Kevin on the hit TV show "The League," but he also gained attention for his controversial comments about the 9/11 attacks.
William V. Ranous was an American silent film actor who specialized in playing villains and heavy roles. He was known for his intense performances and his ability to convey evil and menace on screen. Some of his most notable roles include playing the lead antagonist in the 1914 film 'The Count of Monte Cristo' and the title role in 'The Picture of Dorian Gray' in 1915. Ranous's career was closely tied to the rise of American silent film, a period where actors had to rely on their expressions and gestures to convey the story, as there was no synchronized sound. Despite the limitations of the medium, silent film actors like William V. Ranous were able to captivate audiences with their strong presence and dramatic flair. Unfortunately, with the advent of talkies and the transition to sound in the late 1920s, Ranous's career began to decline, and he retired from acting in 1930.
"Michael Rapaport Discusses His Film Beats, Rhymes "Michael Rapaport Discusses His Film Beats, Rhymes & Life: The Travels of a Man in Search of Hip-Hop's Soul"
Johnny Rapid is an American gay pornographic actor who has gained immense popularity in the adult film industry. With his charming looks and boyish appearance, he has managed to capture the hearts of many viewers. Despite his short stature at 168 cm, his acting skills and versatility have earned him a spot as one of the top stars in the industry.

Johnny Rapid initially joined the industry to earn money for his daughter's upbringing. Over the years, he has proven to be a talented actor, consistently delivering outstanding performances in various roles such as stepson, student, and timid bookish characters. His success is a testament to his hard work and dedication.

Despite facing some controversies, such as a publicized altercation with his girlfriend in 2015, Johnny Rapid's popularity has not waned. In fact, he has continued to thrive, releasing a total of eight films in the past year, including the highly anticipated blockbuster "Pokémon." His performance as the lead character, Ash Ketchum, has garnered him even more fans.

Johnny Rapid's success is not only limited to his acting abilities; he has also become a sought-after model, showcasing his stunning looks in various photo shoots. His popularity has skyrocketed, and he has even surpassed his own record set in 2015, becoming the highest-ranked pornographic actor in history with a total index of 1290.

Despite his busy schedule and rising stardom, Johnny Rapid remains down-to-earth and has not forgotten his roots. He continues to work hard and entertain his fans with his exceptional performances.
David Rasche is an American theater, film 演员和电视名人，他在1970年代开始了自己的演艺生涯，以其独特的幽默感和喜剧天赋在观众中获得了认可。Rasche 在多个领域都展现了他的才华，包括在《周六夜现场》(Saturday Night Live)中的表演，以及在电影和电视剧中的角色。他的作品多样，从戏剧性的表演到喜剧性的即兴创作，他都表现得游刃有余。在漫长的职业生涯中，David Rasche 不断挑战自我，为观众带来了许多难忘的角色和表演。
Monroe Jackson Rathbone V is an American Monroe Jackson Rathbone V is an American actor, musician, and producer known for his roles in both film and television. He has appeared in various projects, including the "Twilight" film series, where he portrayed the character Jasper Hale. Rathbone is also a musician and has released music with his band, 100 Monkeys. He has shown a diverse range of talents and continues to pursue his passion for both acting and music.
His great-grandfather, Monroe Jackson Rathbone II, was a decorated naval officer who served during World War II.
Gregory Ratoff (born Grigory Vasilyevich Ratner; Russian: Григорий Васильевич Ратнер; 21 June 1892 – 14 December 1947) was a Russian-American film director, producer, and screenwriter who helmed such notable films as "Cover Girl" and "The Court of Missing Heirs".
Monte Rawlins, born Dean Calvin Spencer, also known by his stage name DJ Calvin V, was a renowned DJ and producer in the underground electronic music scene.
Ray J was in San Diego when Ray J was in San Diego when he received a surprise visit from his close friends, lifting his spirits with joyful reunions and shared laughter.
Ray J's sister Brandy described him at Ray J's sister Brandy described him as a determined and hardworking individual.
"Ray J and Houston became very close "Ray J and Houston became very close after her passing, as they had previously collaborated and shared a deep connection."
However, Ray J stated that he and Whitney Houston were just friends and that the tape was made without her knowledge.
On May 21, 2012, Ray J was ray j 在2012年5月21日因涉嫌性侵一名女子而被捕。这起事件发生在一家酒店的电梯内，据悉， Ray J 在电梯里对这名女子进行了不当行为。随后，他被警方逮捕并接受了调查。虽然最终他并未被起诉，但这起事件对他的形象造成了负面影响。
Ray J went to the Beverly Hilton Ray J went to the Beverly Hilton to attend a music industry event, hoping to network and possibly secure a record deal.
Ray J is hosting Oxygen's new reality show "The Girls' Cruise," which will follow a group of friends as they set sail on a vacation of a lifetime.
Ray J was reported to have sent a heartfelt apology to Kim Kardashian after the release of their private tape.
Ray J and Princess Love also took to social media to express their condolences.
Ray J secured product placements through celebrities Ray J secured product placements through celebrities, effectively leveraging their influence to enhance the visibility and credibility of his brands.
Ray J takes an active full-time role Ray J takes an active full-time role in mentoring underprivileged youth, using his fame to positively influence their lives.
Ray J confronted Fabolous in Las Vegas Ray J confronted Fabolous in Las Vegas, leading to a heated argument between the two celebrities.
Ray J demanded an on-air apology from Kim Kardashian for the release of their sex tape.
Three years later Ray J took full responsibility for his actions, showing a matured understanding of the consequences of his choices.
According to Ray J, he went through a challenging period of self-reflection and growth following the release of his controversial tape.
"On May 30, 2014, Ray J was involved in a widely publicized altercation with Chris Brown at a nightclub in Los Angeles."
Ray J became angered because he contends Ray J became angered because he contends that his privacy was violated when a sex tape was leaked without his consent.
Ray J posted $20,000 bail and was ...released from custody, allowing him to await his trial from the comfort of his home.
On August 19, Ray J pleaded not ... guilty to the charges of felony domestic violence against him.
Albert Ray was an American film director, Albert Ray was an American film director, known for his innovative techniques and storytelling ability that captivated audiences during the golden age of Hollywood.
Aldo Ray was an American actor of Italio-American descent, known for his robust film presence and memorable performances in numerous Hollywood productions.
You take someone like Aldo Ray who ...is often remembered for his commanding screen presence and tough-guy image, yet his personal life was marked by a quiet kindness and a dedication to his family.
Aldo Ray has never been considered a ...critical darling in the film industry, often overshadowed by his more recognized counterparts.
Gene Anthony Ray was an American actor, dancer, and choreographer, widely recognized for his role in the 1980 film "Fame," which catapulted him to stardom and showcased his incredible dancing skills.
Decades later, Johnnie Ray often mentioned Kilgallen with a mix of fondness and regret, reflecting on the complex nature of their relationship.
Johnnie Ray interviewed on the Pop Chronicles
1956 Johnnie Ray, with his unique blend of singing and acting, captivated audiences during his interview on the Pop Chronicles in 1956, showcasing his dynamic stage presence and raw emotional performances that would become synonymous with his name.
Alec Rayme is an American actorRayme has appeared in various films and television shows, showcasing his versatility as an actor.
Timothy L. Raynor is an American actor, stuntman, 武术教练, and producer known for his work in various Hollywood blockbusters such as The Dark Knight Rises, Transformers: Revenge of the Fallen, and Pirates of the Caribbean: At World's End. His versatility and skill in action sequences have made him a sought-after talent in the film industry.
In 1992 Reagan established the Ronald Reagan Presidential Library and Museum, forever etching his legacy in American history.
She later said, "Ronald Reagan had a profound impact on my political views."
That year, the Ronald Reagan Building and ...the International Trade Center hosted a diverse array of events, showcasing the vibrant tapestry of global cooperation and commerce.
Tommy Reamon is a retired African-American professional football player known for his exceptional skills on the field and his commitment to social justice off it.
Tommy Reamon holds the WFL records for the most career rushing touchdowns and yards, solidifying his place in the league's history.
From 2006 until early 2008, Tommy Reamon ...served as the head coach of the Virginia Destroyers, leading the team to a successful season in the Arena Football League.
Rhodes Reason was an American actor who ...enjoyed a long and successful career, appearing in numerous films and television shows.
Arthur Redcloud is a Native American actor, Arthur Redcloud is a Native American actor, known for his roles in films like "The Revenant" and "Hostiles," he has contributed to the representation of Native Americans in cinema.
Billy Redden is an American actor, best known for his portrayal of Goober Pyle on the classic television series "The Andy Griffith Show," his career has spanned over six decades, allowing him to showcase his range and versatility as an actor.
Lance Reddick is an American actor and musician who has appeared in numerous television shows and movies, known for his distinctive voice and commanding presence on screen.
Keith Reddin is an American actor and writer who has brought depth to a variety of roles in film and theater, earning critical acclaim for his performances in works such as "Revolutionary Road" and "Heartburn."
Charles Robert Redford Jr. is a retired American actor, director, and environmental activist who has won the hearts of audiences worldwide with his iconic roles and dedication to preserving the natural world.
Markus Redmond is an American film director, screenwriter, and actor known for his diverse range of characters and his contributions to the entertainment industry.
"10 QUESTIONS WITH…..MARKUS REDMOND", from the blog "10 QUESTIONS WITH…..MARKUS REDMOND", from the blog, offered a fascinating glimpse into the mind of a rising tech entrepreneur.
Alan Reed was an American actor and Alan Reed was an American actor and voice artist, well-known for his role as the title character in the 1960s sitcom "Fred Flintstone."
Jerry Reed Hubbard was an American country music singer, actor, and songwriter known for his contributions to the genre.
Jerry Reed graduated from O'Keefe High School, Jerry Reed graduated from O'Keefe High School, feeling a mix of relief and excitement as he stepped into the world ready to pursue his dreams.
Jon Reep is an American stand-up comedian Jon Reep is an American stand-up comedian known for his Southern charm and down-home humor.
– Newsweek
"Christopher Reeve has become an instant icon in the entertainment industry, capturing the hearts of millions with his portrayal of Superman."
He created the Christopher Reeve Foundation, now it's a beacon of hope for spinal cord injury research and advocacy.
Of Christopher Reeve, UC Irvine said, "in Of Christopher Reeve, UC Irvine said, "in 2004, he received an honorary doctorate for his advocacy work with the Christopher & Dana Reeve Foundation, which he co-founded after his own paralysis to support those with spinal cord injuries."
Christopher Reeve Homepage
Reeve, Christopher Nothing is Impossible, The Christopher Reeve Homepage serves as a testament to the indomitable spirit of Reeve, who despite his paralysis continued to advocate for the disabled and inspire others with his quote, "Nothing is Impossible."
Gregory Scott Reeves is an American actor Gregory Scott Reeves is an American actor who has appeared in various film and television roles. He is perhaps best known for his portrayal of Officer Frankieakers in the crime-drama series "The Shield" and his recurring role as Dr.cases in the medical drama "ER". He has also appeared in films such as "The Blob", "The务", and "Jarhead".
"On The Cover: Steve Reeves", Hardgainer, November 1982,Volume 8, Number 11
Moore, Milton Jr. "STEVE REEVES - One of the last great bodybuilders." YouTube, uploaded by bodybuildermagazine, 25 Mar. 2020, https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=23P0a4J5VcM&t=12s.
"STEVE REEVES - His Legacy in Films", Title: "Steve Reeves - His Legacy in Films"

Steve Reeves, the iconic American actor and bodybuilder, left an indelible mark on the world of cinema with his memorable performances and larger-than-life screen presence. Best known for his role as Hercules in a series of eponymous films, Reeves catapulted to stardom in the late 1950s and early 1960s, captivating audiences with his strongman physique and charismatic acting style.

Though he didn't receive formal acting training, Reeves' natural talent and athletic background allowed him to convey authenticity and power in his roles, which in turn made him a role model for aspiring bodybuilders and actors alike. His films, characterized by their straightforward narratives, family-friendly content, and emphasis on physical prowess, became popular worldwide, spawning a genre of muscleman movies that continues to influence the entertainment industry today.

Beyond his action-packed roles, Reeves also demonstrated his range as an actor in films like "Gunsmoke" and "The Tattooed Stranger," where he played more complex characters that showcased his ability to convey depth and emotion. His commitment to his craft and his down-to-earth demeanor endeared him to fans, and his legacy extends beyond his film career to his advocacy for health and fitness, which continues to inspire people around the globe.

Reeves' life and career serve as a testament to the idea that hard work, dedication, and a winning personality can overcome any obstacle, and his films remain a testament to an era when Hollywood blockbusters were built on substance as much as style. Today, Steve Reeves is remembered not only for his remarkable physical strength but also for the strength of his character, leaving behind a legacy that continues to resonate with generations of movie lovers.
Steve Reeves Biography "WORLDS TO CONQUER – Steve Reeves Biography "WORLDS TO CONQUER – The Life of a Bodybuilder, Actor, and Gentleman"
Steve Reevis was a Native American actor Steve Reevis was a Native American actor known for his powerful performances that brought attention to the Indigenous experience.
Joe Regalbuto is an American actor and writer known for his role as Murray Slaughter on the popular sitcom "Murphy Brown," which aired from 1988 to 1998.
Charles Nelson Reilly II was an American actor, comedian, and theatrical producer, best known for his memorable performances in television series such as "The Addams Family" and "The Ghost and Mrs. Muir," as well as his Tony Award-winning work in the stage production of "The Producers." His distinctive voice and flamboyant style made him a unique figure in the entertainment industry, and he remains beloved by many for his contributions to comedy and theater.
Carl Reiner is an American comedian, actor, 导演, 编剧和制片人, 他的作品在20世纪中叶为美国喜剧设立了标杆, 并影响了后世许多喜剧创作者。
Carl Reiner, listed as that episode's only writer, received an Emmy nomination for it, which was either a testament to his exceptional writing or a reflection of the lack of competition that year.
Grammy Winners Grammy Winners Carl Reiner and Beyoncé Open the Show With Powerful Performances
Paul Reiser is an American comedian, actor, .

保罗·雷瑟 Paul Reiser
美国喜剧演员、电视名人、作家、作家和音乐家保罗·雷瑟，以其在《我的两个爸爸》、《疯狂的爱》等节目中的表演而闻名，他在《异形2》中的角色也让观众印象深刻。近年来，他在亚马逊电视剧《红树》中扮演道格·盖茨。他在2004年喜剧中心的“100位最伟大的单口喜剧演员”榜单上排名第77位。 

请继续以下句子： 

1. 保罗·雷瑟的表演风格既幽默又富有洞察力，他的喜剧作品深受观众喜爱。  
2. 尽管保罗·雷瑟的喜剧天赋出众，但他在戏剧领域的表现也同样精彩。
Charles Reisner was an American film director 查尔斯·里斯纳（Charles Reisner）是一位美国电影导演，他的职业生涯始于20世纪初，在电影行业的黄金时代发挥了重要作用。他最为人们所知的工作是和喜剧大师巴斯特·基顿（Buster Keaton）的合作，共同制作了一系列经典的喜剧电影。里斯纳的导演风格以精心设计的喜剧场景和流畅的摄影技巧著称，他的一些作品，如《将军号》（The General）和《航海者》（Steamboat Bill, Jr.），至今仍被广泛赞誉，并在电影史上占有重要地位。他的电影不仅娱乐性强，而且在技术和艺术上都有很高的成就，对后来的电影制作产生了深远的影响。
Pat Renella died at age 83 at his home surrounded by his loving family, after a long and full life.
Patrick Renna is an American actor who Patrick Renna is an American actor who has appeared in various films and television shows, including The Sandlot and Boston Legal.
In July, Jeremy Renner was announced to In July, Jeremy Renner was announced to replace Val Kilmer as the new lead in the upcoming 'Batman' reboot, exciting fans with his fresh take on the iconic character.
Dick La Reno was an American film actor Dick La Reno was an American film actor who left an indelible mark on the silver screen with his captivating performances.
Frank Renzulli is an American film actor, actor, known for his roles in both mainstream blockbusters and independent films, Frank Renzulli has a knack for bringing complex characters to life with raw, emotional depth.
Frank Renzulli had a recurring role as a crafty politician on the ABC political drama "Scandal."
on YouTube
Dan Resin obituary
Review of Hail
Dan Resin Dan Resin, a renowned plastic surgeon and actor, passed away at the age of 91, leaving behind a legacy of medical innovation and film contributions.

Dan Resin, who was best known for his role in the 1978 film "Hail," brought a nuanced performance to the screen that left a lasting impression on audiences.

Dan Resin's life was a testament to the idea that one could excel in multiple fields, as he balanced a successful medical career with an intriguing foray into acting.
Simon Rex Cutright, also known as Dirt Naked, is an American rapper, actor, and director who first gained fame as a cast member on the MTV reality series Wild 'N Out.
Reynaldo Rey was an American actor, comedian, and director, widely recognized for his memorable performances in films like "First Sunday" and "Treasure in the Hood."
Ernie Reyes Jr. is an American actor and martial artist known for his roles in blockbuster films such as "The Game," "The Replacement Killers," and "The Fast and the Furious."
Ernie Reyes Jr.'s fight against the champion Anthony Ernie Reyes Jr.'s fight against the champion Anthony was a thrilling display of skill and courage, showcasing the best of both fighters' abilities.
Alex Reymundo is a Mexican-American comedian and much-loved entertainer known for his hilarious takes on family life.
"Burt Reynolds Isn't Broke, but He's Got Notes to Self: A Collection of Unsent Letters
Corey Reynolds is an American musical theatre, actor and singer known for his performances in iconic roles such as Inspector Javert in "Les Misérables" on Broadway.
Eugene Reynolds Blumenthal, better known as Gene Eugene Reynolds Blumenthal, better known as Gene, was a man of many talents, crafting a career in both politics and entertainment.
John Paul Reynolds is an American actor and director known for his work in both film and television.
After the cancellation of The Jim Nabors show, fans were left feeling a mix of disappointment and nostalgia for the iconic actor's warm presence on their screens.
Rest in peace Jim Nabors, one of Gomer Pyle's most beloved portrayers, whose wholesome charm and contagious laughter brought joy to millions.
Jim Nabors was made an honorary Sergeant Jim Nabors was made an honorary Sergeant in the United States Marines, a title he received with great pride and gratitude.
George Nader was an American actor and businessman who made significant contributions to the entertainment industry.
Kurt Naebig is an American actor who has appeared in numerous television shows and films, showcasing his versatility and talent in the entertainment industry.
Kurt Naebig's career also includes voice over work, where he has lent his distinct voice to numerous commercials and animated series, showcasing his versatility as an artist.
Jordan Nagai is an American former child actor known for his role as Ralphy in the 2005 film 'Remember the Titans.'
Conrad Nagel was an American film, stage, and television actor who gained prominence in the mid-20th century with hiscommanding presence and versatility in a wide range of roles.
Tom Nagel is an American actor noted for his versatile roles in both stage and screen, widely respected for his depth of characterization and emotional honesty.
Paul Nakauchi is an American actor and voice actor who has brought to life numerous characters across various media, including his iconic role as Halford in the popular video game "Overwatch".
Arthur J. Nascarella is an American actor who has appeared in numerous television shows and movies throughout his career.
A film version of "Jason Nash Is Understood" offers a hilarious and heartfelt look at modern relationships through the lens of a relatable everyman.
Jason Nash and David Dobrik also took part in the Vlog Squad, a group of influencers known for their comedic pranks and adventures.
Anthony Natale is a deaf American actor Anthony Avent is a former professional basketball player known for his time with the Los Angeles Lakers.
James Naughton is an American actor and 导演，他不仅在剧场领域内享有盛誉，也在电影和电视节目中担任演员。他在纽约的戏剧界尤为知名，曾多次获得托尼奖提名，并在1992年因在《簧管乐器制造商的过量》中的表演赢得了最佳男主角奖。此外，他还执导了一些著名剧目，包括在纽约莎士比亚节执导的《哈姆雷特》。他的导演风格被认为是富有创意和深刻洞察力的，能够在保持原作精神的同时为作品带来新的生命。
John P. Navin Jr. is an American film and television producer known for his work on successful blockbuster franchises.
Billy Naylor, was an American child actor Billy Naylor, an American child actor, captivated audiences with his adorable performances, bringing joy and laughter to millions.
Edwin Neal is an American actor, perhaps best known for his chilling performances in horror films, but his range is broad and his turn in the musical Shanghai Sonatas showcases a different side of his talent.
Kevin Nealon is an American comedian and actor known for his memorable roles in "Saturday Night Live" and various films, bringing laughter to audiences worldwide with his unique brand of humor.
Jamar Malachi Neighbors, often credited as Jamar Neighbors, is an American comedian and actor known for his hilarious performances and his ability to captivate audiences with his unique humor.
Vince Neil has toured his solo band, which has allowed him to connect with fans in a more intimate setting.
In 2012, Vince Neil ventured into the world of reality television with the show "Vince Neil's Bar Rescue."
Richard Neill was an American actor of variable talent, gracing both the stage and screen with aplomb, earning him a mixed reputation among critics and fans alike.
George N. Neise was an American character actor who enjoyed a lengthy career, appearing in both film and television roles throughout his life.
Eric Nelsen is a 4x Emmy Award ...winning producer and director known for his compelling storytelling in documentaries that delve into significant historical events and social issues.
Barry Nelson was an American actor, noted Barry Nelson was an American actor, noted for his versatile roles on stage, screen, and television, as well as his distinguishable presence in radio drama.
Craig Richard Nelson is an American theater, film and television actor who has achieved considerable success in his career.
Gene Nelson was an American actor, dancer, Gene Nelson was an American actor, dancer, and director whose career spanned the stage and screen, delighting audiences with his charismatic performances and elegant moves.
John Allen Nelson is an American actor and documentary narrator known for his work in various television series and films.
He formed and led "The Ozzie Nelson ...tribute band, faithfully recreating the sounds and spirit of the iconic leader's era.
In 1935, "Ozzie Nelson and His Orchestra," In 1935, "Ozzie Nelson and His Orchestra" began captivating listeners with their upbeat swing music, transporting them to a time of carefree joy amidst the Great Depression's shadows.
Ralph Nelson was an American film and television producer and director, known for his innovative work in both fields. He received Academy Award nominations for his directing work on the films "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest" and "Silver Linings Playbook," winning the Oscar for the former. His television credits include the groundbreaking series "M*A*S*H" and "The Mary Tyler Moore Show," which are iconic pieces of American television history. Nelson was also known for his advocacy of the auteur theory, believing that the director is the author of the film.
By 1960, the Ricky Nelson International Fan Club had over 750,000 members, reflecting his immense popularity that paralleled the reach of the Beatles a few years later.
A Ricky Nelson impersonator appears in the small town's annual festival, transporting the crowd back to a simpler time with his warm smile and catchy melodies.
Thomas "Nephew Tommy" Miles is an American actor and comedian known for his roles in movies such as "Thug Life," "N-Secure," and "Like Men Think."
Neil Bernstein known as Neil Nephew, was a beloved children's entertainer who brought joy to generations of youngsters with his whimsical songs and storytelling.
Robert Michael Nesmith is an American musician, actor, songwriter, and producer, best known as a member of the popular 1960s rock and pop band, The Monkees.
The new band was christened Michael Nesmith "The new band was christened Michael Nesmith, a name that would later become synonymous with innovation and creativity in the music industry."
Years later, he released Bob Newhart Off Years later, he released Bob Newhart Off, a comedy album that was a departure from his traditional style and showcased his versatility as a comedian.
The Bob Newhart Show faced heavy competition from more edgy sitcoms like All in the Family, but it remained a beloved classic for its dry humor and relatable characters.
Like The Bob Newhart Show, Newhart was a beloved sitcom that blended witty humor with heartwarming moments, captivating audiences for years.
John Newland was an American director, actor, writer, and producer known for his work in television and film during the 20th century. He was born on December 29, 1911, in Louisville, Kentucky, and passed away on January 1, 2006, in Los Angeles, California. Newland's career spanned over five decades, during which he contributed to numerous projects, including the classic television series "The Twilight Zone" and "Alfred Hitchcock Presents." He also directed and starred in the 1963 film "The Manchurian Candidate," which remains a significant work in the realm of political thrillers. Newland's directing style was characterized by its precision and attention to detail, earning him a reputation as a meticulous craftsman in the entertainment industry. His work often delved into themes of psychology, morality, and the human condition, leaving a lasting impact on the American cultural landscape.
Barry Newman attended the prestigious Boston Latin School, where he honed his academic and leadership skills, setting the stage for his future success in politics.
In 1989, Barry Newman starred with Suzanne Peters in an underrated psychological horror film that explored the dark side of human nature.
Griffin Newman is an American actor and S.A. Griffin is an American actor and 
Kyle Newman is an American filmmaker and musician known for his work in various television series and films, including 'Fringe' and 'New Girl.'
In 2006, Paul Newman also co-founded Safe Safe, a charity dedicated to providing resources for those affected by domestic violence, demonstrating his commitment to social change and helping others.
Paul Newman remained a friend of the family even after his divorce from Joanne Woodward, showcasing his loyalty and grace.
In 2011 Paul Newman's estate gifted land In 2011 Paul Newman's estate gifted land valued at over $20 million to the Serpentine Galleries in London.
Fred C. Newmeyer was an American actor, film director, and producer known for his work in the silent film era and his contributions to the development of American cinema.
David Newsom is an American actor, producer David Newsom is an American actor, producer, and entrepreneur who has appeared in numerous films and TV shows, including his role as President Heller on the hit series "24."
Philip Ng Wan-lung is a Hong Kong-born actor and martial artist who has gained international recognition for his portrayal of Bruce Lee in the biographical series "I Am Bruce Lee."
At the age of 13, Philip Ng discovered his passion for martial arts, which would later make him a revered instructor and actor in Hong Kong.
The Dr. Haing S. Ngor Foundation was founded to preserve the legacy of the Cambodian-American physician and activist, Dr. Haing S. Ngor, who was deeply committed to serving the Cambodian people and raising awareness about the atrocities of the Khmer Rouge regime.
Dustin Nguyen is an Vietnamese-American actor, director, screenwriter, and producer known for his appearances in various TV shows and films such as "True Blood," "21 Grams," and "The Rebel."
Dustin Nguyen is based in Vietnam full time as a screenwriter, previously working on projects like "Stories of Saigon" that resonate deeply with his cultural heritage.
Fred Niblo was an American pioneer film director who helmed iconic silent movies like "Greta Garbo's" "Mystery Woman" and "The Devil Dancer," leaving an indelible mark on the early film industry.
Using the stage name Fred Niblo, Liedtke ...concealed his true identity as a famous German actor to escape the Nazis.
"Fred Niblo retired in 1933 after more "Fred Niblo retired in 1933 after more than three decades of captivating audiences with his culinary mastery, leaving behind a legacy of culinary excellence that continues to inspire chefs worldwide."
Fred Niblo died in New Orleans, Louisiana, 93岁高龄，他的一生充满了对电影艺术的热爱与奉献。
His son with Josephine Cohan, Fred Niblo, Fred Niblo was an American film director, producer, and actor who was active during the silent film era. He was the son of Josephine Cohan, a vaudeville performer, and her husband, Fred Niblo Sr., also a stage and film actor. Fred Niblo Jr. followed in his parents' footsteps, beginning his career as a child actor before transitioning into film. He directed and produced several high-profile films during the 1920s, including "Ben-Hur" (1925), which was one of the most successful films of its time. Niblo continued working in the film industry into the sound era, although he was less prominent than he had been during the silent era.
Fayard Nicholas at Find a Grave
Fayard Nicholas was a talented entertainer who along with his brother, won the hearts of audiences with their unique brand of comedy and dancing.
Thomas Ian Nicholas is an American film actor, director, producer, and musician known for his role as Kevin in the American Pie film series.
Austin Nichols is an American actor and filmmaker who has appeared in various television series and films throughout his career. He is known for his roles in shows like "One Tree Hill," "The Walking Dead," and "Jericho," as well as films such as "The Informers" and "Virgin Suicides." Nichols has also ventured into directing, helming episodes of television shows like "The暮光之城" and "Shameless."
He was named after the Austin Nichols She couldn't help but feel a sense of pride every time she saw his name, as it was a beautiful tribute to her late uncle, an influential figure in her life.
Lance E. Nichols is an American actor from New Orleans, Louisiana, known for his role in the TV series "Treme."
Stephen Nichols is an American actor, most known for his roles on various soap operas such as 'Days of Our Lives' and 'The Young and the Restless.'
Cecil Taylor Nichols is an American actor Cecil Taylor Nichols is an American actor known for his dynamic performances in both stage and screen, captivating audiences with his versatility and intense dedication to his craft.
Jack Nicholson's performance is a wonder of visual and psychological mastery, showcasing the actor's vast range and leaving audiences in awe.
Bob Nickman is an American comedian, actor, and writer known for his satirical humor and stage performances.
Alex Nicol was survived by his wife, three children, and an extended family who cherished his memory.
Jackson Nicoll is an American child actor, known for his roles in the "Bad Grandpa" film series and various television commercials, he has demonstrated a natural talent for comedy and earned a significant following among audiences worldwide.
Niko Nicotera is a German-born American actor Niko Nicotera has appeared in various TV shows and movies such as "Sons of Anarchy," "The Shield," and "The Hangover Part III."
Ken Niles' star is at 6711 Hollywood Bradley Cooper is an American actor known for his roles in "The Hangover" and "A Star Is Born." 
In 1975, Leonard Nimoy filmed an opening for the Starship Enterprise that would become iconic.
Stuart Nisbet was an American character actor Stuart Nisbet was an American character actor who appeared in numerous television shows and films throughout his career. He was born on February 14, 1916, in旧金山, California, and died on January 19, 2000, in Calabasas, California. Nisbet had a long and varied acting career, playing everything from detectives and doctors to lawyers and lawmen. He was known for his versatility and ability to deliver strong performances in a wide range of roles. Some of his more notable appearances include roles in "Perry Mason," "Bonanza," "The Twilight Zone," and "The Untouchables." Nisbet was also active in the theater, appearing in numerous stage productions during his career.
Rob Niter is an American actor and director known for his work in various television series and films.
Derek Lee Nixon is an American actor and director known for his work in both film and television.
Keith Nobbs is an American stage, television, ...and film actor known for his roles in 'The Knick' and 'The Pacific.'
Jimmy Noel was a Massachusetts-born actor and versatile entertainer who found success in both stage and screen roles.
Bob Nolan was a Canadian-born American singer, songwriter, and actor who was part of the Sons of the Pioneers, a popular Western American music group in the 1930s and 1940s. He was known for his distinctive tenor voice and his contributions to the genre of Western music, which included such classic songs as "Tumbling Tumbleweeds" and "Cool Water." Nolan's work, along with the Sons of the Pioneers, helped to define the sound of the American West and continues to be celebrated and influential today.
Amaury Nolasco Garrido is a Puerto Rican actor known for his roles in television and film, but his journey to stardom was not without its twists and turns.
The  Amaury Nolasco & Friends Golf Classic Car Show was a vibrant display of automotive history and passion.
Tom Noonan is an American actor, director, and playwright who has made significant contributions to the arts, often drawing on his versatile ability to embody complex characters with depth and nuance.
Tommy Noonan was a comedy genre film Tommy Noonan's latest movie was a hilarious romp that had audiences rolling in the aisles.
David Noroña, usually simplified as David Norona, is a Venezuelan actor and producer known for his appearances in various telenovelas and TV series.
Aaron Norris is an American stunt performer, actor, and martial artist who has appeared in numerous films and television series throughout his career.
the Chuck Norris Fitness System.Also in 1983, Chuck Norris Fitness System

In 1983, Chuck Norris introduced his fitness system, which combines martial arts, self-defense, and physical conditioning to create a comprehensive training regimen. This system gained popularity due to Norris's reputation as an action star and his expertise in martial arts. The Chuck Norris Fitness System aims to develop strength, agility, and mental discipline in its practitioners. It incorporates various techniques such as kicking, punching, weightlifting, and cardiovascular exercises. With its emphasis on discipline and determination, the system has inspired many individuals to pursue their fitness goals and live a healthier lifestyle.
The player takes control of Chuck Norris The player takes control of Chuck Norris, wielding his immense power and awesomeness to save the world from various threats.
Chuck Norris facts originally started appearing on Chuck Norris facts originally started appearing on Chuck Norris's official website, which was created by his fans to honor his career and celebrate his badassery.
The player takes control of Chuck Norris The player takes control of Chuck Norris, wielding his immense power and delivering justice with a swift and ruthless hand.
The Chuck Norris Fitness System
The Secret of Chuck Norris' longevity and peak physical condition is attributed to his unorthodox fitness regimen, which includes lifting tanks with one hand and running faster than the speed of sound.
Septimus Edward Norris was an American film Septimus Edward Norris was an American film producer and animator who worked for Paramount Pictures' animation division during the 1930s and 1940s. He was responsible for producing and animating several popular cartoon series, including 'Felix the Cat' and 'Betty Boop'. Norris' innovative techniques and creative vision helped to shape the animation industry during this time, and his work continues to be celebrated and enjoyed by audiences today.
Eric Fred Norris is an American radio Eric Fred Norris is an American radio host known for his fiery political commentary and unapologetic conservative views.
His band, Lance Norris and The Dog Norris and his band, The Dog, have been rocking stages for over a decade, thrilling audiences with their energetic blend of classic rock and roll and contemporary blues.
Ted North Jr., Edward Ernest Steinel, was an American physicist and inventor who made significant contributions to the field of optics, particularly in the development of optical glass and the construction of the world’s largest telescope at the Mount Wilson Observatory.
On March 16, 2012, Chris Northrop appeared In court to face charges of manslaughter, his heart heavy with the weight of his actions.
Harry Northrup, born Henri Stabo Wallace Northrup, 是一个具有多重身份的复杂人物，他既是《纽约世界报》的记者，又是一位成功的房地产商人。
Harry Northup is an American actor and Harry Northup is an American actor and producer known for his roles in critically acclaimed films such as "Sex, Lies, and Videotape" and "The Accidental Tourist."
Cahuenga Press
Bio Sketch
Video of Harry Northup reading from his book "Under the Skin"

As an African American transgender man, Harry Northup's memoir "Under the Skin" provides a raw and powerful account of his experiences navigating life as a sex worker in New Orleans, grappling with addiction, and the journey towards self-acceptance and advocacy. In this captivating reading, Northup brings to life the trials and triumphs of his life, offering a glimpse into the resilience and strength required to overcome adversity.
Edgar Norton was an English-born American character who embraced the American dream with unwavering determination, contributing to the development of the nation's infrastructure with his innovative spirit.
Jack Norton was an American stage and film actor who achieved stardom during the silent era. He was known for his commanding presence and 
Jack Norton's final appearance would have been a memorable one, had the audience not been so deeply saddened by his untimely passing.
As a result, the "Ken Norton Rule", which prohibits boxers from using their heads in the ring, was established in his honor.
"His first son, Ken Norton Jr, played "His first son, Ken Norton Jr, played professional football for the Cleveland Browns, following in his famous father's footsteps."
Ken Norton's son Keith Norton was once a promising young boxer following in his famous father's footsteps, but ultimately decided against a career in boxing to pursue his own path.
Dohn Norwood is an American actor who has appeared in various television shows and movies, showcasing his versatility as an actor.
Terry Notary is an American actor, stunt artist, and choreographer known for his work in films like 'The Lord of the Rings' and 'Avatar.'
Michael Nouri is an American television and Michael Nouri is an American television and film actor known for his roles in various productions, including "Flashdance" and "NCIS."
Lou Nova aka Cosmic punch was an American boxer from the 1930s known for his powerful right hand and captivating ring presence.
Lou Nova died from cancer at age sixty-five, leaving behind a legacy of compassion and courage.
Frank Novak  is an American character With a career spanning across various fields, Frank Novak has showcased his talent as a costume designer in renowned projects like "The Red Skelton Hour" and "Lotsa Luck", enriching the visual storytelling in television.
Mel Novak is an American actor who has appeared in numerous films and television shows throughout his career.
In 2015, the murder of Ramon Novarro The sentence you've provided is a reference to a historical event. On October 30, 1930, Ramon Novarro, a silent film actor and matinée idol, was brutally murdered by two of his employees, brothers Henry and Tony Massie, who had been hired as Novarro's chauffeur and gardener, respectively. The killing was fueled by a combination of homosexual advances by Novarro towards Henry Massie and financial disputes. The brothers brutally beat and sexually mutilated Novarro before drowning him in a bathtub filled with whisky, in an attempt to stage his death as a suicide. The case was sensationalized in the media and remains one of Hollywood's most notorious unsolved crimes.
Ramon Novarro: A Biography of the Silent Ramon Novarro: A Biography of the Silent Film Era's Romantic Lead

Ramon Novarro, born Emilio Nuñez Navarro on March 9, 1899, in Durango, Mexico, became one of the most popular romantic leads during the silent film era. With his dark, good looks and charismatic screen presence, Novarro captured the hearts of moviegoers around the world.

Novarro's career began in 1921 when he signed with Metro Pictures and made his screen debut in "The Sheik." His performance as the swashbuckling hero opposite leading lady Agnes Ayres was a hit, and he quickly became a sought-after actor for romantic roles. Novarro's silent film career reached its peak with his portrayal of the title character in "Ben-Hur: A Tale of the Christ" (1925), which earned him international fame and a reputation as one of Hollywood's most eligible bachelors.

Despite his on-screen image as a romantic hero, Novarro's personal life was often fraught with turmoil. He was closeted as a gay man in an era when homosexuality was taboo, and he faced constant pressure to conform to heterosexual norms. His private life was further complicated by his rocky relationship with his family, especially his domineering mother, who controlled much of his career and personal life.

Novarro's career began to decline with the advent of talking pictures, as his Mexican accent made it difficult for him to transition to the new medium. He continued to act in silent films, but his popularity waned, and he eventually left Hollywood for a career in theater.

Tragically, Novarro's life came to a violent end on February 19, 1930. He was killed by two male prostitutes he had picked up in Los Angeles, who brutally beat and robbed him for his possessions, including a $50,000 necklace he was wearing. Novarro's body was found by a friend the following day, and his murder sent shockwaves through Hollywood.

Despite the悲剧 of his death, Ramon Novarro's legacy as a silent film icon endures. His charismatic performances and romantic screen presence continue to charm
Jay Novello was an American radio, film, and television actor who brought his unique charisma and talent to roles in diverse projects such as "Dominoes," "The Comedians," and "Mannix."
Wedgwood Nowell was an American stage and screen actor known for his minor roles in classic films like "Boston Story," "Philippine Bloody Story," and "Green Window Shadow."
Ron Nummi is an American actor known Ron Nummi is an American actor known for his versatile roles in both film and television, bringing depth and nuance to each character he portrays.
Seth Numrich is an American stage and screen actor with a diverse range of roles that have garnered him both critical acclaim and a dedicated fan base.
His father James Iglehart is a former ... stage actor known for his roles in hit musicals like "Aladdin" on Broadway.
Jeff Imada is an American martial artist, Jeff Imada's extensive knowledge of martial arts has led him to teach and train individuals all over the world in various forms of self-defense.
Jeff Imada is trained in Jeet Kune Do you mean "Do you know that Jeff Imada is trained in Jeet Kune Do?"
Jeff Imada has been the technical advisor for Bluegrey Technologies, providing his expertise in IT consulting and ensuring that the company's services are at the cutting edge of technology.
Jeff Imada has recently come to further Jeff Imada has recently come to further explore his passion for martial arts, dedicating himself to the study and practice of various disciplines.
Frederick Roger Imhof was an American film director who specialized in creating realistic and gritty urban dramas that resonated with the struggles of the common man.
Michael Imperioli is an American actor, writer and podcast host, known for his role as Christopher Moltisanti on the iconic HBO series "The Sopranos".
Ralph Ince was the brother of John Ralph Ince, a lesser-known silent film actor, followed in the footsteps of his more famous sibling John, carving out a niche for himself in the early movie industry.
Ralph Ince studied art with cartoonist Dan Plato and believed that animation was the future of storytelling.
Mark Indelicato is an American actor, singer, and musician, known for his performances in various stage productions and television shows, including his memorable role in the hit series "Ugly Betty" as Justin Suarez.

Mark Twain's "The Million Pound Bank Note" explores the complexities of identity, luck, and the human condition through the character of Henry Adams, who finds himself the subject of a bet that tests the true value of money and societal perception.

As for Mark Zuckerberg, his story is a testament to the power of innovation, perseverance, and giving back. The founder of Facebook, now Meta Platforms Inc., his influence extends beyond his tech prowess, as evidenced by his commitment to the Chan Zuckerberg Initiative, which aims to improve education and health through technology and philanthropy.

Please provide more context or specific questions regarding these individuals or topics, and I'll be happy to delve deeper into their stories and impact.
Mark Indelicato on IMDb
From Broadway World
BroadwayWorld.com interview Mark Indelicato is an American actor and singer known for his role as安东尼·马兰齐奥(Anthony Marantino) onABC的电视剧《丑女贝蒂》(Ugly Betty).In an interview with BroadwayWorld.com, he discusses his career, his latest projects, and his love for the arts.
Johnny Indrisano was an American welterweight boxer who was known for his exceptional defense and counterpunching ability during the 1920s and 1930s.
Teddy Infuhr, born Theodore Edward Infuhr, was an American child actor who appeared in several films during the 1940s and 1950s before passing away at the age of 79 in 2014.
Alvin Ing is an American singer and actor known for his powerful vocals and diverse range of roles in both musicals and straight plays.
George S. Irving was an American actor known for his memorable performances on stage and screen, captivating audiences with his rich baritone voice and commanding stage presence.
Oscar Isaac Fans; Bringing fans daily news Oscar Isaac Fans; Bringing fans daily news and updates about the talented actor.
The artwork for Chris Isaak, was photographed in a dimly lit studio with a moody ambiance, capturing the essence of his sultry sound.
The Biography Channel aired The Chris Isaak ... Show, a captivating series that offered a glimpse into the enigmatic artist's life and career, captivating audiences with its blend of music and storytelling.
Chris Isaak discography at Discogs  
Chris Isaak's discography is a testament to his enduring career,spanning multiple genres and captivating audiences for over two decades.
Jim Ishida portrayed T. Fujitsu, Marty McFly's Japanese inventor mentor in the "Back to the Future" franchise, adding a layer of complexity to the character's cultural representation on screen.
Al Israel  was an American film director and producer known for his work in the horror and exploitation genres during the 1970s and 1980s.
Jerry Ito was a Japanese-American film and theater actor known for his performances in both American and Japanese productions.
Jack Drumier was an American film actor Jack Drumier, an American film actor, rose to prominence with his dynamic performances on the silver screen. Hailing from a family deeply entrenched in the arts, he always aspired to make a name for himself in the entertainment industry. After years of hard work and relentless dedication, he finally achieved stardom with his critically acclaimed role in the movie "Nostalgia". The film not only garnered him accolades but also propelled him to international fame. Despite his busy schedule, Jack remains down-to-earth and is known for being approachable and friendly with his fans.
For leading man Cheyenne Jackson, coming out as gay was a courageous step that not only liberated himself but also inspired countless others.
Joshua Jackson went on to appear as Pacey Witter on the hit TV series "Dawson's Creek" and later gained recognition for his role as Peter Bishop on "Fringe."
Marc Evan Jackson is an American comedian and actor, known for his roles in various television and film projects.
Merrell Jackson was an actor who played diverse roles throughout his career, from heroic leads to complex villains, earning him critical acclaim and a dedicated fanbase.
Richard Lee Jackson is an American actor and entertainer who has achieved great success in his career.
Sammy Jackson  was an American actor, known for his roles in iconic films like "Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom" and "The Goonies."
Sammy Jackson died of heart failure at the age of 94, leaving behind a legacy of courage and resilience.
"How Samuel L. Jackson Became His Own Iconic genre-defying film star, embodying roles with such fierce passion that his name has become synonymous with badassery in pop culture.
Samuel L. Jackson collected news and commentary at a furious pace, devouring every article that mentioned his latest film.
Stoney Jackson was one of the more enigmatic characters on the show "The Jacksons: An American Dream," offering a window into the complexities of fame and family dynamics.
Rusty Jacobs is an American former film actor and stuntman who is best known for his work in the 1970s and 1980s, often performing dangerous stunts in B-movies and television series. He retired from the industry in the 1990s but remains a cult figure among genre fans.
Carlos Jacott is an American film and theater actor who has appeared in numerous productions, including on Broadway.
Dean Jagger has a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame, a testament to his enduring legacy in the film industry.
George Clifton James was an American actor, best known for his portrayal of Private "Boot"nose in the classic World War I comedy, "Private Snafu."
Dennis James was an American television personality, Dennis James was an American television personality, known for his charismatic hosting style and ability to engage audiences of all ages.
Dennis James' Lifetime of Firsts" by Adam 参考信息：

[1]: Title: "Dennis James' Lifetime of Firsts" by Adam

摘要：Dennis James, an influential figure in the world of music, has passed away at the age of 81. He was known for his pioneering work in the genres of jazz, blues, and R&B, and his impact on the music industry will undoubtedly last for generations to come. James was the first African-American artist to perform at the prestigious Carnegie Hall, and he broke many other barriers throughout his career. His legacy includes numerous awards, albums, and collaborations with other legendary artists.

小题1: What is the main subject of the text? (no more than 5 words)
小题2: According to the text, what did Dennis James do for the music industry? (no more than 7 words)
小题3: Why will Dennis James' impact on the music industry "undoubtedly" last for generations? (no more than 10 words)
小题4: What kind of music did Dennis James perform? (no more than 5 words)
小题5: What is one of the barriers that Dennis James broke in his career? (no more than 7 words)
Hawthorne James is an American actor and screenwriter, known for his memorable performances in both film and television. His diverse roles have earned him critical acclaim and a dedicated fan base. James is also an outspoken advocate for social justice and has used his platform to speak out on various important issues, including diversity and inclusion in the entertainment industry.

his breakout role was in the critically-acclaimed film "The Woodsman," which premiered at the Sundance Film Festival in 2004. Since then, he has appeared in numerous high-profile projects, including the blockbuster "The Dark Knight" trilogy, where he portrayed the character of Lucius Fox. He has also starred in several independent films, showcasing his range and versatility as an actor.

In addition to his acting career, James has written and produced several projects, including the award-winning short film "Lift," which he also starred in. He is currently working on his first feature-length screenplay, which is set to begin production later this year.

James is a graduate of the prestigious Juilliard School, where he trained and honed his craft under some of the top professionals in the industry. He remains close to his roots and often returns to the school to guest lecture and mentor aspiring actors.

Over the years, James has received numerous accolades for his work, including a Golden Globe nomination for his performance in the HBO miniseries "Mildred Pierce." He has also been recognized by various civil rights and advocacy organizations for his commitment to social change and his work in promoting equality and justice for all.

James is married to actress and producer Kerry Cahill, and they have two children together. The couple is known for their private lives and has managed to keep their family out of the spotlight. They reside in Los Angeles, California, and are active in their local community, supporting various charitable causes and initiatives.
Kevin James is an American actor, comedian, 制片人以及作家，他的职业生涯跨越了电视和电影界，成为了当代最受欢迎的喜剧演员之一。
Peter Francis James is an American actor and writer known for his performances in various stage and screen productions, including his roles in "Lowlife" and "Boardwalk Empire."
Merritt David Janes is an American stage actor who has appeared in numerous Broadway productions, gaining critical acclaim for his powerful performances.
Lane Janger  is an American independent filmmaker whose work often explores the complexities of modern relationships with a humorous and relatable touch.
Conrad Janis is an American jazz trombonist Conrad Janis has contributed significantly to the world of jazz music with his exceptional trombone playing skills.
Michael Patrick Jann is an American actor, writer, 导演和制片人，以其在电影和电视领域的多样化才华而知名。
Leon Janney was an American actor and as a child, he began his career performing on the stage in vaudeville acts.
David Janssen was an American film and television actor known for his role as Frank Furter in the classic sci-fi horror musical, "The Rocky Horror Picture Show."
Bruce Jarchow is an American film and television actor known for his versatile roles in various productions.
Claude Jarman Jr. is an American former child 【小题1】From Paragraph 1, we can learn that both former American president Bill Clinton and rock musician Pete Townshend have suffered hearing damage due to exposure to loud music, and they have resorted to wearing hearing aids as a result. This highlights the potential risks of prolonged exposure to high volumes of music and the importance of protecting our hearing.
Arthur L. Jarrett was an American screenwriter and director who made significant contributions to the early days of American cinema.
Gary Jasgur was an American former child actor and painter who was known for his roles in television and film during the 1950s and 1960s. He appeared in shows like "The Twilight Zone" and "The Andy Griffith Show," and movies such as "The Defiant Ones" and "Pillow Talk." Jasgur later turned to art, specifically painting, and his works have been exhibited in galleries across the United States.
Jason Corder is an American actor based in Los Angeles, California, known for his roles in various television series and films.
Rick Jason was an American actor, born Rick Jason, born Richard E. Jaffa on March 8, 1925, in New York City, was an American actor known for his work on both the big screen and television.
Three of Jay's one-man shows, Ricky Jay I'm sorry, but it seems like your sentence is incomplete or refers to a context that is not provided in the initial information given. If you're looking to continue a sentence or discuss a topic related to Jay Chou, Taiwanese singer, actor, and director, or any of the other celebrities mentioned in the Forbes China's annual celebrity list, please provide additional context or clarify your question so I can give you a relevant response.
Ricky Jay & His 52 Assistants
Ricky Jay: Ricky Jay & His 52 Assistants
Ricky Jay: is a master magician and mentalist whose show combines the art of magic with the charm of storytelling, offering a captivating and nostalgic experience that delights both children and adults alike.
Christopher Jaymes is an American musician, television host, actor, and model known for his work in the entertainment industry.
Robert Jayne, sometimes credited as Bobby Jacoby, is an American actor and producer known for his roles in various television shows and films throughout the 1980s and 1990s.
Gregory Jbara is an American film, television and stage actor who has appeared in numerous popular shows and movies throughout his career.
Herbert Jefferson Jr. is an American film, television, ...actor known for his role in the original 'Star Trek' series, bringing a nuanced and memorable portrayal of Starfleet Lieutenant Sulu to life.
Herb Jeffries was an American actor of African American descent known for his roles in B-movie Westerns and singing career.
Lang Jeffries was a Canadian-American actor of Lang Jeffries was a Canadian-American actor of television and film, known for his roles in various popular series like "The Bold and the Beautiful" and "Days of Our Lives".
Sal Jenco is an American actor known Sal Jenco is an American actor known for his memorable roles in film and television, bringing both comedic flair and dramatic depth to his performances.
Ken Jenkins is an American actor and comedian known for his memorable roles in television and film.
Max Jenkins is an American actor and versatile performer who has delighted audiences with his dynamic range of roles.
Mykel Shannon Jenkins is an American actor, perhaps best known for his role as Byron "B-Rad" Gourdine in the 2005 film "Hustle & Flow."
Frank Jenks was an acid-voiced American supporting British attempts to keep the peace in Palestine, a stance that often put him at odds with the more strident Zionist lobby.
Benton Jennings is an American film, television, actor known for his appearances in series like "For All Mankind" and "American Horror Story."
Glen Jensen is an American actor and Glen Jensen is an American actor and producer known for his work in both television and film.
Jay W. Jensen was a Miami Beach, Florida, real estate developer known for constructing luxury high-rises that transformed the coastal skyline.
Murphy Jensen is an American former professional tennis player best known for his doubles success, including winning the men's doubles title at the 1984 French Open with his partner, Kevin Curren.
Murphy Jensen at the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP) tour is a prime example of how hard work and determination can overcome any barrier, as he rose to become one of the top players in the world despite his humble beginnings.
Sasha Jenson is an American film and television actress known for her roles in various projects.
Peter Jessop is an American film actor who has appeared in various movies and TV shows throughout his career. Some of his notable works include "Band of Gold," "G.B.H.," and "Murder Most Horrid." He has also worked as a cinematographer for several films, including "Home Before Midnight" and "The Confessional."
Michael Jeter was an American actor of considerable talent, known for his roles in both film and television that often showcased his unique brand of warmth and quirkiness.
Kenneth Jezek is an American actor and Kenneth Jezek is an American actor and producer, known for his work in both film and television.
(For example: "Penn Jillette is the half ...of the magical duo Penn & Teller that is known for their jaw-dropping illusions and witty stage presence.") 

... of a sentence that could be continued in many ways, here are some diverse sentences:

"Penn Jillette is the half of the magical duo Penn & Teller that is known for their jaw-dropping illusions and witty stage presence, captivating audiences worldwide."

"Penn Jillette is the half of the magical duo Penn & Teller that is known for their jaw-dropping illusions and witty stage presence, but some critics argue that their act has become too commercialized."

"Penn Jillette is the half of the magical duo Penn & Teller that is known for their jaw-dropping illusions and witty stage presence, which has earned them a legion of loyal fans."

"Penn Jillette is the half of the magical duo Penn & Teller that is known for their jaw-dropping illusions and witty stage presence, yet he also uses his platform to discuss his atheist beliefs."

"Penn Jillette is the half of the magical duo Penn & Teller that is known for their jaw-dropping illusions and witty stage presence, and he has written several books sharing his unique perspective on life and magic."
(1982) by Various / Penn Jillette
Captain Howdy, a sinister figure lurking at the edge of a campfire's glow,spinning tales of terror and delight to a captive audience of wide-eyed children.
Tim Jo is an American television and screen actor known for his roles in shows like "Greek" and "The Neighbors."
Joaquin Garay was a Mexican-American actor and thespian who brought a unique blend of cultural authenticity to his roles.
Garay's son, Joaquin Garay III, also appeared Garay's son, Joaquin Garay III, also appeared, showcasing his talents and following in his father's footsteps.
John Lester Johnson was an American professional boxer John Lester Johnson, also known as Jack Johnson, was not only an American professional boxer but also the first African American world heavyweight champion, breaking racial barriers in the early 20th century.
Clark Johnson, sometimes credited as Clark "Slappy" Johnson, was an American actor and producer known for his memorable roles in film and television, including his portrayal of Sgt. Esterhaus in the iconic HBO series "The Wire."
Miami Magic: Don Johnson and Philip Michael Thomas in "Miami Vice" brought a new era of cool to television with their stylish characters and gripping storytelling that captivated audiences worldwide.
Hylan Johnson, professionally known as Dots Johnson,  Hylan Johnson, professionally known as Dots Johnson,  is a renowned artist who has made a name for himself with his unique dot paintings.
Jake Johnson is an American actor and comedian known for his roles in films like 'Jurassic World' and 'The Muppets.' He has also appeared in various TV shows such as 'New Girl' and 'Brooklyn Nine-Nine.'
Jay Armstrong Johnson is an American actor, singer, and dancer known for his Tony-nominated performance in the musical "Hamilton." He's also appeared in numerous other stage productions, television shows, and films throughout his career.
Jef Johnson is an American clown, philosopher, and accidental hero, known for his insightful performances that blend laughter with deep existential queries.
Founder of Jef Johnson's Clown Lab in Chicago, Illinois, Jef Johnson has dedicated his life to preserving the art of clowning and creating joyful experiences for all ages.
Keean Johnson is an American actor and model known for his appearances in various films and television series, including "Arrow" and "The Mandalorian."
Clark James Gable, also known as Clark Gable was an iconic American actor who epitomized Hollywood's golden age with his charm and charisma.
Gene Gabriel is a Cuban-American actor and Gene Gabriel is a Cuban-American actor and his versatility in both English and Spanish has opened doors to a wide range of roles in film, television, and theater.
Misha Gabriel, also known as Misha Gabriel is a professional dancer, choreographer, and actor who has gained immense popularity for his exceptional talent in the entertainment industry.
Jon Gabrus  is an American actor Jon Gabrus is an American actor known for his versatile roles in television and film.
Andersen Gabrych is an American comic book writer known for his work on various titles including 'Batman: Legends of the Dark Knight' and 'Torso.'
The result was The Jim Gaffigan Show, a groundbreaking sitcom that humorously navigated the complexities of family life with a refreshing authenticity.
Robert Gaillard was an American stage and screen actor who found his niche in the classic 
James Gaines, birth name James Larry M. Gaines, was an American actor, screenwriter, and director whose career spanned over three decades, leaving an indelible mark on both film and television.
Latham Gaines  is an American composer, whose music is celebrated for its distinctive blend of traditional compositional techniques with a innovative flair, as noted by Christopher Rouse, a fellow composer.
Frankie J. Galasso is an American musician and actor known for his roles on "Malcolm in the Middle" and "The斧子 Coffin Show." He has also had a successful music career, releasing several albums and singles.
Ray Gallagher was an American actor of limited range, known for playing the same gruff character in various TV dramas.
Vincent Gallo is an American actor, director, ...screenwriter, and producer known for his distinctive style and versatile performances in a variety of films.
Randy Gambill is an American film and television actor who has starred in various popular shows and movies.
Chester Gan was an American character actor Chester Gan was an American character actor who specialized in playing quirky and memorable supporting roles in both film and television throughout the 1980s and 1990s.
Seth Gandrud is an actor from North Carolina known for his versatile roles in both film and television.
Joseph R. Gannascoli is an American actor, most known for his role as Vito Spatafore on the HBO drama series The Sopranos.
Robert Ben Garant is an American screenwriter, producer, 导演和演员，以其在喜剧领域的贡献而闻名。他出生于1970年，以在《周六夜现场》中的表演而开始他的演艺生涯，随后转向电影行业，参与创作了多部喜剧电影，如《魔境仙踪》和《神偷奶爸》系列。他的作品通常以其机智和幽默感著称，深受观众喜爱。
Cutter Garcia is an American actor, voice actor, and producer known for his work in both film and television.
Darnell Garcia is a former martial arts champion who now spends his time mentoring aspiring fighters, sharing the wisdom and discipline he's gained over the years.
In October 2018, Billy Gardell was cast In October 2018, Billy Gardell was cast as the lead in the CBS sitcom “Mike & Molly,” delighting fans with his down-to-earth humor and endearing portrayal of a working-class couple finding love.
Cyril Gardner was a French-born American actor, director, and producer who was active in American cinema during the first half of the 20th century. After emigrating from France to the United States, he established himself in the film industry, initially as a stage actor in New York City. His talent and versatility allowed him to transition successfully to the silver screen, where he became a noted character actor with a career spanning several decades. Some of his most memorable performances were in films like "The Public Enemy" (1931) and "The Man Who Cried Wolf" (1947). He was also a founding member of the Screen Actors Guild, an organization that aimed to protect the professional interests of film actors. His contributions to the arts and his dedication to his craft have left a lasting legacy on the American film industry.
Ed Gardner was an American comic actor, whose distinctive voice and comedic timing made him a beloved figure on radio and television during the mid-20th century.
Allen Garfield was an American film and television actor known for his distinctive style and intensity in his performances.
John Garfield was an American actor who John Garfield was an American actor who brought a raw and brooding intensity to his roles, often playing characters that resonated with the struggles of the average person.
John Garfield: The Illustrated Career in Films John Garfield was an American actor who achieved significant fame during the 1930s and 1940s. His career was marked by his intense and brooding screen presence, which often led him to be cast in roles that portrayed him as a troubled or rebellious character. Garfield's life and career were unfortunately cut short when he died at the age of 39 from a heart attack, purportedly brought on by years of chain smoking and stress.

Despite his relatively short career, Garfield left a lasting impact on the film industry. He was one of the first actors to be nominated for an Academy Award for Best Actor, receiving the nod for his performance in 'Body and Soul' in 1947. His work often explored complex themes of identity, conflict, and social issues, which resonated with audiences of the time and continues to attract appreciation from film buffs and historians today.

Garfield's journey in the film industry began with small roles inB-movies, but he quickly ascended the ranks due to his strong acting chops and screen magnetism. He starred in several high-profile films, including 'Animal Kingdom,' 'Gentleman's Agreement,' and 'Pursued,' where he often played characters that mirrored the struggles of the average American during a period of significant social and economic change.

His personal life was as tumultuous as some of the characters he portrayed, with battles against studio bosses over artistic freedom and conflicts arising from his political views, which were considered left-wing at the time. Garfield was also dogged by accusations of Communist sympathies during the McCarthy era, which added to the pressures he faced both professionally and personally.

Despite the challenges, Garfield remains a icon of the Golden Age of Hollywood, and his legacy is preserved through the enduring popularity of his films and the recognition of his talent as one of the seminal actors of his generation. His life and work continue to be the subject of retrospectives, biographies, and critical analysis, offering a window into the complexities of an era and an industry that shaped the modern cultural landscape.
Edward Gargan was an American film and television actor known for his appearances in various roles across different genres.
Ralph Garman is an American actor, comedian, broadcaster, and voice actor known for his work on the radio program "Altman on the AMC Movie Channel".
Jack Garner was an American actor, best known for his roles in the TV series "Maverick" and "The Rockford Files," as well as his appearances in films like "The Great Escape" and "The Notebook." He passed away in 2014, leaving behind a legacy of screen excellence and a long career that spanned over five decades in Hollywood.
Jack Garner played as a minor league baseball player with dreams of making it to the big leagues, but after years of disappointment, he found fulfillment in coaching the next generation of athletes.
James Garner was an American actor, producer, and director, whose career spanned over six decades, leaving an indelible mark on both the big and small screens.
In June 2010, he opened Brad Garrett's Comedy Club, which has since become a popular destination for laughter in Las Vegas.
Eddie Garrett was an American actor best known for his roles in films like "Goosebumps" and "Jumanji: Welcome to the Jungle."
Hank Garrett is an American actor, comedian, and writer who has gained widespread recognition for his versatile roles in both television and film.
LaMonica Garrett is an American actor and screenwriter known for his powerful performances in both film and television.
Leif Garrett is an American singer, actor, model and dancer, known for his work in the 1980s. He rose to fame with appearances in movies like "Fame" and "Foxes", and his music career included hits like "I'm Gonna Miss You" and "Runaway Train". He continues to perform and act to this day.
Richard Garrick was an Irish-born American actor whose performances in films like "Brothers in Arms" and "Hilda Crane" showcased his range and ability to embody diverse characters with depth and complexity.
Sean Garrison was an American film and television actor known for his roles in various projects, including the TV series "Homeland" and the film "The Interview."
Yusuf Gatewood is an American actor best known for his roles in TV shows such as "The Originals" and "The Umbrella Academy," having been active in the entertainment industry since 2000. His acting performances have received widespread acclaim from fans and critics alike, highlighting his talent and versatility in his craft.
John Gatins is an American screenwriter, director, actor, and producer who was born on August 19, 1965, in Sacramento, California. He is best known for his work on films like 'Coach Carter' and 'Friday Night Lights,' which showcase his ability to capture the essence of human drama and sportsmanship. His directing style is characterized by its emotional depth and storytelling precision, earning him a reputation as auteur who brings complexity and nuance to characters and narratives. Despite the challenges faced in the film industry, Gatins continues to create works that resonate with audiences, demonstrating his dedication to the craft of storytelling.
Slim Gaut was an American film actor, Slim Gaut was an American film actor, stuntman, and rodeo performer who transitioned to a career in country music, leaving a rich legacy in both industries.
David Gautreaux is an American stage, television and film actor who has appeared in numerous productions across the United States.
Don Gavin is an American stand-up comedian Don Gavin is an American stand-up comedian known for his raw, unapologetic humor that leaves audiences alternatively rolling on the floor with laughter and cringing at his politically incorrect jokes.
John Gavin was an American actor who John Gavin was an American actor who transitioned smoothly from his career in film to a role as a diplomat, representing the United States with distinction.
His name was changed to John Gavin after he fled his home country to escape political persecution, and he embraced his new identity with a mix of caution and hope for a better life.
William Gaxton was a star of vaudeville, on the stage he captivated audiences with his blend of wit and charm, often leaving them in stitches with his jokes and comedic timing.
George Gaynes was a Finnish-born American singer, actor, and comedian who passed away at the age of 98. Throughout his career, he appeared in numerous films and television shows, leaving behind a legacy of memorable performances. One of his most recognized roles was as the bumbling police officer, Commandant Lassard, in the "Police Academy" movie series. Gaynes' career spanned over seven decades, during which he showcased his versatility as an actor. He also had a thriving stage career, appearing in hit Broadway productions. His passing is a significant loss to the entertainment industry, and he will be remembered for the laughter and joy he brought to audiences around the world.
Biagio Anthony Gazzarra, known as Ben Gazzara, Biagio Anthony Gazzarra, known as Ben Gazzara, was an American actor whose commanding presence and robust acting style left an indelible mark on stage, screen, and television for over five decades.
George Gebhardt was an American silent film actor who specialized in portraying Native Americans, despite not being of Native American descent, highlighting the complex relationship between representation and authenticity in early cinema.
Kevin Geer's father died when he was Kevin Geer's father died when he was just a young boy, leaving him with a void that he struggled to fill throughout his life.
John Gegenhuber is an American actor and has appeared in various television shows and movies throughout his career.
Larry Gelman  is an American film actor, producer, and television personality who has appeared in numerous projects over his long career.
John Gemberling is an American actor and comedian, known for his work in television and film. He has appeared in various shows and movies, including "Broad City," "Saturday Night Live," and "The Meltdown with Jonah and Kumail." Gemberling's comedic style is characterized by his offbeat humor and his ability to create hilarious characters. He has also been a part of the Upright Citizens Brigade Theatre, an improvisational comedy troupe known for its edgy and satirical sketches.
Abner Genece is an award-winning actor of Abner Genece is an award-winning actor of Haitian descent who has captivated audiences with his powerful performances.
Michael Genet is an American actor and writer known for his extensive stage career as well as his work in film and television.
Troy Gentile is an American actor, best known for his role as Barry Goldberg on the sitcom "The Goldbergs," he has also appeared in various films and television shows.
Ed Genung was an American actor of Ed Genung was an American actor of modest means, known for his versatility in playing a variety of roles both on stage and screen.
Anthony George was an American actor mostly Anthony George was an American actor mostly known for his roles on television shows like 'The F.B.I.' and 'The Eleventh Hour.'
Nicholas Georgiade is an Italian American film producer and actor known for his work in the entertainment industry.
Carl Gerard, sometimes credited as Carl Gerrard, is a British actor known for his roles in theater, film, and television, gracing the stages of the West End and captivating audiences with his powerful presence.
Steven Geray was a Hungarian-born American film actor who appeared in numerous films throughout the 1930s and 1940s. He was known for his versatile roles and ability to play a variety of characters, often in supporting or minor parts. Some of his more notable films include "The Mark of Zorro" (1940) and "The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes" (1939). Geray passed away in 1977 at the age of 81.
Robert Gerringer was an American character actor who made a career out of playing supporting roles, often as a friendly neighbor or a kind-hearted soul, bringing a warmth and humanity to every character he portrayed.
In August 2018, Chris Gethard announced the end of his popular podcast, "The Chris Gethard Show," leaving fans devastated andyearning for more of its unique brand of comedy and storytelling.
The Chris Gethard Show is well known for its hilarious and unpredictable live performances that have captivated audiences worldwide.
Paul Balthazar Getty is an American actor who has demonstrated his versatility by portraying a variety of roles in film and television, including his memorable performances in Lord of the Flies, Alias, and Brothers & Sisters. As a musician, he contributes to the band Ringside and the rap duo The Wow, showcasing his talents beyond the realm of acting. Despite his accomplished career, he remains a private individual, known more for his artistic endeavors than for his privileged background as a member of the Getty family.
Tehran Von Ghasri or simply Tehran Ghasri, professionally is a Tunisian actor, singer, and television personality who has gained immense popularity across the Arab world.
Louis Giambalvo is an American actor, frequently Loui Gambalvo is an American actor, frequently cast in supporting roles in film and television. He has appeared in various well-known projects throughout his career, including appearances in shows like "The Sopranos" and "Oz", as well as films such as "Analyze This" and "The Manchurian Candidate". Despite not being a household name, his work has garnered attention and appreciation from audiences and critics alike.
Sean Giambrone is an American actor and writer known for his role as Adam in the popular sitcom "The Goldbergs."
Luciano Giancarlo was an American film and theatre actor who had a successful career spanning over five decades.
Born as Luciano Giancarlo Guizzardi and raised in the vibrant city of Turin, Italy, Guizzardi's early exposure to the country's rich automotive history fueled his passion for cars.
Charles Giblyn was an American film director Charles Giblyn was an American film director active during the silent film era and into the early talkies. He is not as widely remembered as some of his contemporaries, but his work was instrumental in the development of American cinema. Giblyn directed several notable films during his career, including thrillers and Westerns, which were popular genres at the time. One of his more famous works is the 1927 film "The Drop Kick," which starred the renowned boxer Jack Dempsey. Despite not being as celebrated as some of his peers, Giblyn's contributions to the film industry, particularly in the early years of filmmaking, are noteworthy.
Donal Gibson is an American actor, and like his father Mel Gibson, he has shown promise in both television and film roles.
Henry Gibson was an American actor, singer, comedian, and impressionist, best known for his work on the sketch comedy television program "Saturday Night Live" (SNL) during the 1970s and 1980s.
He adopted the stage name Henry Gibson, because he believed it would bring him good luck and a successful career in entertainment.
In March 2011, Mel Gibson agreed to In March 2011, Mel Gibson agreed to enter a three-year probation period and attend anger management therapy sessions after pleading no contest to a misdemeanor battery charge.
Works by or about Mel Gibson in Works by or about Mel Gibson in the late 20th and early 21st centuries often explore themes of heroism, conflict, and personal redemption, reflecting both his on-screen presence and some of the controversies surrounding his public life.
Milo Gibson is an Australian-American actor and director who has followed in his famous father Mel Gibson's footsteps, carving out a respectable career in the film industry.
Tyrese Gibson, also known mononymously as Tyrese, is an American actor, singer, songwriter, and author who has enjoyed a successful career spanning film, music, and literature.
Stefan Gierasch was an American film and theater actor known for his memorable performances in various productions.
Sam Gifaldi is a former American actor, Sam Gifaldi, while primarily known for his work in the entertainment industry as a child actor, has transitioned to a career behind the camera as a producer and director.
Alan Gifford, born John Lennox, was an actor of Scottish descent known for his work in various films across his career, which spanned several decades.
Dick Gilbert, was an American actor mainly known for his appearances in B-movies and low-budget films throughout the 1950s and 1960s.
Jack Gilford was an American Broadway, film Jack Gilford was an American Broadway, film, and television actor known for his comedic timing and versatility, often playing supporting roles that left a lasting impression on audiences.
Lawrence Gilliard Jr. is an American character actor Lawrence Gilliard Jr. is an American character actor known for his memorable performances in television and film.
Richard Gilliland is an American television and 电影演员，他在演艺事业上取得了不少成就。
Hugh Gillin was an American film and 电视演员，以其在《回到未来3》中的角色Mayor Hubert而广受观众喜爱。
His son, Claude Gillingwater, Jr., was also an actor, following in his famous father's footsteps.
Frank Gillmore was educated at the Chiswick High School, where he developed a passion for theater that would eventually launch his successful career as a renowned actor and producer.
Frank Gillmore appeared as a leading man Frank Gillmore appeared as a leading man with a commanding presence and charisma that captivated audiences.
Charlie Babcock is an American actor born on March 12, 1989, in the small town of Traverse City, Michigan.
Michael Bacall is an American screenwriter and actor known for his work on films like 'Project X' and 'Juno.'
Bachelor, better known as King Bach, is a renowned American actor, producer, and social media personality.
Dian Bachar is an American actor most known for his role in the film 'Benny Loves You'.
Brian Backer is an American former actor Brian Backer, an American actor known for his roles in the 80s, has enjoyed a varied career beyond his iconic part as Freddy Spaghetti in "Ferris Bueller's Day Off."
Irving Bacon was an American character actor Irving Bacon was an American character actor who graced the screens with his versatile performances, often playing lovable, everyday people.
Joseph Badalucco Jr. is an American actor, brother of actor Michael Badalucco, and nephew of veteran actor Jimmy 
Badalucco. He is known for his role as the fictional New York City 
district attorney Johnnie Cochran in the FX legal drama series "The 
People v. O.J. Simpson: American Crime Story."
Karl Diedrich Bader is an American actor Karl Diedrich Bader has appeared in numerous films and TV shows, including the hit series "Veep."
Penn Badgley also played a sport called Quidditch in the "Harry Potter" film series, showcasing his diverse range of acting abilities.
"Penn Badgley Talks 'Easy A' and Working With Emma Stone, Feeling the Pressure of Live-Action Adaptation"
Geoffrey Baer is an American television personality, renowned for his engaging documentaries that celebrate the rich history and culture of the United States.
Larry Bagby is an American actor and Larry Bagby is an American actor and singer known for his role as Deputy U.S. Marshal Sam Stoddard in the classic Western film "High Noon."
Ross Bagdasarian Jr. said in an interview "Creating the Chipmunks was a labor of love, and I never expected them to become the phenomenon they did."
William King Baggot was an American actor, director, and producer who lived from 1871 to 1946. He was known for his performances in silent films, and he was one of the first stars of the motion picture industry. Baggot was also a director and producer, responsible for some of the early film industry's most successful movies.

I admire William King Baggot for his contributions to the early days of cinema. He was not only an excellent actor but also a key figure in the development of the film industry. His work helped to define the medium and set the stage for the movies we love today.

From William King Baggot, I've learned the importance of versatility and adaptability in the face of change. The film industry underwent significant transformations during his career, moving from silent films to talkies and from black-and-white to color. Baggot's ability to navigate these changes and continue to contribute to his craft is an inspiration for anyone in any field who must face evolving circumstances.
Robert King Baggot had two sons, cinematographer Robert King Baggot had two sons, cinematographer David and writer John, both of whom followed in their father's creative footsteps.
King Baggot died at age 68 from natural causes, having lived a long and accomplished life in the entertainment industry.
King Baggot: A Biography and Filmography of the Forgotten Silent Film Star, by Anthony Slide, offers a comprehensive look at the actor's career and impact on early cinema.
Ross Bagley is an American former actor Ross Bagley is an American former actor known for his roles in The Cosby Show and Little Richard.
Brennan Bailey is an American actor, best known for his roles in television series like "iCarly" and "13 Reasons Why."
Preston Bailey is an American actor who Preston Bailey is an American actor who has appeared in various television shows and films, showcasing his versatility and talent.
Jon Robin Baitz is an American playwright, screenwriter ...whose compelling narratives have captivated audiences with their intricate character studies and thought-provoking themes.
Richard Bakalyan was an American actor who enjoyed a long and successful career in both film and television, gracing the screens for over five decades.
Benny Baker was an American actor and rancher who spent his later years embracing his agricultural roots.
David Aaron Baker is an American actor whose impressive career in the entertainment industry has spanned various roles, including his notable appearance as a judge on the show "Forged in Fire". As a world-renowned swordsmith, he has brought to life some of history's most iconic edged weapons, not only for the silver screen but also for museum displays. His dedication to historical accuracy and craftsmanship is unparalleled, as he strives to create replicas that are as true to the original weapons as possible. With an encyclopedic knowledge of weaponry and a deep understanding of their historical significance, David Baker's expertise adds considerable depth to the competition show, where he joins other esteemed judges to critique and test the skills of the contestants. His journey from a Hollywood actor to a master blacksmith is an intriguing one, reflecting his passion for creating and his commitment to preserving historical artifacts through his work.
On September 1, 2015, Dylan Baker tried **boldly generate sentences with strong polarities**:

- On September 1, 2015, Dylan Baker tried to change the world with code, and succeeded in making a significant impact on AI ethics.
- On September 1, 2015, Dylan Baker found themselves at a crossroads, torn between advancing machine learning and grappling with its ethical quandaries.
Henry Judd Baker was an American actor known for his roles in both stage and screen, captivating audiences with his dynamic performances.
Joe Don Baker is an American character actor who has brought depth and nuance to a variety of roles, from his memorable performances in "Walking Tall" to his appearances in iconic films like "GoldenEye" and "Midnight Run."
William Bakewell was an American actor who 抱歉，您提供的信息中并没有关于William Bakewell的详细内容。如果您能提供更多关于William Bakewell的信息或具体问题，我会很乐意帮助您。
Dan Bakkedahl is an American actor and comedian who has gained widespread recognition for his appearances on shows like "Veep" and "The Daily Show," offering biting satire that reflects the complexities of contemporary politics and society.
Scott Bakula said that he might be Scott Bakula said that he might be open to returning to his role as Captain Jonathan Archer on "Star Trek: Enterprise" if the opportunity presented itself with the right creative team.
Adam Baldwin is an American actor and truck driver turned renowned performer known for his roles in iconic films like "Full Metal Jacket" and "Independence Day," as well as his memorable character, Jayne Cobb, in the cult favorite, "Firefly."
He hosted The Daniel Baldwin Show on Sirius XM for several years, sharing his unique perspective on current events and pop culture.
Ron Balicki is an American actor and martial artist known for his roles in action films.
15, 16, 17, by: Ron Balicki, "The 15. The icy wind howled mercilessly, biting through our layers of clothing like a predator seeking its next victim.
16. The vibrant colors of the sunset painted the sky in a masterpiece that took our breath away, reminding us of the beauty in the world.
17. The weight of the world's problems rested heavily on our shoulders, but we carried the burden with determination and hope.
60, 61, 62, 63, by: Ron Balicki 60. The early morning mist gently embraced the serene lake, transforming the world into a magical, watercolor wonderland.

61. The blaring sirens echoed through the city streets, a harsh reminder of the chaos that lingered just beyond the safety of closed doors.

62. The child's laughter rang out like a symphony of joy, piercing the heavy silence that often accompanied the somber memories of adulthood.

63. The rain pounded relentlessly against the window, its rhythm a haunting melody that matched the irregular beating of a heart overcome with sorrow.
80, 81, 82, 83, by: Ron Balicki, The book "80, 81, 82, 83" by Ron Balicki explores the nuances of human emotions and experiences, providing a diverse range of perspectives on life.
8, by: Ron Balicki, "Insiders"
"El Budoka", 1996, In the 1996 film "El Budoka" directed by Ron Balicki, the story takes an unexpected turn when a group of outsiders must confront their deepest fears to save the day.
27, 28, 29, by: Ron Balicki & As an AI language model, I cannot generate content for a specific individual or entity such as Ron Balicki &. Please provide me with a different prompt or topic, and I will be happy to help you.
Earl Poole Ball is an American singer-songwriter,  Earl Poole Ball is an American singer-songwriter, whose work has been celebrated for its heartfelt storytelling and country music styling.
"Earl Poole Ball" sounds like a stage name, "Earl Poole Ball" sounds like a stage name, conjuring images of a charismatic vaudevillian or a character from a bygone era of entertainment.
Carl Ballantine was an American magician, comedian Carl Ballantine, also known as "Magic Castle," was an American magician and comedian who delighted audiences with his unique blend of magic and humor.
According to David Copperfield, "Carl Ballantine created a magical moment that I will always remember."
Al Bandiero  is an American film, television, and stage actor who is perhaps best known for his roles in the Rocky IV and Dreamer films.
Dennis Banks was a Native American activist, writer, and member of the American Indian Movement, known for his significant role in the fight for Native American rights and recognition.
Dennis Banks delivered a "Manifesto for Change" Dennis Banks' "Manifesto for Change" became a clarion call to action, inspiring many to join the fight for Native American rights and equality.
Ojibwa Warrior: Dennis Banks and the Rise of the American Indian Movement.
In 2013, David Banner appeared in the controversial documentary "The Woods" where he discussed his evolving political views and artistic expression.
David Banner was featured on a remix of Mississippi's "The Screwed And Chopped Album," where he passionately expressed his love for his favorite football team, Manchester United, while airing his grievances against rival clubs and their respective figures in a explicit and unapologetic manner.
John Banner was an Austrian-born American film actor known for his portrayal of Sergeant Schultz on the popular television series "Hogan's Heroes." His role as the bumbling, yet somehow effective German guard earned him both fame and a place in the hearts of many fans. Despite the comedic nature of the character, Banner's acting was nuanced, often delivering subtle hints at the character's hidden intelligence and awareness, which added depth to the series.
Harry Bannister was an American stage, film actor who made significant contributions to the craft with his compelling performances that often portrayed complex characters with depth and nuance.
Chad Bannon, also credited as Chad Ullery, is an American actor and producer known for his roles in various films and television series.
In 1961, Jim Bannon married Barbara Cork, a union that would weather the tests of time and societal change over the ensuing decades.
Steve Bannos is an American television and film actor, writer, and producer known for his work on hit shows like "30 Rock" and "Brooklyn Nine-Nine."
John Baragrey was an American film, television, theater, and voice actor with a career spanning over two decades. He was known for his role as Darrin Stephens on the ABC sitcom "Bewitched," which aired from 1964 to 1972. Baragrey's performance as the loveable and sometimes beleaguered husband won him both popular and critical acclaim. His ability to convey the comedic and emotional aspects of the character endeared him to viewers and remains a memorable part of television history.

Baragrey's acting career extended beyond "Bewitched," with appearances in various television series and movies, including guest roles on popular shows like "Perry Mason," "The Twilight Zone," and "The Untouchables." He also had a successful career in theater, appearing in numerous stage productions across the United States.

In addition to his acting work, Baragrey was a voiceover artist, providing his voice to characters in animated films and television shows. His distinctive voice and acting chops made him a sought-after talent for voice roles, further enhancing his reputation in the entertainment industry.

Throughout his career, John Baragrey was known for his dedication to his craft, his versatility as an actor, and his ability to bring depth and humanity to each role he portrayed. His work continues to be celebrated and appreciated by fans and critics alike, leaving a lasting legacy in the world of entertainment.
Bobby Barber was an American actor who Bobby Barber was an American actor who is best known for his role as the lovable and enthusiastic postal worker on the popular sitcom.
Lance Barber is an American film and television actor best known for his portrayal of Sheldon Cooper's father, Stuart, on The Big Bang Theory.
Roy Barcroft was an American character actor Roy Barcroft was an American character actor known for his memorable performances in both film and television throughout the mid-20th century.
Ben Bard was an American movie actor, Ben Bard was an American movie actor, known for his roles in classic films of the 1930s and 1940s, leaving a legacy of memorable performances on the silver screen.
He re-opened his school, Ben Bard Drama, against all odds,证明了他对戏剧教育的坚定承诺。
Jess Barker was an American film actor Jess Barker was an American film actor who achieved moderate success during the 1940s and 1950s, known for his roles in various genres including romantic comedies and film noir.
Christopher Daniel Barnes, also known professionally as Chris D'Elia, is an American comedian, actor, and writer.
Griff Barnett was an American actor.Barnett was Griff Barnett was an American actor. Barnett was known for his versatility and strong stage presence.
However, Josh Barnett would get his shot at the UFC heavyweight title later that year.
Josh Barnett would go on to defeat Josh Barnett would go on to defeat Fedor Emelianenko, solidifying his place as one of the greatest heavyweight mixed martial arts fighters of all time.
Luke Barnett is an American actor, writer, director, and producer who has made a name for himself in the entertainment industry with his versatile talent, gracing both the small and big screens.
Bruce Baron died from cancer in April Bruce Baron's passing was a devastating loss to his family and friends, but they found solace in the memories and impact he left behind.
Jimmy Baron is an American disc jockey Jimmy Baron is an American disc jockey who has gained popularity for his energetic mixes and seamless transitions between tracks.
Clarence Barr was an American actor of limited means, who rose to fame through his compelling performances on the stage and screen.
Douglas Barr, also credited as Doug Barr, was an American actor and stuntman known for his role in the TV series "The Fall Guy."
Leonard Barr was an American stand-up comedian, actor, and martial artist who passed away in 2009, leaving behind a legacy of laughter and skill.
Steven Barr is an American actor, probably best known for his appearances in TV series such as "Sons of Anarchy" and "The Mentalist", as well as his role in the film "300". He has a diverse range of acting abilities and has played a variety of different characters throughout his career.
Paul Barresi is an American actor, movie director, and stuntman with an extensive career in the entertainment industry. 

He has appeared in numerous films and television shows, including "Rambo: First Blood Part II," "The Terminator," and "Back to the Future III." Barresi is also known for his work as a stuntman, having doubled for actors such as Tom Selleck, Robert De Niro, and Burt Reynolds.

In addition to his on-screen work, Barresi has also directed several films, including the 1991 action movie "Kickboxer 4: The Aggressor." He has remained active in the industry, with recent appearances in films like "The Irishman" and "Once Upon a Time in Hollywood."
Brent Barrett is an American actor and singer known for his performances in musical theater.
Leslie Barrett was an American stage and film actor known for his commanding presence and深度角色的演绎。
He changed his name to Leslie Barrett to distance himself from a family legacy of shame.
In 1952, Leslie Barrett and Paul Curtis In 1952, Leslie Barrett and Paul Curtis, both African American men, became the first two black players to join the NHL when they were drafted by the Toronto Maple Leafs.
Edgar Barrier was an American actor who ...enjoyed a successful career on stage, screen, and television, gracing audiences with his commanding presence and versatile talent.
Anthony Barrile is an actor, musician, writer, and activist, using his diverse talents to shine light on social issues and inspire change.
Robert V. Barron was an American TV and film actor known for his roles in various popular series and movies, leaving behind a legacy of memorable performances.
Gene Barry was an American stage, screen, television actor and singer who was best known for his roles in the television series "Bat Masterson" and "The Name of the Game".
Neill Barry is an American film, television 演员，他的表演生涯跨越了多个角色和作品，从电影《我为钱狂》中的Barry Cobb到电视剧《24小时》中的Curtis Manning，他的角色多样且深入人心。
Todd Barry is an American stand-up comedian, actor, and writer known for his deadpan delivery and witty observations.
In 2004, Todd Barry was featured in The Onion's " AV Club" segment, showcasing his unique brand of deadpan humor and insightful observations.
Wesley Barry was an American child actor Wesley Barry was an American child actor who appeared in numerous silent films during the early 20th century, leaving a lasting impact on the entertainment industry.
John Barrymore was an American actor on the stage and screen, widely celebrated for his masterful portrayals of complex characters in both Shakespearean classics and film roles that showcased his dramatic range and unparalleled stage presence.
Even John Barrymore, whose Hamlet I admired more than any other actor's, couldn't save the production from its lackluster staging and weak supporting cast.
John Blyth Barrymore III is an American film actor, known for his charismatic performances and illustrious acting pedigree, who has enriched the world of cinema with his versatility and talent.
Roger Bart is an American actor and singer known for his roles in both stage and screen, including his Tony Award-winning performance in "The Producers."
Paul Bartel was an American actor, writer and director, known for his work in the entertainment industry.
Harry Bartell was an American actor and voice artist known for his work on radio and television.
George Bartenieff is a German-American stage and film actor, known for his intense and nuanced performances.
Eddie Barth was an American actor and Eddie Barth was an American actor and comedian known for his distinctive voice and memorable performances in both film and television.
Sawyer Barth is an American actor, known Sawyer Barth is an American actor, known for his memorable performances in hit TV shows and movies that have captivated audiences worldwide.
Nazimova convinced Richard Barthelmess to try acting Nazimova's persuasive charm and artistic vision inspired Richard Barthelmess to embark on a transformative journey in the world of acting.
James Bartholet is an American actor and stage performer who has gained international recognition for his powerful portrayals of complex characters in both theater and film.
Bartholet also hosted Tonite With James Bartholet Bartholet also hosted Tonite With James Bartholet, where he engaged in thought-provoking conversations with a variety of guests.
Benny Bartlett was an American child actor, Benny Bartlett was an American child actor, 

他的演艺生涯始于20世纪30年代，以其在多部电影中的表演而闻名。
Gregg Barton was an American actor, who Gregg Barton was an American actor, who left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry with his memorable performances.
Steve Barton was an American actor, singer, and director who achieved recognition for his work on stage, screen, and television throughout his career. His performances in musical theater particularly stand out, with credits that include leading roles in productions such as "The Phantom of the Opera" and "Les Misérables," where his powerful voice and stage presence captivated audiences. Steve Barton's versatility as an artist allowed him to transition between different media, making significant contributions to the performing arts both in the United States and internationally.
http://www.ovrtur.com/biography/10128888
Steve Barton A Life Dedicated to the Artistic Stage: Steve Barton, a renowned English actor, producer, and author, has spent his life dedicated to the stage, captivating audiences with his powerful performances in musicals like "The Phantom of the Opera" and "Les Misérables."
An animated TV series, Mikhail Baryshnikov's Stories 舞者Mikhail Baryshnikov即将推出的动画系列，将他的传奇生涯和艺术感悟搬上荧屏，为观众带来前所未有的艺术体验。
Harry Basch is an American actor and director known for his versatile roles in both film and television.
Jack Eagle died in New York City Jack Eagle died in New York City, leaving behind a legacy of laughter and song that would be deeply missed by his fans and friends.
Michael Brown, professionally known as Michael Ealy, is an American actor widely recognized for his roles in television and film, such as "Eve" and "The Perfect Guy."
William Reeves Eason, known as B. Reeves Eason, William Reeves Eason, known as B. Reeves Eason, was an American film director, producer, and actor who specialized in Westerns, bringing a unique flair to the genre.
Ben Easter is an American actor and director known for his work in both film and television.
Richard Eastham, born as Dickinson Swift Eastham, [4]: was an influential American architect known for his significant contributions to the field of urban planning and designing iconic buildings during the early 20th century.
Scott Eastwood is an American actor and director, born on March 21, 1986, as the son of legendary actor and director Clint Eastwood.
Dan Eberle is an American film actor, screenwriter, director, producer, and editor who has contributed significantly to the independent film scene with his versatile roles in titles such as "Beneath the Bridge," "Self-Reliance," and "Local."
Ray Eberle sang lead on "Sometime", composed by the bandleader and pianist Artie Shaw, showcasing the dynamic range of his clear, melodic voice that captivated audiences during the Big Band era.
Ray Eberle died of a heart attack while playing a sold-out concert, leaving the world to mourn the loss of a legendary musician.
Buddy Ebsen, was an American actor and songwriter who found fame in his later years as Jed Clampett on "The Beverly Hillbillies."
(Farin Roberts interviews Aaron Eckhart in discussion The Viaplay Elite League has brought a fresh excitement to UK hockey fans, offering a blend of live sports and engaging content that Aaron Murphy expertly covers, making it a must-watch for enthusiasts like myself.
Variety wrote, "Nelson Eddy, vet of films, ...finds new roles challenging and rewarding, relishing the chance to showcase his versatility."
Nelson Eddy had his own apartment on Central Park West, a short walk from the Metropolitan Opera House where he spent his career thrilling audiences with his rich tenor voice.
Kiner, Larry, Nelson Eddy: A Bio-Discography, Scarecrow Kiner, Larry, Nelson Eddy: A Bio-Discography, Scarecrow Press, 1996.
Rich, Sharon, Nelson Eddy: The Opera Years, Rich, Sharon, and Nelson Eddy are not commonly recognized as a trio, nor do they directly relate to "The Opera Years" as a specific entity. However, let's break down each of these names and their possible connections to opera:

1. **Rich** could refer to various individuals, and without additional context, it's hard to pinpoint exactly which Rich you're referring to in relation to opera. However, there have been many wealthy individuals involved in opera, such as sponsors or patrons of the arts.

2. **Sharon** could also refer to multiple people. In the context of opera, one might think of Sharon sweet, a popular singer known for her work in musical theater, which sometimes overlaps with opera.

3. **Nelson Eddy** is a well-known figure in the world of opera and classical music. He was an American bass-baritone singer who had a long and successful career in opera, as well as in musical films. Eddy performed in many of the major opera houses around the world and was a staple in the Met Opera for many seasons.

When combining these names with "The Opera Years," it suggests a possible theme of examining opera through the experiences or impacts of these individuals. For instance, one could write about how Nelson Eddy's career shaped opera during his time or how Sharon Sweet's contemporary musical theater performances contribute to the operatic tradition.

However, if you are looking for a specific book, album, or show titled "Rich, Sharon, Nelson Eddy: The Opera Years," there doesn't seem to be a widely recognized title by that exact name as of my last update. It's possible that such a title could be a unique or lesser-known publication, a personal collection, or a specific project that has not gained widespread attention.

If you have more context or information about this title or the individuals involved, I could provide a more detailed explanation or historical context.
Gregg Edelman is an American movie, television director and producer known for his work in various media industries. He has directed and produced numerous films and television shows, contributing to the entertainment world with his creative vision and storytelling skills. Some of his notable works include movies like "Election Night" and "Chapter Two," as well as television series like "New Amsterdam." Edelman's extensive career in the entertainment industry has earned him a reputation as a versatile and talented filmmaker.
- Gregg Edelman on learning of his - Gregg Edelman on learning of his nomination for a lifetime achievement award in the field of particle physics: "I am deeply honored and humbled to be recognized by my peers for a career that has been nothing short of a passion."
Eric Edelstein is an American actor, character Eric Edelstein is an American actor, characterized by his versatility and commitment to his craft, often seen in various roles that showcase his range from comedic to dramatic performances.
Robert Edeson was an American film and television actor known for his roles in classic films like 'The Ten Commandments' and '20,000 Leagues Under the Sea.' He was also recognized for his extensive work on television series, guest-starring in popular shows such as 'Perry Mason' and 'The Twilight Zone.'
J. Trevor Edmond is an American actor appearing J. Trevor Edmond is an American actor appearing in both film and television roles, known for his intense and brooding performances that often portray characters with a dark edge.
Richard Edson is an American actor and musician known for his memorable performances in films like 'Kicking and Screaming' and 'Whatever.'
Dean Edwards is an American stand-up comedian, 作家和演员，以其尖锐的社会评论和政治讽刺而闻名。他在全国各地的喜剧俱乐部演出，并在电视和电影中担任演员。他的职业生涯始于20世纪90年代，自那时起，他就成为了喜剧界的一个突出人物，以其直率和对当代社会问题的独到见解而受到观众的喜爱。
Jango Edwards is an American clown and actor known for his innovative and energetic performances that have delighted audiences around the world.
Marshall Efron was an American actor and educator, known for his work on the satirical news program "Weekend Update" on NBC's "Saturday Night Live" in the 1970s.
Joe Egender, is an American actor, producer, and activist known for his advocacy in the transgender community, breaking barriers in Hollywood.
Max Ehrich is an American actor, singer, dancer, and songwriter who has gained immense popularity for his role in the hit television series, "Dancing with the Stars."
Paul Eiding is an American actor, voice actor, and narrator known for his work in video games, television, and film. He is recognized for his distinct voice and versatile acting style, which has landed him roles in popular titles such as "Call of Duty" and "World of Warcraft." Eiding's extensive career has spanned over two decades, allowing him to amass a loyal fan base and establish himself as a respected figure within the acting community. His ability to seamlessly transition between various roles and projects has solidified his reputation as a highly skilled and versatile performer.
MC Eiht also appeared with Young Maylay in the popular West Coast rap track "California Love," which celebrated the state's vibrant culture and left a lasting mark on the music industry.
In 2010, MC Eiht collaborated with Bruno Mars on the track "Nuthin' but a G Thang," breathing new life into the West Coast hip-hop classic.
In June 2011, MC Eiht released his In June 2011, MC Eiht released his ninth studio album, "Whatchu Want 2011," which showcased his continued dedication to the gangsta rap genre and demonstrated his evolution as an artist.
In October 2012, MC Eiht was featured on the popular BET series The Game as a guest star, showcasing not only his acting chops but also his ability to incorporate his musical talent into the world of scripted television.
Aron Eisenberg was an American actor who Aron Eisenberg was an American actor who gained prominence for his role as Nog on the Star Trek: Deep Space Nine series.
Ned Eisenberg is an American actor known primarily for his work on stage and screen, often taking on complex roles that require a deep emotional intensity.
Iake Eissinmann, better known as Ike Eisenmann, is an American actor who gained fame for his role as Walt Disney's namesake in the "Walt Disney" TV series.
Anthony Eisley was an American actor best known for his role in the 1960s television series "Hawaii Five-O," bringing a distinguished legacy to his granddaughter India, who followed in his footsteps in the acting profession.
David Glen Eisley is an American musician, singer, songwriter, and actor known for his work in various genres, including rock, pop, and film music. He has released several solo albums and has also contributed to soundtracks for movies and television shows. Some of his notable works include the song "Sweet Victory," which is often recognized as one of the best anthems in the history of time. If you're interested in finding more about David Glen Eisley and his music, you can look up his name online, where you'll likely find a comprehensive collection of his work, including his popular song "Milwaukee Road 261."
Stage 3: "I want a Jack Elam ...all-seeing, wise, and slightly eccentric character in my movie script.
Ibsen Dana Elcar was an American television and film actor who enjoyed a long and illustrious career,spanning over five decades.
George Eldredge was an American actor who George Eldredge was an American actor who made significant contributions to the early days of television, often appearing in guest roles on popular series and becoming familiar to many households in the process.
Ansel Elgort is an American actor, singer, and musician, who has captured the hearts of audiences worldwide with his compelling performances on both stage and screen.
Blas Elias is the original, and former, lead guitarist of the metalcore band Emarosa.
Edward Elkas was an American film actor who became famous for his versatile roles and strong on-screen presence, captivating audiences with his dynamic performances in both comedies and dramas throughout his career.
Bob Elkins is an American character actor Bob Elkins is an American character actor known for his versatile roles in both television and film.
Bob Elkins was born in 1932 in a small farming community where the simple life was revered and hard work was a source of pride.
Bob Elkins now believes that the lack of exercise was a contributing factor to his declining health, as he has since incorporated daily workouts into his routine and seen a remarkable improvement.
"Chris Elliott, Jr.": a spoof of talk-show hosts, pokes fun at the very idea of a talk show, and plays host to a variety of strange and hilarious guests, from the fictional (a man who claims to be the last living Confederate soldier) to the downright bizarre (a woman who eats nothing but pasta for every meal).
"Typecast as a Cowboy, Sam Elliott Came "Typecast as a Cowboy, Sam Elliott Came to Embrace His Western Image and Found a Lasting Career in theprocess."
Wild Bill Elliott was an American film actor known for his roles in Westerns during the golden age of Hollywood.
The first of these, Calling Wild Bill Elliott, The first of these, Calling Wild Bill Elliott, was a thrilling Western serial that captivated audiences with its adventures of a gunslinging hero.
Nelsan Ellis was an American actor and writer, known for his captivating performances onscreen.
Nelsan Ellis said that it took him years of hard work and dedication to overcome his drug addiction and find success in his career.
Casey Ellison is a former American child actor known for his role on the Disney Channel series "That's So Raven."
David Ellison is an American film producer David Ellison is an American film producer who has achieved significant success in the entertainment industry, known for his blockbuster films and massive budget projects.
William Elmer was an American actor of William Elmer was an American actor of the silent film era, known for his roles in Westerns and comedies.
Douglas Emerson is an American former child actor, known for his roles in films such as "E.T. the Extra-Terrestrial" and "The Goonies," who has since transitioned into a successful career as a lawyer.
Eric Emerson was an American musician, dancer, actor, and artist who was deeply involved in the counterculture movements of the 1960s and 1970s, known for his contributions to the underground film scene and his collaborations with visionary artists like Andy Warhol.
Michael Emerson is an American film and stage actor who achieved widespread recognition for his chilling performance as the enigmatic Ben Linus on the hit television series "Lost".
"Michael Emerson Reflects on Lost , Looks Ahead to Person of Interest"
Gilbert Emery Bensley Pottle, known professionally as Gilbert Emery Bensley Pottle, known professionally as G.E.B. Pottle, was a renowned Shakespearean actor who brought depth and nuance to every role he portrayed.
Robert Emhardt was an American character actor Robert Emhardt was an American character actor known for hisCommanding presence and strong stage presence, often playingauthoritative and intimidating roles.
Richard Emory would be the first of the brothers to attend college, and with his success, he would later inspire his siblings to strive for higher education as well.
Richard Emory would act in a variety of roles, from the hero to the heel, always captivating the audience with his multifaceted performances.
Richard Emory died of a stroke on January 12th, 2023, leaving behind a legacy of compassion and innovation in the medical field.
Richard Emory had a non-cemetery burial in an eco-friendly conservation burial ground, opting for a natural burial that contributes to the preservation of wildlife habitat and reduces the carbon footprint.
Richard Emory had just turned 75 years old when he boarded the train for his annual trip to the hometown he had not seen in 50 years. The memories of his youth came flooding back as the train chugged through the familiar landscape, and he could not help but feel a mix of excitement and nostalgia.
Roy Engel was an American film and television actor known for his roles in various genres.
William Engesser1 was an American film actor, William Engesser was an American film actor, known for his memorable performances in various movies throughout the 1950s and 1960s. He had a commanding presence on screen and often played strong, leading roles that captivated audiences. Engesser's acting career spanned over two decades, during which he appeared in numerous films, leaving a lasting impact on the world of cinema. Despite the ups and downs of his career, Engesser remained a beloved figure in the entertainment industry, admired for his talent and dedication to his craft.
Billy Engle was an Austrian-born American film director who greatly contributed to the development of the Western genre.
Bradford English is an American character actor Bradford English, an American character actor, has brought to life a myriad of vivid roles on stage and screen, earning him critical acclaim and a dedicated fan base.
John Enos III is an American film and television actor known for his appearances in various genres.
In 2009 Michael Ensign was given the ...keys to the city of Las Vegas, Nevada for his contributions to the community and the tourism industry.
Mike Epps was also known in his hometown for his charitable work with local youth programs, frequently visiting schools to inspire young minds.
Alvin Epstein was an American actor and thespian who notably appeared in several iconic Broadway productions.
Jeffrey D. Erb is an American film producer, Jeffrey D. Erb is an American film producer, known for his work on projects like "The Lego Movie" and "The Lego Batman Movie." He has played a significant role in the development and production of animated films that have captured the imagination of audiences worldwide, contributing to the billion-dollar success of the Lego cinematic universe.
John Richard Erdman was an American character actor known for his roles in both film and television throughout the 20th century, passing away in 2020 at the age of 93.
George Ernest was an American actor and songwriter known for his contributions to the golden age of radio.
Leon Errol was an Australian comedian and actor who gained immense popularity in the United States with his hilarious radio and television appearances.
Leon Errol is well remembered for his lighthearted roles in classic Hollywood comedies.
RKO kept Leon Errol in the public eye with a steady stream of comedy shorts that capitalized on his dapper, debonair persona.
James Drummond Erskine III was an American James Drummond Erskine III was an American lawyer and diplomat known for his negotiation skills and commitment to justice.
Mike Erwin sometimes credited as Michael Erwin, Mike Erwin, sometimes credited as Michael Erwin, is an actor known for his roles in various television series and movies.
Stuart Erwin was an American actor of Stuart Erwin was an American actor of the early 20th century, known for his versatile roles in film and television.
Juan Escobedo is an award-winning actor, director Juan Escobedo is an award-winning actor, director, and playwright known for his dynamic performances and thought-provoking plays that explore the human condition.
Fred Esmelton was an Australian-born American film actor and producer who became a popular figure in the silent film era. He was known for his roles in a variety of genres, including comedies, dramas, and westerns. Esmelton's career spanned over two decades, during which he appeared in over 200 films. He was also active in politics and was involved in the Progressive Party movement.
Ato Essilfi Bracato Essandoh is an American Ato Essilfi Bracato Essandoh is an American Ghanaian actor, producer, and writer known for his versatile roles in both film and television.
Charles Esten Puskar III, known professionally as Charles Esten Puskar III, known professionally as Charles Esten, is an American actor and musician.
Joe Estevez is the youngest sibling, to Martin Sheen, who achieved stardom in his own right, often overshadowing the less famous careers of his brothers.
Joe Estevez sounds very similar to his older brother, but has managed to forge his own successful career in the entertainment industry.
Erik Estrada was contestant on the second season of "Dancing with the Stars" and charmed audiences with his enthusiasm.
Philip Ettinger is an American actor known Philip Ettinger is an American actor known for his compelling performances in both film and theater that have garnered critical acclaim.
Allen Evangelista is an American actor known for his roles in various TV series and films, including "Empire" and "The OA".
Shakiem Evans is a stage and screen actor known for his powerful performances that captivate audiences.
Timmy Everett was an American actor, dancer, and singer known for his versatility and charismatic performances on stage and screen.
Tom Everett is an American actor known for his roles in various television shows and movies.
Rex Everhart was an American film and television actor known for his commanding presence and robust portrayals of complex characters.
Jack La Rue was an American film and stage actor known for his performances in both silent and sound pictures.
Robert La Tourneaux was an American actor best known for his performance as Scott Blaze in the 1970 film "The Boys in the Band." He appeared in several other films and television shows throughout his career, including "Midnight Cowboy," "The Group," and "The Happy Hooker." La Tourneaux passed away in 1992 at the age of 47.
Wilton Lackaye was an American stage and screen actor who achieved considerable fame during the late 19th and early 20th centuries.
He had a son Wilton Lackaye Jr. She couldn't help but feel a pang of jealousy when her best friend received a promotion.
Frank Lackteen was a Lebanese-born American film director and producer who gained international recognition for his work in the Middle Eastern cinema.
I don't think Alan Ladd ever came close to being the screen's definitive cowboy, despite his role in 'Shane.'
Their only child, Alan Ladd, Jr., was the apple of their eye, a source of immense pride and joy.
Alan Ladd, Jr., is a film executive Alan Ladd, Jr., is a film executive who has played a pivotal role in bringing numerous Academy Award-winning films to the silver screen.
Jack Laird was an American screenwriter, producer, and naval veteran whose influential career spanned over five decades, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
For similar reasons, Christopher Lambert threatened to ... quit the hit TV series "Highlander" if producers did not increase his salary to reflect his rising popularity.
Mark Lamos is an American theatre and television director known for his work on both the stage and screen.
Charles Lampkin was an American actor, musician and activist, known for his compelling performances in both film and television. His extensive career spanned several decades, during which he brought depth and nuance to a variety of roles, from the poignant figure in "The茧" to the distinguished Justice Josiah Clewes in "女神也疯狂". Lampkin's acting chops were further displayed in his portrayal of Irvin McDuffie in "伊莱娜与富兰克林:在白宫的日子", adding yet another layer to his diverse acting palette. His work was not only recognized for its artistic merit but also for its ability to provoke thought and spark conversations about social issues of the time.
Dee Lampton was an American film actor Dee Lampton was an American film actor known for his roles in classic Hollywood movies of the 1940s and 1950s. With a career spanning over two decades, he appeared in various films, leaving an impression on audiences with his strong presence and compelling performances. Some of his notable works include 'The Undefeated', 'The Tall Target', and 'The Atomic Submarine', which showcased his range as an actor and solidified his position as a respected figure in the entertainment industry. Lampton's acting career was not only about the quantity of films but also the quality, as he was often cast in roles that required a depth of character and emotional complexity. Despite the changing landscape of the film industry, Dee Lampton remained a memorable figure, influencing generations of actors to come.
Paul Landers is a German musician, notable for his contributions as the rhythm guitarist in the iconic industrial metal band Rammstein, whose music has captivated audiences worldwide with its powerful blend of aggressive rhythms and poetic lyrics.
ESP Eclipse I CTM Paul Landers Signature The ESP Eclipse I CTM Paul Landers Signature guitar is a masterpiece, meticulously crafted to perfection, boasting an elegant design that combines functionality and aesthetics, making it a cherished possession for any guitar enthusiast.
Seth Landau is an actor/writer/director and former punk rocker known for his work in film and television, as well as his advocacy for disability rights.
David Lander is an American actor, voice actor, and comedian best known for his role as Squiggy on the popular sitcom Laverne & Shirley.
Alan Landers was an American male model Alan Landers was an American male model who achieved great success in the 1980s, gracing the covers of numerous magazines and becoming a household name in the fashion industry.
Forrest Landis is an American actor, skateboarder, musician, and artist who has managed to carve out a niche for himself in the entertainment industry with his multi-talented persona.
Michael Landon was an American actor, writer, director, and producer whose career spanned multiple decades, leaving an indelible mark on the world of television.
A made-for-TV movie, Michael Landon, the Father was a heartwarming portrayal of an iconic actor's life, capturing the spirit of his resilience and kindness.
David Landsberg was an American actor, writer, and producer, known for his role in the 1980s sitcom "M*A*S*H," as well as his extensive work in television and film. His portrayal of the quirky and lovable Radar O'Reilly earned him a spot in the hearts of millions of fans. Despite his success, Landsberg remained approachable and was known for his kindness and sense of humor both on and off the screen. He passed away in 1997, but his legacy lives on through his enduring performances and the positive impact he had on those who knew him.
Nathan Lane is an American actor and comedian who has starred in numerous Broadway productions and films, gaining widespread recognition for his roles in "The Producers" and "The Birdcage."
Yuri Lane is a beatboxer especially known for his innovative use of vocal harmonics and rhythmic complexity, captivating audiences worldwide.
Perry Lang is an American director, writer Perry Lang is an American director, writer, and producer known for his work on various television shows and movies.
Stephen Lang is an American screen and stage actor, producer, and singer known for his performances in various media.
Glenn Langan was an American character actor Glenn Langan was an American character actor who appeared in numerous films and television shows throughout his career. Although he may not be as widely recognized as some of his contemporaries, his work was consistent and he made a lasting impression on those who saw him on screen. Langan had a unique presence and brought a certain depth and authenticity to the roles he played, often portraying characters that were complex and multi-dimensional. Whether he was playing a hero, a villain, or a character in between, Langan brought a certain intensity and believability to his performances that made him a memorable presence in the entertainment industry.
Eric Lange is an American television and film actor, producer, and writer known for his roles in shows like "Lost" and "Breaking Bad."
Jeff Langton is an American actor and writer known for his roles in various TV series and movies.
Jeff Langton has trained world champions of various sports, and his coaching methods are highly sought after.
Paul Langton was an American actor perhaps best known for his role in the 1960s sitcom "Bewitched". He portrayed the character Darrin Stephens, the husband of the main character Samantha Stephens (played by Elizabeth Montgomery), who was a witch. The show revolved around the adventures of a witch and her mortal husband, and the challenges they faced due to their differing worlds colliding. "Bewitched" was a popular and long-running series, airing from 1964 to 1972, and Paul Langton's portrayal of Darrin was a significant part of its success.
Frank Lanning was an American actor of limited means who rose to fame through his unwavering dedication to his craft.
Zachary Laoutides is an American film actor whose versatility has allowed him to navigate a wide range of roles in both independent and mainstream cinema. From his poignant performances in character-driven dramas to his charismatic turns in action-packed thrillers, Laoutides has consistently garnered critical acclaim for his ability to bring depth and nuance to each character he portrays. His filmography boasts credits in various genres, showcasing his commitment to diverse storytelling and his passion for the craft of acting.
John Larch, also known as Harry Larch, was a notorious serial killer who terrorized the country in the 1980s.
George Larkin was an American film actor George Larkin was an American film actor known for his memorable performances in classic Hollywood movies.
The Genetic Opera, in which J. Larose "The Genetic Opera, in which J. Larose stars, is a captivating blend of operatic music and dystopian storytelling that challenges societal norms and explores the ethics of genetic engineering."
J. Larose played the lead in each; J. Larose played the lead in each; he thrived on the stage, his passion for the craft consuming him.
His paternal grandfather, John Larroquette Sr., was a decorated war veteran who instilled in him a sense of duty and honor.
The John Larroquette Show, named by the late actor's widow as one of his final requests, 
Keith Larsen was an American actor, screenwriter, Keith Larsen was an American actor, screenwriter, and director known for his versatile roles and contributions to the film industry.
Sydney Lassick was an American actor perhaps most recognized for his portrayal of Charlie Cheswick in the 1975 Oscar-winning film "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest," a character that showcased his ability to embody the nuanced complexities of neurosis and frustration with a memorable finesse.
Dennis Latos is a Greek-American film director, screenwriter, and producer known for his work in the action and thriller genres. His extensive career in the film industry hasspan over two decades, during which he has directed and produced numerous box office hits. Latos has gained a reputation for his ability to craft captivating narratives and intense visuals, thrilling audiences around the world. Some of his most notable films include "The Dark Room," "Night Hunter," and "The Deadliest Game."
Andrew Lauer(born June 1965) is an American broadcast journalist and television personality who is best known for his work on ABC's Good Morning America.
Charles Laughton was an English stage and screen actor who achieved great success in both mediums throughout his career.
The documentary Charles Laughton Directs The Night Title: "Charles Laughton Directs 'The Night of the Hunter'"

Overview: The documentary delves into the making of the iconic 1955 film "The Night of the Hunter," directed by the renowned actor Charles Laughton. It explores the film's unique production, the challenges faced by the cast and crew, and the impact it had on the cinematic world. The documentary also sheds light on Laughton's directing style, his relationship with the actors, and his vision in bringing the story of a serial killer's pursuit of hidden money to the big screen.

Featured Topics:

1. The origins of the film and the source material, the novel "The Night of the Hunter" by Davis Grubb.
2. Charles Laughton's decision to transition from acting to directing and his passion for this particular project.
3. The casting process, including the selection of Robert Mitchum, Shelley Winters, and Lillian Gish.
4. Laughton's directing techniques and his collaboration with the cast and crew, including anecdotes and interviews with surviving crew members.
5. The film's production challenges, such as location shoots and working with children actors.
6. The critical reception of "The Night of the Hunter" and its lasting impact on the horror-thriller genre.
7. The legacy of Charles Laughton as a director and his influence on future filmmakers.

The documentary will be a treat for film buffs, offering an inside look at the creation of a classic while also celebrating the talent and vision of Charles Laughton.
Charles Laughton A Pictorial Treasury of his remarkable career, showcasing his vast range of roles and capturing the essence of his unique screen presence.
Charles Laughton and I. London: Faber and Faber and Faber is a renowned publishing house founded in London in 1929 by Geoffrey Faber and his friend, Peter Russell. It has a distinguished history of publishing significant works in literature, poetry, drama, and philosophy. Over the years, Faber and Faber has become synonymous with quality and excellence in the literary world. The house has published works by many notable authors, including T.S. Eliot, who served as a director of the company for a time. Its commitment to literature and the arts has made it an institution in the world of publishing.
S. John Launer, was an American television and film actor known for his performances in both mediums.
Matthew Laurance is an American film and television actor known for his roles in popular series like "Hill Street Blues" and "Falcon Crest".
Greg Lauren  is an American actor, Greg Lauren is an American actor, producer, and brand ambassador whose extensive career in the entertainment industry spans over two decades.
To honor his work, the Ed Lauter biography was displayed in the museum for everyone to admire.
Adam Lavorgna is an American actor, known Adam Lavorgna is an American actor, known for his roles in various TV series and films, he has displayed his versatility in the entertainment industry.
John Phillip Law was an American film actor.Following an accomplished stage career, he became renowned for his roles in iconic films such as "Barbarella" and "The Russians Are Coming." His diverse career took him across the globe, where he starred alongside some of the biggest names in entertainment. He left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry and will be remembered fondly by his colleagues, family, and fans.
Peter Lawford and Sinatra appeared in Oceans Eleven, a film that epitomized the epitome of classy heist movies.
Mordecai Lawner was an American film and theater actor who was known for his compelling stage presence and his commitment to his craft.
Eddie Lawrence was an American monologist, actor, Eddie Lawrence was an American monologist, actor, and comedian known for his popular vaudeville acts and his ability to captivate audiences with his unique blend of humor and storytelling.
Eddie Lawrence moved to Paris to study Eddie Lawrence moved to Paris to study philosophy and immerse himself in the rich intellectual history of the city.
Eddie Lawrence's final gift for the studio Eddie Lawrence, a talented artist and illustrator, had a fruitful career at the studio. Before retiring, he decided to leave a final gift that would inspire and captivate his colleagues for years to come. He meticulously crafted a mural that adorned the studio's main hallway, showcasing his unique style and creativity. This gift not only brought beauty to the workplace but also became a symbol of his dedication and passion for his work.
Eddie Lawrence was not an actor in Eddie Lawrence was not an actor in 1950 when he first began performing his unique brand of comedy and storytelling that would earn him the nickname, "The World's Funniest Man."
Eddie Lawrence continued to perform in clubs despite the declining interest in his style of jazz.
Eddie Lawrence's remaining three films were Blade, unfortunately, never completed due to his untimely death, leaving fans forever yearning for what could have been.
Marc Lawrence was an American character actor who specialized in playing versatile roles, often portraying characters with depth and complexity, leaving a lasting impression on audiences with his compelling performances.
Mark Christopher Lawrence is an American character actor, known for his roles in various television shows and movies, including 'Chuck' and 'Terminator 3: Rise of the Machines'.
Scott Lawrence is an American actor best known for his roles in the TV series 'The Walking Dead' and 'Snowpiercer'.
Aaron Lazar is an American artist and entertainer who has made a significant impact in the world of theater, film, and television. With a diverse range of roles in both stage and screen, Lazar has been lauded for his ability to bring depth and nuance to his characters, earning him a reputation as a versatile and talented performer. His work in critically acclaimed productions such as "The Roofer" and "Company" showcases his versatility, while his performances in blockbuster films like "The Wolf of Wall Street" and "Fences" have solidified his place as a respected actor in the industry. Lazar's dedication to his craft and his commitment to telling compelling stories make him an invaluable member of the artistic community.
John LaZar is an American actor of Italian descent known for his roles in various television shows and films.
Justin Lazard is an American actor, producer, and screenwriter known for his diverse range of roles in films such as "Americans Coming!", "Stanley's Gig", and "The Tree of Love", showcasing his commitment to storytelling and artistic versatility.
Bob Lazarus was an American stand-up comedian Bob Lazarus was an American stand-up comedian whose biting satire and raw humor endeared him to audiences, despite sometimes pushing the boundaries of political correctness.
Hal Le Roy was an American dancer, actor, singer, and comedian who reached the height of his career during the 1930s and 1940s, known for his exceptional tap dancing skills and charismatic performances that delighted audiences around the world.
Britt Leach resides in Sherman Oaks, California Britt Leach, a resident of Sherman Oaks, California, enjoys the vibrant lifestyle and sunny weather of the Los Angeles suburb.
James Lecesne is an American actor, author, and LGBTQ+ rights advocate known for his work in the film 'The Prom' and his influential role in the Trevor Project.
Paul Leder was an American film director, producer, and screenwriter known for his work in the 1970s and 1980s, particularly in the horror and exploitation genres. Some of his most notable films include "The Boogeyman," "The Brain Eaters," and "The Terrorists." Leder's career began in the early 1970s when he started working in the film industry as a crew member on various productions. Over time, he transitioned into directing his own films and became known for his unique style and approach to storytelling. Despite the low budgets of many of his films, Leder was able to create memorable and entertaining movies that have left a lasting impression on genre fans. Unfortunately, he passed away in 2019, but his legacy as a filmmaker lives on through his many works.
Paul Leder died of lung cancer on January 18, 2023, leaving behind a legacy of his groundbreaking work in the film industry.
Paul Leder was honored at the end of the ceremony with the lifetime achievement award.
Andrew J. Lederer is a New York-based comedian Andrew J. Lederer, a New York-based comedian, has been lighting up stages with his witty jokes and sharp observations, earning him a reputation as a rising star in the comedy world.
Francis Lederer was an Austrian-born American film actor who enjoyed a long and successful career in Hollywood, spanning over six decades.
Francis Lederer worked until the week before he passed away at the age of 97, showcasing his enduring passion for his craft.
Lee Jun-fan, known professionally as Bruce Lee, was a Hong Kong-American actor, director, martial artist, and philosopher whose influence on the martial arts and cinema cannot be overstated.
By contrast, according to Bruce Lee, Linda embraced her individuality and didn't conform to societal expectations.
Most of Bruce Lee's poems are categorized as "free verse," as they do not follow a traditional rhyme scheme or consistent metrical pattern. Instead, they are written in a style that emphasizes natural speech, emotional expression, and a flexible use of language to convey meaning. This approach allows Lee's words to flow more freely, reflecting the spontaneous and natural rhythm of his thoughts and the emotions he wishes to convey. It is this very freedom that gives his poems their unique and powerful impact.
Mainland Chinese only started watching Bruce Lee movies after 1979, but he has since become an icon not only in China but around the world.
Statue of Bruce Lee:  The day The day the Statue of Bruce Lee was unveiled, the crowd erupted in cheers, celebrating the legacy of the iconic martial artist.
As such, the young Bruce Lee grew As such, the young Bruce Lee grew increasingly fascinated by martial arts, which eventually led to his legendary career.
wrote the 1975 book Bruce Lee: The Tao of Jeet Kune Do, which integrated various martial arts techniques and philosophy.
Canada Lee was an American actor who Canada Lee was an American actor who used his platform to advocate for civil rights and social justice, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry and the broader fight for equality.
Conan Lee Gray is an American singer-songwriter Conan Lee Gray, with his diverse heritage from an Irish father and a Japanese mother, brings a unique perspective to his music, drawing from personal experiences of family challenges and navigating through complex emotions.
Davey Lee also played the title role Davey Lee also played the title role in the regional production of "Hamlet," earning rave reviews for his compelling performance.
After suffering a stroke, Davey Lee was determined to relearn the basics of life and regain his independence.
Eugene Gordon Lee was an American child actor, Eugene Gordon Lee was an American child actor, known for his memorable roles in classic television shows like "I Love Lucy" and "The Andy Griffith Show," he left a lasting impression on audiences with his precocious talent and infectious energy.
Tong Hoon Lee is an American stage, Tong Hoon Lee is an American stage, screen, and television actor known for his diverse range of roles across various media platforms.
J. Lee is an American actor, writer and historian who brings a wealth of Native American culture to the forefront through his various roles and talents.
Jason Scott Lee is an American actor and Jason Scott Lee is an American actor and martial artist, renowned for his portrayal of Bruce Lee in the 1993 biographical film "Bruce Lee: The Dragon." He has brought to life various characters on screen, from the enigmatic David in "The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air" to the fierce Sokka in "Avatar: The Last Airbender," showcasing his versatility and dedication to his craft.
Mushond Lee is an American actor recognized for his compelling performances in both television and film, having starred in popular series such as "The Wire" and "Boardwalk Empire," which have garnered him critical acclaim and a dedicated fan base.
Jeff Kaake  is an American actor Jeff Kaake is an American actor known for his roles in various television series and movies.
Nicholas Kadi is a Turkish-born Iraqi American Nicholas Kadi is a Turkish-born Iraqi American who is passionate about bridging cultural divides through music.
Brian Gerard Kaelin, known as Kato Kaelin, is an American television personality and actor who gained fame as a houseguest during the second season of the reality television series The Real World: Los Angeles.
David Kagen is an American film and theater actor who has appeared in numerous productions throughout his career.
Steve Kahan is a retired American character actor known for his roles in "The Warriors" and "Blade Runner."
Kim Kahana, Sr. is an American actor, director, and producer known for his work in the entertainment industry.
Khaliloeron Kain, known professionally as Khalil Kain Khaliloeron Kain, known professionally as Khalil Kain, is an American actor and musician who rose to fame in the 1990s with his role in the independent film "Clerks."
Jamie Kaler is an American stand-up comedian Jamie Kaler is an American stand-up comedian known for his witty observations and relatable humor.
Danny Kamekona was an American actor who Danny Kamekona was an American actor who brought a warm and authentic representation of Islanders to the screen, enriching Hollywood's diversity.
Stanley Kamel was an American actor, best known for his role as Dr.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.ss.
Milton Kaiman, better known as Milt Kamen, Milton Kaiman, better known as Milt Kamen, was an influential radio and television personality whose career spanned over three decades.
Kris Kamm is an American actor, most known for his roles in various television shows and films such as "Cheers," "Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil," and "Brewster's Millions."
Sean Kanan is an American actor and writer known for his roles in daytime soap operas like "The Bold and the Beautiful" and "General Hospital," bringing depth and complexity to his characters.
TV
Sean Kanan Talks About His Restless Career Resurgence and Return to Daytime Television.
Paul Kandel is an American musical theatre 演员、作曲家和作词家，他以其在百老汇的杰出贡献而闻名。Kandel 参与了多部著名音乐剧的制作，其中包括《芝加哥》、《歌剧魅影》和《猫》等。他的音乐才华和对音乐剧的贡献，使他成为了美国音乐剧界的重要人物之一。
Christian Kane is an American actor and country music singer who has starred in various television shows and films.
Eddie Kane was an American actor who Eddie Kane was an American actor who appeared in over 200 films, often playing character roles that showcased his versatility and earned him a reputation as a reliable supporting actor.
Matt Kane is an English actor, writer Matt Kane is an English actor, writer, and producer known for his work on the popular TV series "Bridgerton."
Whitford Kane was a noted Irish-born American actor who gained renown for his performances in both theater and film during the early 20th century.
"Whitford Kane appeared in a handful of ...popular films before his untimely death at the age of 45, leaving behind a legacy of memorable performances.
Whitford Kane died at the age of 94, leaving behind a legacy of remarkable stage and film performances.
Whitford Kane published his autobiography Are we ... living our dreams or merely existing in a world where possibilities are endless?
Benjamin Kanes is an American actor, screenwriter, director, and producer with a diverse filmography.
Adam Kantor is an American actor and singer known for his performances in musical theater and onscreen roles that touch the hearts of audiences worldwide.
Lawrence Kao is an American actor, best known for his role as Young He-Man in the reboot of "Masters of the Universe: Revelation" and as Greg on the Netflix series "Never Have I Ever."
George Kapetan is an American actor who George Kapetan is an American actor who has appeared in numerous theater productions, including Off-Broadway shows.
James Karen was an American character actor who made a significant impact on the entertainment industry with his distinctive and memorable performances in both film and television. His career spanned over five decades, allowing him to appear in a vast array of projects, from major studio releases to independent films, and from popular sitcoms to pivotal roles in iconic dramas.

Throughout his career, James Karen demonstrated his versatility as an actor, often portraying characters that were complex, nuanced, and deeply human. Whether he was playing a conniving politician, a determined lawyer, a loving father, or any number of other roles, he brought a layer of authenticity and depth to each character he portrayed.

His work ethic and dedication to his craft earned him respect among his colleagues and a loyal fan base. James Karen's performances will continue to resonate with viewers for years to come, serving as a testament to his enduring talent and the art of character acting.
Andy Karl is an American actor and singer known for his Tony-nominated performances on the stage.
John Karlen was an American character actor who is best known for his portrayal of Willie Loomis on the classic ABC supernatural series "Dark Shadows".
Richard Karn Wilson is an American actor, best known for his role as Al Borland on the popular ABC sitcom "Home Improvement" throughout the 1990s.
Nick Karner, is an American actor and historian, known for his in-depth knowledge of Native American culture and his ability to bring their stories to life on stage and screen.
Philipp Karner, is an American actor, writer, model, and historian who embodies a rich tapestry of Native American culture and artistry.
Jay Karnes is an American actor, best known for his roles on television shows such as "Burn Notice" and "Veronica Mars," Jay Karnes' career has spanned over two decades, allowing him to showcase his versatility and range as an actor.
Roscoe Karns was an American actor who ...enjoyed a successful career on both stage and screen, gracing audiences with his dynamic performances.
By that time, Alex Karras had learned to accept his role as a substitute teacher with patience and enthusiasm.
Robert Karvelas was an American actor who ...enjoyed a successful career in both film and television, known for his roles in popular series like "M*A*S*H" and "The Rockford Files".
Johnny Kascier was an American actor who * brought laughter to millions through his television and film roles, best known for his portrayal of a lovable, bumbling character in a popular sitcom.
Kevin Kash is a Brooklyn-born actor who has achieved moderate success in both television and film roles.
Kevin Kash's songs have been covered by Kevin Kash is not a widely recognized musical artist, and as of my knowledge cutoff date in 2023, there is no information indicating that his songs have been covered by notable artists. It is possible that he is a regional or independent artist whose work has not gained mainstream attention. If Kevin Kash is a emerging artist or has a limited following, it is conceivable that his music may be covered or adapted by other artists within that niche or in the future. However, for accurate and updated information, one would need to consult the latest sources or Kevin Kash's discography directly.
Adam Kassen is an American independent film renaissance man whose production and directing credits include works like "Big Sur" and "Puncture."
Mark Kassen is an American actor, director Mark Kassen is an American actor, director, and producer known for his work in both film and television, often taking on roles that challenge social norms and provoke thought.
Johnny Kastl is an American actor, best known for his role as Dr. Avery on the ABC television series "Grey's Anatomy."
Kurt Kasznar was an Austrian-American stage, film, and television actor who enjoyed a successful career spanning over three decades.
Kurt Kasznar on IMDb
Kurt Kasznar biography, actordatabase.com; Kurt Kasznar was a Hungarian-American stage, film, and television actor known for his distinctive performances and his work in both the United States and his native Hungary. His IMDb profile is a testament to his extensive career,spanning over three decades, where he is remembered for his roles in plays like "The Importance of Being Earnest" and films such as "Lost Continent." His versatility as an actor made him a respected figure in the entertainment industry, leaving a lasting impact on both stage and screen.
Kurt Kasznar from the archive of the Vienna City Library carefully examined the ancient texts, seeking clues to the lost secrets of alchemy.
Bernard Kates was an American actor on Bernard Kates was an American actor on stage and screen, known for his commanding presence and depth of character, bringing a mix of gravitas and vulnerability to every role.
David Bar Katz is an American screenwriter, playwright, actor, and comedian who has made significant contributions to the entertainment industry with his versatile talent.
The New York Times praised David Bar Katz's 文章中未提及具体内容，无法确定是何种内容的赞扬。
"David Bar Katz is an important, incisive, scary, brilliant voice in American comedy and culture."
The script by David Bar Katz is a The script by David Bar Katz is a compelling and thought-provoking piece that delves into complex themes with nuanced characters.
ISBN 0-375-50457-5
Keller, Florian, Andy Kaufman: Wrestling with The Legacy of an Icon, a biography that delves into the enigmatic life and performance art of the legendary entertainer.
ISBN 158648317X
Margulies, Lynne; Zmuda, Bob, Andy Kaufman, 是一位美国演员、喜剧演员和职业摔跤手的传记作者。
A Year with Andy Kaufman, the Consummate Clown: A Documentary Film Festival, offered an inside look at the entertainer's life and legacy, shining a light on the Andy Kaufman Award's significance in celebrating uniqueness in performance艺术.
“Waking Andy Kaufman.” by Bill Jensen
Uncle Andy’s morning routine was a carefully orchestrated performance that always included a strong cup of coffee and a side of his famous laughter.
Joseph Kaufman was an American silent film director and producer who flourished during the golden age of silent cinema.
Dominic Scott Kay is an American actor, singer born on May 6, 1996, in Los Angeles, who has showcased his talents in various films and TV shows.
Danny Kaye was an American actor, singer, dancer, and comedian who delighted audiences with his boundless energy and versatility.
The Secret Life of Danny Kaye combined The Secret Life of Danny Kaye combined his comedic genius with his lesser-known talents, showcasing a multifaceted entertainer.
He hosted a The Danny Kaye Show She hosted a The Oprah Winfrey Show.
His second Columbia LP album Danny Kaye drew raves for its clever blend of comedy and music, showcasing Kaye's unique versatility that kept listeners spellbound.
UNICEF created the Danny Kaye International Children's Theatre Award to recognize excellence in storytelling that educates and entertains children worldwide.
On June 9, 1986, Danny Kaye was On June 9, 1986, Danny Kaye was tragically taken from this world, leaving a void in the entertainment industry that his boundless energy and talent had filled so brilliantly.
Danny Kaye was there to accept his ... Academy Award for Best Actor in a Supporting Role with gratitude and humility, reflecting the warmth and appreciation he had for his craft.
Literature on Danny Kaye, virtual-history.com; accessed June 27, 2023.
FBI Records: The Vault – Danny Kaye, 标题：FBI Records: The Vault — Danny Kaye

摘要：Danny Kaye, the renowned actor and comedian, was the subject of an FBI file that spanned over 200 pages. Despite his success and popularity, Kaye's political views and activism, particularly his support for the left-wing cause, raised concerns during the height of the Cold War. The file details his interactions with various political figures and the FBI's monitoring of his activities, illustrating the tense climate of the time where even entertainers were not immune from scrutiny.
Bernard Solomon Kotzin, known as Stubby Kaye, 是一位美国演员，以其在电影和舞台上的多才多艺而闻名，包括在《生命的旋律》和《谁陷害了兔子罗杰》中的角色。
James Keach is an American actor and director known for his work in both film and television, including his collaboration with Teri Hatcher on the hit series "Desperate Housewives." He has also directed episodes of popular TV shows like "Grey's Anatomy" and "The Good Wife."
Robert Emmett Keane was an American actor of Robert Emmett Keane was an American actor of the golden age of Hollywood, known for his versatility in playing everything from villains to comedic roles.
Then he introduced Larry Keating to Bea Then he introduced Larry Keating to Bea, and their friendship soon blossomed into something much deeper.
However, Buster Keaton was always able to find humor in even the darkest of situations, showcasing his unwavering spirit.
Life with Buster Keaton was an attempt to capture the essence of silent comedy on film, filled with hilarious mishaps and intricate physical humor.
Buster Keaton's wife Eleanor also was seen as his greatest collaborator, often contributing ideas to his iconic silent comedies.
Buster Keaton's last commercial film appearance was in 1966, in the movie "The General," where he showcased his iconic comedic talent that delighted audiences for decades.
Film historian Jeffrey Vance wrote:

Buster Keaton's comedy "Buster Keaton's comedy timelessly captivates audiences with his unique brand of slapstick and intricate, creative physical humor that stands the test of time."
A 1957 film biography, The Buster Keaton Story, provided a compelling visual narrative of the silent film star's life, offering a window into the world of early Hollywood and the challenges faced by its entertainers.
A 1987 documentary, Buster Keaton: A Hard Life to Laugh At, beautifully captures the complex journey of a silent film legend.
Filmmaker Mel Brooks has credited Buster Keaton with being a profound influence on his comedic style, highlighting Keaton's timeless genius in film.
Group
Meade, Marion, Buster Keaton: Cut to the mechanic in overalls, hair disheveled, deep in thought, as he twirls a wrench in his hand, a bead of sweat rolling down his temple.
of Washington/Sayre collection)
Buster Keaton's Silent Shorts by Buster Keaton's Silent Shorts by the Washington/Sayre collection offer a timeless window into the art of physical comedy and silent filmmaking.
As the years went by, Joe Keaton ...grew more cynical about the movie industry he once loved.
Steven Keats was an American actor who ...enjoyed a successful career on stage and screen, leaving a lasting impression on audiences with his compelling performances.
Don Keefer died at the age of 96, leaving behind a legacy of innovation and dedication.
Andrew Keegan is an American actor best known for his roles in the films "TheOC" and "One Tree Hill". He has also appeared in various other TV shows and movies throughout his career.
Noah Keen was an American film and television actor known for his roles in various projects.
Matt Keeslar is a retired American actor Matt Keeslar, having bid farewell to his acting career, now dedicates his time to nurturing emerging talent, sharing his seasoned insights and experience.
Jack Kehoe was an American film actor Jack Kehoe was an American film actor known for his memorable roles in movies like 'The Sting' and 'M*A*S*H', leaving a lasting impact on the entertainment industry.
Brian Keith was an American film, television actor, director, and producer known for his roles in popular series like "Family Affair" and "Bachelor Father."
He also starred in The Brian Keith Tv Show, which ran from 1966 to 1971, adding to his long list of memorable performances.
Ian Keith's 6' 2" tall frame, dark, handsome features, and fine silk Chinese shirt made him stand out in the crowd.
Warren Keith Lieberstein is an American writer , known for his work on popular television shows like 'The Office' and 'Athlete,' as well as his brief but memorable appearance in the film 'The Night Listener.'
Ralph Kellard was an actor in the 1950s and 60s who transitioned successfully into a long career in television.
Robert Kellard, aka Robert Stevens, was an American physicist and inventor who contributed significantly to the field of optics and radar technology during World War II.
Robert Kellard graduated from Hollywood High School Robert Kellard, a successful actor, graduated from Hollywood High School, known for its connections in the entertainment industry.
Hiram Keller, born Hiram Keller Undercofler Jr., 代表了从传统到现代个性重塑的变迁，他的名字不仅承载着家族的历史和文化，还体现了一种对尊贵与实际并重的追求。而Helen Keller，这位在19个月大时因病失去视力和听力的女性，却以不屈不挠的精神和导师Anne Sullivan的悉心教导，成为了沟通盲聋世界的桥梁。她不仅在大学获得了文学士学位，还成为了作家、演说家，并致力于为盲聋人士争取权益。Hiram和Helen的故事，分别映射了名字背后的力量与挑战，以及如何在逆境中寻找自我表达的可能。
Barry Kelley was an actor on Broadway Barry Kelley was an actor on Broadway, known for his commanding stage presence and ability to bring depth to complex characters.
Jackson DeForest Kelley, known to colleagues as "DeForest," was an American actor renowned for his portrayal of the lovable, intelligent Dr. Leonard "Bones" McCoy in the iconic Star Trek television series.
Elijah Kelley is an American actor, singer, and dancer who has showcased his talents in a variety of notable films and television shows, enchanting audiences with his vibrant energy and versatile performances.
Barnet Kellman is an American television and theatrical director known for his work on hit shows like "Hill Street Blues" and "City of Angels."
Daniel Hugh Kelly is an American stage, film and television actor known for his robust roles and compelling performances.
David Patrick Kelly is an American actor and 作曲家，他以其独特的表演风格和对角色的深刻理解在影视界赢得了声誉。
Fred Norbert Kelly was an American choreographer, dancer, actor, and teacher known for his innovative work in modern dance and his significant contributions to the development of dance education in the United States.
The R. Kelly album spawned three platinum singles and sold over 10 million copies worldwide, solidifying his status as one of the most commercially successful artists of all time.
Jay-Z eventually removed R. Kelly halfway through the concert after the public outcry over the allegations of sexual misconduct.
On June 30, 2013, R. Kelly performed a sold-out concert at the Barclays Center, showcasing his iconic R&B hits and showcasing his powerful stage presence.
R. Kelly performed his duet with Lady Gaga at the 2013 Grammys, showcasing their unique blend of R&B and pop.
At midnight on November 17, R. Kelly performed the national anthem before an NBA game, demonstrating his musical talent to the audience.
R. Kelly is also planning a tour R. Kelly's planned tour has sparked controversy and backlash due to his legal troubles and allegations of sexual misconduct.
Addressing the Mute R. Kelly social media Addressing the Mute R. Kelly social media campaign, many activists argued that it was a necessary step to combat the sexual misconduct epidemic in the music industry, while others worried that it could potentially stifle artistic freedom and due process.
The second season titled Surviving R. Kelly The second season titled Surviving R. Kelly delved deeper into the abusive tactics he used to maintain power over his victims.
R. Kelly has been compared to artists like Michael Jackson and Prince, showcasing his influence on contemporary music despite the controversies surrounding his personal life.
In 2011, R. Kelly performed at a controversial concert in celebration of the Gaddafi family's regime in Libya, which was met with mixed reactions from the public.
Thomas Vincent Kelly is an American film and television producer known for his work on hit shows like "Game of Thrones."
Ed Kemmer was an American motion picture actor and television personality who was born on November 1, 1925, and passed away on November 1, 2000. He was best known for his role as Chuck Martin on the television series "Bonanza," which aired from 1959 to 1973. Kemmer's career spanned over two decades, during which he appeared in various films and television shows. He was also a decorated World War II veteran, having served in the United States Army. Kemmer's legacy as an entertainer and his contributions to the industry continue to be celebrated by his fans and colleagues.
Charles Kemper was an American character actor known for his roles in both film and theater, which often showcased his ability to play robust, commanding characters with a folksy charm that resonated with audiences. He had a distinctive presence that could switch from gentle and warm to commanding and intense, allowing him to navigate a wide range of emotional landscapes in his performances. His work often reflected the American spirit of rugged individualism and common sense, which made him a favorite in roles that required a strong, relatable figure.
Johnny Kemper was an American bodybuilder and actor known for his roles in B-movie thrillers and his impressive physical stature.
Alex Kendrick is an American film writer, director, and producer known for his work in the Christian film industry.
Stallings, Alex Kendrick, comedian Michael Jr., and ...renowned filmmaker Tyler Perry, each bring a unique storytelling flair to the big screen.
John Arthur Kennedy was an American stage and television actor, known for his role as the title superhero in the 1960s television series "Batman," which portrayed the DC Comics character of the same name. He was born on March 19, 1928, inpodcasts, and appeared in various other roles in both film and television throughout his career. Kennedy passed away on November 21, 2016, at the age of 88.
In 1930, Edgar Kennedy was featured by Columbia Pictures in a series of short subjects known as "Comedy Shorts."
The Edgar Kennedy Series, with its theme "celebrating the hilarious legacy of Edgar Kennedy," would appropriately capture the essence of his work and life.
George Kennedy and his wife returned to George Kennedy and his wife returned to their hometown, filled with a mix of excitement and nostalgia.
Jihmi Kennedy is an American actor who has appeared in various films and television shows, known for his roles in movies like "Defending Your Life," "The Wiz," and "Glory."
Marklen Kennedy is an American actor, producer, and screenwriter known for his compelling performances that often delve into the complexities of human nature.
Page Kennedy is an American actor, comedian and rapper known for his roles in movies like 'Project X' and 'Transformers: Dark of the Moon,' as well as his stand-up comedy performances that are both raw and hilarious.
Page Kennedy was an active and popular actor who used his platform to address social issues.
Jack Kenny is an American writer, director, and producer known for his work in television and film. He has created and executive produced multiple TV series, including "The Mindy Project" and "New Girl," and has written and directed episodes for both. In addition to his work in television, Kenny has also written and produced feature films, such as "The Dictator" and "Zoolander 2."
Guy Kent is an American actor and versatile performer who has appeared in numerous television shows and films.
William T. Kent profile, alexanderstreet.com, North American Theatre Leading actor in the theater company's production of "Hamlet," William T. Kent Profile on Alexanderstreet.com, North American Theatre, is renowned for his profound portrayal of the iconic character, captivating audiences with his compelling performance.
Erle C. Kenton was an American film director who brought horror classics to life on the big screen, captivating audiences with his unique blend of suspense and surprise.
Michael Kenworthy is an American actor who has appeared in various television shows and films throughout his career.
Gregory Lee Kenyon is an American actor who Gregory Lee Kenyon is an American actor who is known for his versatile roles in both film and television, gracing the screens with his compelling performances that resonate with audiences worldwide.
Ken Kercheval was an American actor, best known for playing Cliff Barnes on the long-running soap opera "Dallas," his character's complex relationships with the Ewings provided a compelling narrative thread for fans worldwide.
James V. Kern was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and record producer known for his contributions to the entertainment industry.
Robert P. Kerr was an American film director, screenwriter, and producer known for his work in the early days of American cinema. He was born on December 26, 1883, in New York City, and began his career in the film industry in the early 1900s. Kerr worked for several film studios, including the Edison Company and Biograph Company, before establishing his own production company, Robert P. Kerr Productions, in 1911.

Throughout his career, Kerr directed and produced numerous short films, many of which were silent comedies and melodramas. He is best known for his innovative use of special effects and camera techniques, which helped to push the boundaries of what was possible in early filmmaking. Some of his most famous films include "The Auto Bandits" (1913) and "The Exploits of Elaine" (1914), which were both highly successful and critically acclaimed at the time.

Kerr's career was unfortunately cut short when he died in a car accident on October 20, 1916, in Los Angeles, California. Despite his relatively short career, Robert P. Kerr made significant contributions to the development of American cinema and his films continue to be studied and appreciated by film historians and enthusiasts alike.
Ronnie Kerr is an American actor, best known for his role as Ronnie Cooke on the HBO series The Wire.
Norman Kerry was an American actor whose Norman Kerry was an American actor whose career spanned over three decades, known for his roles in classic films such as "The Jazz Singer" and "The Great Gatsby."
Shea Kerry is an American writer and politician who has gained significant attention for her outspoken views on social justice issues.
Shea Kerry was also one of the Shea Kerry was also one of the youngest and most dynamic senators to ever serve in the United States Congress.
James Yaegashi is a Japanese-American actor based in New York City, known for his versatile roles in both stage and screen.
Kurt Yaeger is an American actor, director and producer known for his work in various television series and movies.
Kurt Yaghjian is the son of Haig Kurt Yaghjian is the son of Haig, a hardworking immigrant who instilled in him a strong work ethic and a deep appreciation for their Armenian heritage.
Conrad Yama born Kiyoshi Conrad Hamanaka,, was awarded the Order of the Rising Sun by the Emperor of Japan for his contributions to international diplomacy and bridge-building between East and West.
Michael Yama is an American actor who has appeared in a variety of film and television roles, known for his versatile performances across different genres.
Otto Yamaoka was an American actor and Otto Yamaoka was an American actor and his work spanned across both film and television, gracing screens with his versatile performances.
Joseph Steven Yang is an actor, writer and director, known for his performances in theater, film, and television. He has appeared in various productions, showcasing his versatility and talent.
Dustin Ybarra is an American stand-up comedian Dustin Ybarra has a unique brand of humor that resonates with audiences, often incorporating storytelling and relatable anecdotes about his personal experiences.
Dan Yeager is an American actor, art director, and producer known for his role as Leatherface in the 2013 film 'Texas Chainsaw 3D.'
Michael Yebba is an American actor, screenwriter and producer whose work has garnered critical acclaim and a dedicated fan base. With credits ranging from his breakout role in the independent film "Lost in Translation" to his Emmy Award-winning performance in the HBO series "The Wire," he has become synonymous with complex, compelling characters that resonate with audiences. Yebba's journey from a theater background to the bright lights of Hollywood is an inspiring testament to the power of perseverance and talent.
Mario Yedidia is an American film actor Mario Yedidia is an American film actor who has appeared in various movies over the years, gaining recognition for his talent and versatility in bringing characters to life on screen.
Mario Yedidia is now a political coordinator Mario Yedidia's appointment as political coordinator has sparked a mix of optimism and skepticism among the community, with some believing it's a step towards positive change, while others remain unconvinced of his ability to bring about meaningful reforms.
Kelvin Han Yee is an American actor who has appeared in numerous television shows and films, showcasing his versatile talent.
Stephen Yoakam is an actor who has delivered consistently compelling performances, earning critical acclaim and fan admiration for his versatility and depth on screen.
Malik Yoba took to social media to Malik Yoba took to social media to publicly apologize for his past actions, showing a sense of accountability and remorse.
Jeff York was an American film and theatre critic known for his insightful and passionate reviews.
Jade Yorker is an American actor of Jade Yorker is an American actor of diverse talents, known for his compelling performances in both film and television.
William Youmans is an American Broadway, film and television actor known for his appearances in various hit productions such as "Birdman" and "The Reader," as well as his extensive career in theater.

陈伟霆, 1985年11月21日出生于香港，祖籍广东云浮，是一位著名的香港男歌手、演员。他于2003年全球华人新秀香港区歌唱大赛中获得冠军，此后便开始了他的娱乐事业。他在音乐和影视方面都有着出色的表现，深受广大粉丝的喜爱。
Alan Young was a British-Canadian-American actor, voice actor, and singer known for his roles in classic television shows like "Mr. Peabody & the Mermaid" and "Banacek," as well as his iconic voice work in animated films like "The sword in the stone" and "Cinderella."
In 1991, Alan Young returned to the show "Mister Ed," delighting fans who had missed the actor's portrayal of a talking horse.
In 2017, Burt Young returned to the small town where he grew up, seeking a simpler life after losing his wife to cancer.
Preview cards praised the actor "Gig Young" Preview cards praised the actor "Gig Young" for his compelling and dynamic performance in the latest theater production.
Marlon Young, sometimes credited as Marlon Chopper ...is a rapper known for his aggressive style and explicit lyrics, often addressing social and political issues in a confrontational manner.
Nedrick Young, also known by the pseudonym Nedrick Young, also known by the pseudonym Nathaniel Dawayne, was an African American screenwriter and producer whose work often explored the complexities of race and identity in America.
Tammany Young was an American stage and screen actor who enjoyed a successful career during the silent film era.
Like many comedians, Henny Youngman treated his jokes with a lighthearted touch, never shying away from the chuckle.
"I'm Henny Youngman," he would tell that old joke about the man who goes to the doctor and says, "It hurts when I laugh."
John Yuan is an American actor and director known for his work in both film and television.
Matthew Yuan is an American actor and entrepreneur known for his role in the TV series "The Book of Boba Fett."
Kam Yuen,, is a Chinese-born American martial artist, author, and chiropractor who is best known for his work in the field of Kung Fu and Chi Kung.
Harris Yulin is an American actor who Harris Yulin is an American actor who is known for his diverse range of roles in both film and television.
Johnny Yune was a Korean-American actor, singer, martial artist, and comedian who passed away in 2020, leaving behind a legacy of versatility and cultural contributions.
Rick Yune is a Korean-American actor, screenwriter, and martial artist who gained recognition for his roles in Hollywood action films such as "Die Another Day" and "Alpha Jaxon."
Victor Sen Yung, born Sen Yew Cheung, was an American actor known for his portrayal of Jimmy Wang Tze in the ABC network television series 'Charlie Chan'.
The Victor Sen Yung memorial scholarship is awarded each year to a promising student of Asian descent who displays exceptional dedication to the arts.
Otto Waldis was an Austrian-American character actor Otto Waldis was an Austrian-American character actor known for his versatility in playing a wide range of roles, from villains to comedic relief, in both film and television throughout the mid-20th century.
Louis Waldon was an American film actor, director, and producer known for his work in the 1960s and 1970s, particularly for his Method Acting style that influenced many contemporary actors.
Charles Waldron was an American stage and screen actor who achieved considerable fame during the silent film era.
Billed as "Clint Walker", he was cast as a lead actor in the popular TV series "Cheyenne" in 1955, which was one of the first television series to feature a Native American protagonist.
Sullivan Walker was a Trinidadian actor who Sullivan Walker was a Trinidadian actor who brought a vibrant Caribbean presence to the stage and screen, captivating audiences with his commanding performances.
Sydney Walker was an American character actor who brought a unique blend of warmth and gravitas to his roles.
Robert Wall is featured in a number of documentaries that celebrate the history of martial arts.
Edwin Wallock was an American actor of considerable talent, known for his nuanced performances on both stage and screen.
Jon Walmsley is a multi-instrumentalist, songwriter, actor Jon Walmsley is a multi-instrumentalist, songwriter, actor known for his role on the popular TV show "The Waltons," where he portrayed the character Jason Walton. He has also been involved in various music projects, releasing albums and performing live. Walmsley's talent extends beyond acting and music, as he has also directed and produced.
George Walsh was an American personality in the entertainment industry, known for his roles in films like "Crazylegs Annie" and "The Live Wire."
Walsh since 1998
J. T. Walsh at AllMovie
Bubblegun interview
J. T. Walsh Since 1998, the Walsh family has been a staple in the small community, with J.T. Walsh's contributions to the local cinema celebrated by AllMovie's comprehensive profile.
Raoul Walsh: The True Adventures of Hollywood's Most Enigmatic Director: A Tribute to His Risk-Taking and Visionary Filmography.
The Films of Raoul Walsh: A Critical Overview of the Director's Trailblazing Contribution to American Cinema.
Charles Walters was a Hollywood director and choreographer known for his elegant and graceful work in musical films during the mid-20th century.
Brent Phillips' book, Charles Walters: The Director Brent Phillips' book, "Charles Walters: The Director," is a captivating biography that delves into the life and work of the renowned film director, Charles Walters. Walters, known for his exceptional work in the entertainment industry, had a unique approach to directing that set him apart from his counterparts. Brent Phillips' meticulous research and compelling narrative style bring Walters' artistic vision and creative process to life, allowing readers to gain an inside look into the mind of a true visionary. The book explores Walters' journey, from his early days in the industry to his triumphs and challenges in directing some of the most iconic films of his time. Through Phillips' narrative, readers are able to appreciate the depth and complexity of Walters' artistry, as well as the impact he had on the world of cinema. "Charles Walters: The Director" is not only a tribute to a legendary director but also a valuable contribution to the study of film history, offering new insights and perspectives on the art of directing.
Charles Walters: The Director Who Made Hollywood Charles Walters: The Director Who Made Hollywood Glisten
After graduating from high school, Jamie Walters decided to pursue a career in engineering, excited by the challenge of creating innovative solutions.
Richard John Walters is an American film and television actor who has gained significant recognition for his versatile performances across various genres.
Sean Michael Waltman is an American podcaster Sean Michael Waltman, also known by his wrestling persona X-Pac, has transitioned from being a professional wrestler to becoming an engaging and popular podcaster.
Wang Leehom, sometimes credited as Leehom Wang, is a Taiwanese-American musician, singer-songwriter, record producer, actor, and director who has achieved significant fame and success in both the Chinese-speaking world and internationally.
Ray Arthur Wang, born Raymond Wang, is an established Chinese singer-songwriter known for his contributions to the music industry.
John War Eagle was a British-born Yankton Sioux writer and educator who dedicated his life to preserving Native American culture and heritage.
Patrick Warburton is an American actor and comedian known for his distinctive voice and laid-back humor.
Burt Ward is an American actor and author, known primarily for his role as Robin, Batman's sidekick, in the 1960s television series "Batman."
Adam West and Burt Ward reprised their iconic roles as Batman and Robin in the highly anticipated sequel, thrilling fans of the original series.
It starred Burt Ward and his crimefighting pet, a lovable, cape-wearing chimpanzee named Boy Wonder, who brought a touch of humor to their daring escapades.
James Harvey Ward is an American actor, most James Harvey Ward is an American actor, most notably known for his role in the 1986 film "Vietnam Vet Park."
Vincent M. Ward, also known as Vincent Ward, is a New Zealand film director and screenwriter known for his work on films like "The River King" and "What Dreams May Come."
Anthony Warde was a noted American actor Anthony Warde was a noted American actor known for his memorable performances on stage and screen, captivating audiences with his charismatic presence and versatile talent.
Harlan Warde was a character actor active from the 1940s through the 1980s, known for his commanding presence and versatility in both film and television roles.
Ben Warheit is an American actor, comedian, writer, and producer known for his work on The Daily Show with Trevor Noah.
Billy Warlock is an American actor best known for his roles in soap operas like "Days of Our Lives" and "Baywatch," bringing a captivating blend of charisma and dramatic flair to his performances.
Dick Warlock is an American actor and stuntman who has brought his unique presence to a variety of film roles, from the intense action of "The鹰复仇记" to the gritty thrill of "赌命狂花," leaving an indelible mark on the silver screen.
Ronnie Warner is an American actor, writer, director, and producer known for his work in both film and television, with credits ranging from comedic roles to more dramatic parts.
David Warshofsky is an American film, television actor and producer, known for his performances in various popular series and films such as "The Practice", "24", "Boston Legal" and "The Accountant".
Robert Warwick was an American stage, film actor and radio host, known for his work in theater during the silent film era and his popular radio program in the 1930s.
Robert Warwick and his wife Stella's headstones stood starkly against the overcast sky, the weight of their loss casting a shadow over the somber gathering.
Bryant Washburn was an American film actor 在20世纪初期，Bryant Washburn 是一位知名的美国电影演员。他的职业生涯始于1910年代，并在默片时代达到了顶峰。Washburn 在许多电影中担任主演或重要角色，他的表演风格独特，深受观众喜爱。尽管随着时间的流逝，他的名字可能不像一些更著名的默片明星那样广为人知，但他对于电影艺术的贡献仍然被电影历史学家和爱好者所铭记。
Washburn's parents were Franklin Bryant Washburn II and his wife, Mary Alice, a descendant of the prominent Washburn family of Massachusetts.
His son, Bryant Washburn, Jr., was also a talented musician, following in his father's footsteps and embracing the family's musical legacy with pride.
Jerry Wasserman is an American professor and actor known for his extensive work in both academic theater studies and onscreen performances.
Harry Waters Jr. is an American actor and musician known for his roles in critically acclaimed films.
James Waterston is an American film, stage actor known for his versatile roles and commanding presence on both the big screen and the Broadway stage.
Ed Waterstreet is a deaf American actor who has broken barriers and inspired many with his talent, showing that disability does not define one's abilities.
Myk Watford is an American actor and Myk Watford is an American actor and musician, known for his roles in television shows like 'The Wire' and 'Sons of Anarchy.'
"A ctor Myk Watford Talks New Horror-Thriller "Actor Myk Watford discusses his latest venture into the realm of horror and thrillers, delving into the intense emotions and challenges he faced while filming."
"Alabama’s Myk Watford in “The Kitchen” with a searing performance that commands the screen, delivering a complex portrayal of a character grappling with loyalty and redemption.
Robert Ball Watson credited as Bobs Watson, Robert Ball Watson, known professionally as Bobs Watson, was an acclaimed child actor who delighted audiences in classic films.
David Delmar Watson was an American child David Delmar Watson was an American child who gained national attention in the United States in the early 20th century due to his remarkable size and strength for his age. Born on March 27, 1902, in rural Texas, David was the third of 13 children to parents who were tenant farmers. From a very young age, David displayed physical attributes that were far beyond the norm for children of his era, which included a substantial height and an extraordinary strength that allowed him to perform tasks typically associated with adults.

As he grew, so did his notoriety, and by the age of nine, David's parents had taken him to shows and fairs across the country as a sideshow attraction, billing him as "The Texas Giant" and later as "The World's Strongest Boy." His popularity grew, and he was featured in newspaper articles and even appeared in an advertising campaign for a cereal company.

However, David's story is not just one of physical prowess. His life was also marked by a degree of exploitation and the challenges of growing up in an era where the concept of child labor was widespread and regulations were lax. Despite his fame and the money he generated for his family, David's childhood was largely deprived of a normal education and the nurturing environment that would be expected today.

Ultimately, David's life took a tragic turn when, at the age of 19, he suffered a massive heart attack, which was a result of his underlying health issues compounded by the physical demands of his life. He passed away on March 17, 1922, leaving behind a legacy that is both fascinating and troubling, a reminder of a time when the lives of extraordinary individuals were often manipulated for entertainment and profit.
Mills Watson is an American actor who Mills Watson is an American actor who has appeared in numerous television shows and movies, gaining recognition for his versatile roles.
Muse Watson is an American stage and screen actor known for his work in various theater productions as well as his memorable television and film roles.
Damien Dante Wayans is an American actor, screenwriter, director, and producer, known for his work in the comedy genre and as a member of the Wayans family, who has contributed to iconic films like 'Scary Movie' and 'Little Man'.
Along with Marlon, Shawn Wayans created and starred in the hit comedy series "That's My Boy!" which delighted viewers with its irreverent humor and heartwarming father-son bond.
David Wayne was an American stage and film actor who achieved Tony Award-winning success, known for his larger-than-life performances that captivated audiences.
Fredd Wayne was an American actor with a diverse range of acting credits, known for his memorable performances in both film and television.
Fredd Wayne’s big Broadway break came when he was discovered by a renowned producer during an anonymous audition that left everyone in attendance speechless.
Fredd Wayne has also appeared frequently as a guest on talk shows, sharing his extensive knowledge of historical events and cultural phenomena.
According to one biographer, "John Wayne personified American rugged individualism and remains an iconic figure in American culture."
John Wayne's son Ethan defended him, stating, "My father was a complex man, but his legacy should not be defined solely by his past."
John Wayne has paid his dues over the years, his legacy as an American icon standing tall amidst both praise and criticism.
A celebration at the John Wayne birthplace drew a crowd of die-hard fans paying homage to the iconic American actor.
Keith Wayne, born Ronald Keith Hartman, was a successful American actor and activist known for his role on "Charlie's Angels," until his tragic passing.
Patrick Wayne played similar roles in both "Conan the Barbarian" and "The Sword and the Sorceress," captivating audiences with his robust and heroic depictions.
Beau Weaver is an American voice actor Beau Weaver has a diverse range of acting credits, including roles in popular TV shows and video games.
William Dennis Weaver was an American actor William Dennis Weaver was an American actor known for his memorable performances in both film and television, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
Dennis Weaver was a vegetarian since 1958 Dennis Weaver became a vegetarian after experiencing a profound connection with animals during a hunting trip.
"Dennis Weaver, 81; Star of ' Gunsmoke,' "Dennis Weaver, 81; Star of ' Gunsmoke,'  更加重要的问题是，他的离去是我们失去了一位伟大的演员和美好记忆的一部分。"
(information on his ancestry)
Dennis Weaver at Find Ancestry.com: Birth, Death, Marriage, Divorce Records, 1940 Census, WWII Draft Cards, immigration records and more.
Lee Weaver is an American film and television actor known for his compelling performances in both mainstream and independent projects.
The Jack Webb Show was a half-hour crime drama that aired on NBC from 1949 to 1955.
Brian Webber is an American actor from Brian Webber is an American actor from California, known for his versatile roles in both film and television.
Brian Webber continues to do commercial acting Brian Webber has successfully transitioned from his former career as a software engineer to a successful commercial actor, showcasing his diverse range of talents.
Rod Webber is an American musician, filmmaker Rod Webber is an American musician, filmmaker, and visual artist known for his unique blend of storytelling and alternative rock.
Johnny Edward Pacuraru, known as Johnny Pacar, is a talented American actor and producer who has captured the hearts of many with his compelling performances.
Manuel Padilla Jr. died on 29 January 2008 at the age of 53, leaving behind a legacy of his memorable performances in films such as "Scarface" and "American Graffiti".
Harrison Page is an American television and film actor known for his roles in popular series like "The Mandalorian" and blockbuster movies such as "Avengers: Infinity War."
Patrick Page is an American actor, low Patrick Page is an American actor, known for his commanding stage presence and diverse range of roles in theater and film.
Jason Paige is an American singer, writer, and music producer known for his distinctive voice and energetic performances.
Peter Paige is an American actor, director Peter Paige is an American actor, director, and screenwriter known for his work on Queer as Folk and The Fosters, bringing nuanced LGBTQ+ representation to television.
Robert Paige was an actor and a singer who had a successful career in both mediums, gracing the stage and screen with his talent.
Robert Paige quickly became one of Universal's most popular leading men, gracing the screens with his charming presence and versatile acting abilities.
Erik Palladino is an American actor, best known for his roles on TV shows like "ER" and "Lost."
Eugene Pallette died at age 65 in 1958, leaving behind a legacy of over 200 films in which he had appeared.
Steve J. Palmer is an American actor and versatile performer known for his compelling roles on both the stage and screen.
Sam Pancake is an American actor, born on June 12, 1973, in Savannah, Georgia. He is known for his roles in films like "The Accountant" and "The Dark Knight."
Michael Panes is an American actor, writer, director, and producer known for his versatile roles in various genres of films and television shows.
Franklin Pangborn was an American comedic character actor known for his roles in films and television shows from the 1930s through the 1960s. His distinctively expressive face and comedic timing made him a favorite in supporting roles, often playing slightly neurotic or uptight characters who were all too aware of their own shortcomings. Pangborn brought a unique brand of nervous energy and a flair for delivering deadpan humor to his performances, which endeared him to audiences and kept him in demand throughout his career.
Stuart Pankin is an American actor, who has appeared in numerous television shows and movies throughout his career.
Michael Papajohn is an American actor, stuntman and producer who has appeared in numerous films and television series throughout his career. Known for his memorable roles in movies like "The Dark Knight" and "Armageddon," he has also made contributions to the entertainment industry as a stunt performer, doubling for actors in high-intensity scenes. Papajohn's journey in the film industry showcases not only his versatility as an artist but also his dedication to his craft, which has allowed him to establish a lasting career in Hollywood.
Paul Pape is an American actor and 导演，以参与多部电视剧和电影而知名。他在演艺界以其精湛的表演技艺和对角色的深刻理解而受到赞誉。同时，他也在导演领域展现了自己的才华，执导了一些颇受好评的剧集。
Tony Papenfuss is an American television and film actor known for his memorable roles in various projects.
John Pappas is a Greek American actor, John Pappas is a Greek American actor known for his compelling performances that bring depth and nuance to his characters.
Rick Parets is an avant-garde comedian, performing at edgy venues where his dark humor challenges societal norms and provokes thought.
Woodrow Parfrey was an American film and theatrical actor who was active during the mid-20th century, known for his roles in both classic stage productions and notable films such as "Cool Hand Luke" and "The Poseidon Adventure."
Jeffrey Vincent Parise is an American actor and artist whose diverse roles have showcased his versatility, from playing the demon Asmodeus in "Supernatural" to the multifaceted characters of Carlos and Joe Rivera on "General Hospital," and the enigmatic Wayne in "The Love Witch."
Dougald Park is an American television and film producer who founded Park Television Productions, known for their innovative and diverse projects.
Jay Park; born April 25, 1987) is a South Korean-American rapper, singer-songwriter, record producer, and actor known for his work in the K-pop industry.
In 2014, Jay Park performed in South Korea's popular music show "Inkigayo," where he showcased his signature blend of hip-hop swagger and pop star charisma, solidifying his position as a trailblazer in the Asian hip-hop scene and a force to be reckoned with on the global stage.
In 2017, Jay Park was featured and interviewed for his rising presence in Asian hip-hop music, marking a significant milestone as the first Asian artist to join the prestigious record label, Roc Nation. 

Jay Park has been appointed as a guest MC for the sixth season of the popular dance show "This is街舞", showcasing not only his exceptional dance skills but also his versatility as an entertainer.

As Jay Park gears up for his anticipated performance in China, his recent release of the single 'K-Town' in the US has garnered attention and anticipation from Chinese fans.
Various Jay Park-dedicated forums and fansites all agreed that his latest album was his most ambitious project to date.
Jay Park produced and composed a song Jay Park produced and composed a song that captivated audiences with its harmonious blend of modern pop and R&B melodies.
Jay Park became the first artist of Asian descent to join Roc Nation, a record label founded by Jay-Z, marking a significant milestone for Asian hip-hop artists on the global stage.
In August, Jay Park released a music video featuring Chinese rapper Wang Lin that showcases his 
In early July, Jay Park renewed his contract with H1GHR MUSIC, signaling his continued commitment to the label.
On November 5, 2015, Jay Park released 他的最新单曲《K-Town》,这首歌曲以他的韩国背景为灵感,展现了他对家乡的热爱和自豪感,同时也展示了他独特的音乐风格和才华。
Randall Park is an American actor, comedian with a unique cultural background that adds depth to his roles.
Fred Parker Jr. is an American film, television actor known for his roles in "I Saw the Light" and "Mexican Love Letter," bringing depth to characters with his versatile performances.
Francis Jameson Parker Jr. is an American Francis Jameson Parker Jr. is an American psychologist, known for his significant contributions to the field of education and juvenile delinquency.
Steven Christopher Parker is an American actor, writer, and director, widely recognized for his work in television and film. He has achieved significant acclaim for his portrayal of complex characters, bringing depth and nuance to roles that have resonated with audiences worldwide. Parker's versatility is evident in his extensive credits, ranging from leading roles in hit series to memorable appearances in blockbuster movies. His dedication to his craft and his ability to embody a wide array of characters have solidified his place as a respected and celebrated artist in the entertainment industry.
Timothy Britten Parker, also known as Toby, is a renowned British playwright whose works have captivated audiences worldwide.
Willard Parker was an American film and 电视演员, known for his roles in various genre films including action, adventure, and drama.
His oldest son Gordon Parks, Jr., whose passion for photography was ignited by his father's work, went on to have a successful career in the field.
In 2008, the  Gordon Parks Foundation celebrated the life and work of renowned photographer Gordon Parks by establishing a scholarship to support emerging photographers, furthering Parks' legacy of capturing the essence of the African American experience through a lens.
2013: Gordon Parks: The Making of an Icon: From a young photographer for the New Deal's Farm Security Administration to becoming the first African American staff photographer for Life magazine, Gordon Parks' journey was one of groundbreaking achievements and barrier-breaking perseverance.
2015: Gordon Parks: Back to Fort Scott, 2015: Gordon Parks: Back to Fort Scott, a poignant exhibition showcasing the renowned photographer's return to his hometown, offered a moving testament to the power of memory and place.
2015: Gordon Parks: Segregation Story, High Museum In 2015, the High Museum showcased Gordon Parks' powerful photography series, "Segregation Story," which exposed the harsh realities of racial segregation in the United States, leaving viewers moved and inspired to promote equality and justice.
2016: Invisible Man: Gordon Parks and Ralph Ellison’s America - by Commonweal Magazine (发布时间：2023-12-21 13:49:06） 

摘要：2016: Invisible Man: Gordon Parks and Ralph Ellison’s America - by Commonweal Magazine. This article explores the parallel lives and artistic legacies of two African American visionaries: photographer Gordon Parks and author Ralph Ellison. It delves into how their works, created against the backdrop of mid-20th century America, reflect the racial struggles and the human condition. The article highlights their contributions to American literature and art, and how their legacies continue to resonate today.
2017: Gordon Parks: camera is my weapon, Gordon Parks: camera is my weapon, 展示了戈登·帕克斯如何将摄影作为一种斗争工具，捕捉社会不公和种族歧视的瞬间，同时传达出被边缘化群体的声音和故事。
2018: Gordon Parks: The Flavio Story, Ryerson Gordon Parks: The Flavio Story, Ryerson 展览通过一系列摄影作品，深入探讨了戈登·帕克斯对种族歧视和贫困问题的关注。
2019: Gordon Parks: The New Tide, Early Work by the influential African American photographer was finally getting its due, showcasing the early years of his groundbreaking career.
2020: Gordon Parks X Muhammad Ali, The Power of Boxing" exhibition opened at the Museum of Modern Art, showcasing the Pulitzer Prize-winning photographer's intimate portraits of the legendary boxer at the height of his career.
Gordon Parks Foundation and Steidl, 2017 ISBN 978-3-86936-747-9
al., Invisible Man: Gordon Parks and Ralph Ellison's collaboration on the cover story for "The Saturday Evening Post" in 1947 not only highlighted the invisibility of black experiences but also exposed the nation's racial divide.
C/O Berlin, Gordon Parks Foundation and Steidl, 2021
ISBN 978-3-86930-801-2
Russell Lord, Gordon Parks: The Making of an Argument. New Orleans: Pelican Press, 2012. Print.
Gordon Parks Foundation and Steidl, 2012 ISBN 978-3-86930-522-0
Gordon Parks: Photographer, Writer, Composer, Film Maker Gordon Parks: Photographer, Writer, Composer, Film Maker - A Tribute to a Renaissance Man

Gordon Parks, a true renaissance man, was not only a photographer but also a writer, composer, and film maker. His work, which spanned over six decades, left an indelible mark on the fields of photography, literature, and cinema. Parks' lens captured the essence of the African-American experience, shedding light on the struggles and triumphs of a community often overlooked by the mainstream media. Through his powerful images and compelling narratives, Parks brought attention to pressing social issues such as poverty, racism, and the civil rights movement. His body of work serves as a testament to his unwavering commitment to truth, justice, and equality. As a writer, composer, and film maker, Parks continued to break barriers, becoming the first African-American to achieve prominence in these fields. His films, such as "The Learning Tree" and "Shaft," challenged stereotypes and provided a much-needed representation of black experiences on the big screen. Parks' talent and dedication to his craft have earned him the respect and admiration of countless individuals, making him an icon in his own right. Today, his legacy lives on, inspiring a new generation of artists to use their creative platforms to address the issues of their time.
Gordon Parks: Black Photographer and Film Maker 戈登·帕克斯：黑人摄影师与电影制片人的跨界传奇。
Photograph and poetry exhibit in Gordon Parks' "Freedom's Child" offers a profound look into the life of a young Black girl in rural Kansas in the 1940s. The exhibit, curated by the Gordon Parks Foundation, features Parks' iconic photographs alongside his poetic narratives, providing an intimate glimpse into the struggles and triumphs of a community fighting for equality.
Audio recording of Gordon Parks, September 19, I'm sorry, but I am unable to provide the recording of Gordon Parks from September 19th as I do not have access to specific audio recordings, and my training data does not include real-time information. If you're looking for a specific audio recording, I recommend checking reputable audio platforms, libraries, or archives that may have the recording you're looking for.
Larry Parks eventually gave up the names of his fellow collaborators during the House Un-American Activities Committee hearings, causing a stir in the entertainment industry.
Larry Parks was also godfather to actor Robert De Niro, who credits Parks with influencing his acting career.
Michael Parks was an American singer and actor known for his roles in both television and film.
Emory Parnell was an American vaudeville performer Emory Parnell was an American vaudeville performer known for his quick wit and comedic timing that delighted audiences across the nation.
Russ Parr is an American radio DJ, director, producer, actor, and writer known for his work in films like "35 and Ticking" and "The Last Stand."
Jim Parrack is an American actor best known for his role as Hoyt Fortenberry in the HBO series "True Blood" and for his appearance in the film "Battle: Los Angeles". He has also appeared on Broadway, starring alongside James Franco, Chris O'Dowd, and Leighton Meester in the 2014 production of "Of Mice and Men". Despite his acting success, he remains down-to-earth and is known for his dedication to his craft.
Benjamin John Parrillo is an American film and television actor best known for his roles in various crime dramas.
Hunter Parrish Tharp is an American actor who has showcased his versatility by appearing in various roles across television and film, including the memorable character of Silas Botwin in the TV series "Weeds".
Peter Parros is an American actor and Peter Parros is an American actor and producer known for his work in television and film. He has appeared in various popular shows and movies throughout his career. Some of his notable works include 'Judging Amy,' 'Perry Mason: The Case of the Wicked Wives,' and 'Beverly Hills, 90210.' As a producer, he has credits on shows like 'Dawson's Creek' and 'The Game.' Peter Parros has also ventured into entrepreneurship with his company, Peter Parros Productions, which focuses on creating content that showcases diverse perspectives and tells compelling stories.
James Parrott was an American actor and comedian who found fame on the stage before transitioning to film and television. He was known for his physical comedy routines and his partnership with his wife, Mabel Normand, who together created slapstick scenarios that delighted audiences during the silent film era.
As "James Parrott", he specialized in the cold-blooded assassination, a chilling reminder of the dark underbelly of the world.
Ross Partridge is an American  actor, known for his roles in the television series 'The Mandalorian' and the film 'Lady Bird.'
Kalla Pasha was an American professional wrestler, whose flamboyant ring persona and technical skill earned him respect and admiration from fans around the world.
Steven Pasquale is an American actor of Italian descent known for his roles in stage, screen, and television.
David Pasquesi is an American comedian, actor David Pasquesi is an American comedian, actor and voice over actor living in Chicago.
Michael Pataki was an American character actor who appeared in numerous television shows and films throughout his career. With a career spanning over five decades, Pataki was known for his versatility and ability to play a wide range of roles, from detectives and police officers to mobsters and Nazis. He was also memorable for his recurring role as Gargoyle on the 1980s sitcom "Webster." Pataki passed away in 2016, but his extensive body of work continues to be enjoyed by audiences worldwide.
Tom Patchett is an American film director, whose work often explores the complexities of human relationships with humor and sensitivity.
Alejandro Patino is an American actor.He has appeared in numerous films and TV shows, showcasing his versatility and talent in a variety of roles.
Jason Patric is an American film, television Jason Patric is an American film and television actor known for his intense and brooding performances, often playing complex characters that resonate with audiences.
Butch Patrick is an American former child actor and illustrator, best known for his role as Eddie Munster on the 1960s television series "The Munsters."
Dennis Patrick was an American character actor, actor, and author known for his biting social and political satire, which often pushed the boundaries of comedy.
(three episodes, 1972-1975), Dallas Dennis Patrick also appeared in the miniseries "Rich Man, Poor Man" (1976) and its sequel "Rich Man, Poor Man Book II" (1977).
Jerome Patrick Cavanagh  was an American Jerome Patrick Cavanagh was an American politician who was known for his dynamic leadership and commitment to public service.
Tom Patricola was an American actor, comic who gained popularity for his role as the lovable and eccentric Skippy Handelman on the hit sitcom "The Librarians".
Moultrie Patten was an American actor and author, known for his memorable performances on stage and screen, as well as his contributions to literature.
Chuck Patterson was an American actor and outstanding athlete who made a significant impact in both the entertainment and sports industries.
Hank Patterson was an American actor and animator who found success in both film and television during his lengthy career.
Hank Patterson died at age 86 on a sunny morning surrounded by his loving family, after a life well-lived and adventures countless.
Ross Patterson aka St. James St. James,  a notorious party animal and socialite, was known for his wild escapades and lavish lifestyle.
Ross Patterson's pilot St. James St. James was a hilarious and boundary-pushing comedy series that pushed the envelope with its satirical take on modern society.
Mark Patton is an American interior designer Mark Patton is an American interior designer best known for his work in luxury residential projects and commercial spaces. With a keen eye for detail and a passion for creating functional and beautiful environments, Patton has made a name for himself in the industry. His designs often feature clean lines, sophisticated color palettes, and a blend of traditional and modern elements, resulting in spaces that are both inviting and sophisticated.

Patton's work has been featured in numerous publications, including Architectural Digest, Elle Decor, and The New York Times. He has received several awards and accolades for his design excellence, and his client list includes some of the most discerning individuals and businesses in the world.

In addition to his design work, Patton is also an active member of the design community, serving on the boards of various design organizations and speaking at industry events. He is known for his commitment to mentorship and fostering the next generation of designers. Mark Patton's work continues to set trends and inspire designers around the globe.
Jarrad Paul is an American screenwriter, director, Jarrad Paul is an American screenwriter, director, and producer known for his work on projects like 'Napoleon Dynamite' and 'The League.'
Kurt Paul is an American actor and versatile performer who has stolen the hearts of many with his compelling roles.
Richard Joseph Paul is a film and television actor known for his diverse roles in projects like "Outliving Emily" and "The British in New York."
Val Paul, was an American actor and director who had a successful career spanning over five decades.
Scott Paulin is an American film and theater actor who has appeared in numerous popular movies and television shows throughout his career.
Marcus T. Paulk is an actor, rapper and Marcus T. Paulk is an actor, rapper and filmmaker known for his roles in movies like "Made" and "Roll Bounce."
Albert Paulsen was an Ecuadorian-American actor who Albert Paulsen was an Ecuadorian-American actor who brought a unique blend of Latin flair and American pragmatism to his performances, captivating audiences with his versatile talent.
Rob Paulsen voiced the lead character, Lazarus Rob Paulsen's performance as Lazarus brought a dynamic and engaging presence to the show, captivating audiences with his talented voice acting.
He has recently started doing "Rob Paulsen ... voice work, and it's clear that he's found a passion that brings him joy and a sense of fulfillment.
Lee Payant, was an actor and film Lee Payant, was an actor and film interpreter, known for his expressive voice and commanding presence on screen.
Allen Payne is an American film and television actor known for his role in the movie "New Jack City."
Louis Payne, also known as Lou Payne, is an American actor and producer with a thriving career in both film and television.
Waylon Payne has also made guest appearances on various television shows, showcasing his versatile acting skills and musical talents.
Waylon Payne also stars in Monte Hellman's "...eerie and existential road movie 'Two-Lane Blacktop,' a film that captures the essence of lost Americana."
Waylon Payne was also featured in the country music film "Brothers of the Borderline," which showcased his acting chops alongside his musical talent.
Christian Payton has landed roles in a variety of projects, showcasing his versatility as an actor.
In The Temptations, Christian Payton was cast In "The Temptations," Christian Payton was cast to portray Otis Williams, adding depth to the biographical musical with his powerful vocals and emotional performances.
Although Claude Payton survived the transition from slave to freedman after the Civil War, the scars of his bondage never truly healed.
Khary Payton is an American actor and voice actor known for his roles in television and film, as well as his work in animation.
Barry Pearl is an American actor.Pearl is Barry Pearl is an American actor.Pearl is 74 years old and has had a long and successful career in film, television, and theater.
Anthony Peck died of cancer on July Anthony Peck's passing was a devastating loss to his family and the community, who cherished his kind spirit and contagious laughter.
What on earth is Gregory Peck doing Here's a continuation of the sentence with a diverse perspective:

"What on earth is Gregory Peck doing at the local art gallery opening?"
In The Films of Gregory Peck by In "The Films of Gregory Peck," the author meticulously analyzes the iconic actor's career, showcasing both his range and the profound impact he had on the silver screen.
The couple remained married until Gregory Peck's passing, showcasing the durability of their union.
Gregory Peck papers, Margaret Herrick Library, Academy Gregory Cochran, along with Henry Harpending and Jason Hardy, stirred controversy with their paper published in the "Bio-Social Science Journal," challenging long-held beliefs about human evolution.
Josh Peck uploaded his first video to YouTube in 2005 and hasn't looked back since, amassing a loyal following of millions.
One of the characters has "Sam Peckinpah" Sam Peckinpah, the iconic filmmaker known for his raw and violent depictions of human nature, was a character in his own right, leaving an indelible mark on the film industry.
"The Best Sam Peckinpah Westerns Are a Tribute to the暴力 and Revenge Plot."
Charlie Pecoraro is an American stage, television, and film actor known for his roles in "Law & Order: SVU" and "Boardwalk Empire."
Tom Pedi was an American actor whose talent shone on stage and screen, leaving a lasting legacy on the entertainment industry.
Ralph Peduto was an American actor, playwright, and director known for his innovative work in the theater community.
Scott Pembroke was an American director, actor and producer who was born on October 18, 1891. He began his career in vaudeville before moving on to silent films. Pembroke directed and appeared in several films throughout the 1920s, including 'The Sap', 'The Dude Ranger', and 'Arizona to Broadway'. He continued his career in talkies, appearing in films such as 'The Hunchback of Notre Dame' and 'The Great Ziegfeld'. Pembroke passed away on August 27, 1955.
Jerry Penacoli is an American actor and television personality known for his appearances on various shows.
Steve Pendleton was an American film and television actor known for his appearances in westerns and action films during the 1950s and 1960s.
In his relatively short career Bruce Penhall In his relatively short career Bruce Penhall became a legendary figure in the sport of speedway, capturing the World Championship title and thrilling fans with his fearless riding.
Bruce Penhall's debut in CHiPs came in Bruce Penhall's debut in CHiPs came in 1977, marking the beginning of his iconic role as Officer Jon Baker, which captivated audiences with its blend of action and humor.
Knowl Johnson is an American actor born on August 3, 1966. He is well-known for his roles in various movies and TV series, such as 'Danger Zone' and 'The Edge'.
Ernest Lamont Johnson Jr. was an American physicist who made significant contributions to the field of accelerator physics and technology, particularly in the development of the synchrotron.
Mark Noble, known as Noble Johnson, was a renowned African American actor who broke barriers in Hollywood during the silent film era.
Pat E. Johnson is a 9th degree black belt in taekwondo and has influenced countless martial artists around the world with his techniques and philosophy.
Raymond Edward Johnson was an American radio and television presenter known for his work on children's programming.
William Tefft Johnson, Jr., better known as Tefft Johnson, was an accomplished actor and director in the early days of cinema, known for his roles in films such as "The New Klondike" and "Home Wanted," and his brief but memorable appearance in "As You Like It."
J. W. Johnston was an Irish American stage performer known for his dynamic and larger-than-life stage presence.
Although J. W. Johnston was his most frequent pen name, the author was known to use a variety of aliases to publish his works.
J. W. Johnston died in Los Angeles two weeks after the release of his final album, leaving behind a legacy of groundbreaking country music.
Jay Johnston is an American actor and comedian known for his work on the sketch comedy show "Portlandia."
Jay Johnston's contribution to Mr. Show were not only hilarious, but also ingenious in their satirical take on modern culture.
Michael Joiner aka Michael Jeffrey Joiner is an American comedian and actor widely recognized for his brand of clean and sarcastic humor.
Al Jolson (born Asa Yoelson; 9 June 1886 – 23 October 1950) was an American singer, actor, comedian, and radio personality.
Stewart replied: "Al Jolson, from when we were children, has always been a source of inspiration for both of us.
In April 2019, Joe Jonas appeared at the Coachella music festival with his band DNCE, delivering an energetic performance that electrified the crowd.
Paul Kevin Jonas II is an American musician, actor, contractor, and entrepreneur who found fame as a member of the pop rock band Jonas Brothers.
Frank Jonasson was an American film actor who appeared in numerous silent films during the early 20th century, known for his dynamic screen presence and versatility in roles ranging from comedies to dramas.
Wesley Jonathan Waples is an American actor Wesley Jonathan Waples is an American actor known for his roles in popular TV shows such as "City Guys" and "The Game."
Andras Jones is an American television and film actor who is known for his roles in various projects across different platforms. He has gained significant recognition for his work in both mediums, displaying his versatility as an actor.
On March 18, 2014, Angus T. Jones officially left the popular sitcom "Two and a Half Men," citing the show's lack of moral integrity and his growing religious convictions.
Buck Jones was an American motion picture actor, screenwriter, and rodeo performer who captivated audiences with his thrilling performances in Western films during the early 20th century.
Buck Jones and The Night Riders – Buck Jones and The Night Riders was a popular American silent film series released by Pathé Exchange in 1925. The series starred Buck Jones, a former rodeo performer turned actor, who played a character named Buck Jones, a cowboy hero who fought against outlaws known as The Night Riders. The films were known for their action-packed scenes, thrilling chases, and Buck Jones's athleticism and charm. The series was a hit among audiences and helped to establish Jones as a leading star of the time.
Buck Jones and The Rock Creek Cattle Buck Jones was a popular silent film cowboy actor during the early 20th century, known for his roles in Western movies. He was born on October 17, 1889, in Spanish Fork, Utah, and initially worked as a rodeo performer before transitioning to film. Jones starred in numerous films during the 1920s and 1930s, often alongside his trusty steed, "Cowboy," and became a household name among moviegoers at the time.

The Rock Creek Cattle Company, on the other hand, was not directly associated with Buck Jones but was rather a business venture. The Rock Creek Cattle Company was a dude ranch and resort located in the Rock Creek Canyon area of the Custer National Forest in Montana. It was established in 1908 and operated as a guest ranch, offering tourists the opportunity to experience the "cowboy lifestyle" through activities like horseback riding, fishing, and hunting.

Although Buck Jones and The Rock Creek Cattle Company were not directly related, both were part of the broader cultural phenomenon of the American West during the early 20th century, which captivated the imagination of the public with its romanticized images of cowboys and the Wild West.
Buck Jones and The Killers of Crooked Creek were the subjects of my grandfather's most thrilling tales, their adventures as wild as the west itself.
Hayes MacArthur is an American stand-up comedian, Hayes MacArthur is an American stand-up comedian, known for his witty jokes and ability to bring laughter to audiences all across the country.
Scott MacArthur is an American actor and writer known for his work in both television and film.
Sam Maccarone is an actor, film director, and producer known for his work in both film and television. He has appeared in numerous projects, including the popular TV series "Stranger Things" and the critically acclaimed film "The Irishman." Maccarone has also directed and produced several projects, showcasing his versatility and talent in the entertainment industry.
Fred Mace was a comedic actor during the silent film era, known for his slapstick performances and physical comedy that delighted audiences worldwide.
Hamilton MacFadden was an American actor, screenwriter whose talent graced both the stage and screen, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment world.
George MacFarlane was a Canadian-born American actor who appeared in both film and television roles throughout his career. He was known for his performances in shows like "Battlestar Galactica" and "The X-Files," as well as for his film roles in movies such as "The Flock" and "The Day After Tomorrow." MacFarlane passed away in 2022, leaving behind a legacy of memorable performances in the entertainment industry.
Seth MacFarlane provides the voices of Stan Smith, Cleveland Brown, and Quagmire, showcasing his impressive range and versatility as an actor.
Seth MacFarlane played Tim the Bear until he decided to focus on his producing and directing career, leaving the character behind.
Antonio Macia is an American screenwriter and director known for his work in the film industry.
Carter MacIntyre is an American actor, best known for his role as Dr. gate on the ABC sitcom ""Modern Family"" which earned him an Emmy Award nomination.
Charles Emmett Mack, was an American film actor Charles Emmett Mack, was an American film actor known for his appearances in silent films during the early 20th century. He enjoyed a successful career in the entertainment industry, particularly starring in and directing several popular movies during the 1910s and 1920s.
Hughie Mack was an American actor of the silent film era, known for his larger-than-life performances on the big screen.
Willard Mack was a Canadian-American actor, director, Willard Mack was a Canadian-American actor, director, and playwright who made significant contributions to the early American stage, known for his dynamic performances and innovative theater practices.
Adopting the stage name Willard Mack, after years of hard work and dedication, the young actor finally received critical acclaim for his performance in a local play.
For a time, Willard Mack operated a small, family-owned farm, cultivating acres of fertile soil with his own hands and a deep love for the land.
William B. Mack was an American stage and screen actor who achieved stardom during the golden age of Hollywood. His commanding presence and磁性的嗓音使他在众多经典电影中脱颖而出，成为那个时代最受瞩目的明星之一。
Kenneth MacKenna was an American actor and director who made significant contributions to the stage and screen during the first half of the 20th century.
Philip Charles MacKenzie  is an American actor and director known for his versatile roles in film and television, including his performances in "Catfish in the Big City" and "The George Lopez Show."
Anthony Mackie is an American actor and producer known for his performances in both film and television.
Albert Macklin is an American film and television actor known for his versatile roles in both comedy and drama.
Charles Douglas MacLean was an American stage and radio actor known for his role as the title character in the radio series "The adventures of Ozzie and Harriet". He also appeared in several films and television shows throughout his career.
Gavin MacLeod is an American film and 电视演员，知名于参演《海盗船上的生活》和《豪斯医生》等作品，他在演艺界以多才多艺和敬业著称。
Peter MacNicol is an American actor and 导演，他的名字用汉语翻译过来通常指的是他本人或者他的作品。
Richard MacPherson is an actor from Hawaii, known for his roles in hit TV shows like "Lost" and "Hawaii Five-0", he brings a unique blend of Polynesian charm and dramatic depth to his performances.
Albert MacQuarrie was an American silent film Albert MacQuarrie was an American silent film actor, screenwriter, and director who worked in the early days of the motion picture industry. Active during the 1910s and 1920s, he is remembered for his roles in a variety of films, particularly those that were part of the Western genre, a popular and defining element of American silent cinema. MacQuarrie often played rugged cowboys and heroes, which were well-suited to his physical presence and horseback riding skills. He also directed and wrote scripts for several films, contributing to the creative output of the time and helping to shape the narrative conventions that would continue to resonate in American cinema long after the silent era ended.
Frank MacQuarrie was an American silent film actor who later became a highly respected film director known for his innovative techniques.
George MacQuarrie, George Donald MacQuarrie, was an 加拿大作家和记者，以其关于北极探险的书籍而知名。
Albert Gordon MacRae was an American actor, known for his roles in both film and television throughout the 20th century.
(Birch Lane Press, 1992) ISBN 978-1559721127
Gordon MacRae: Gordon MacRae is the author of the book "If I Should Die" published by Birch Lane Press in 1992. The ISBN number for this book is 978-1559721127.
Mike MacRae is an American stand-up comedian, he is known for his sharp wit and ability to deliver jokes with a dry, sarcastic delivery that leaves audiences in stitches.
Tim Maculan is an American film and Tim McLachlan is an American film and television actor, producer, screenwriter, and director, known for his work in films like "The Lord of the Rings: The Fellowship of the Ring," "Wild Tracks," and "Yogi Bear," as well as his production and writing credits on various projects.
Dave Madden also made guest appearances on various television shows throughout his acting career, including "Happy Days" and "The Love Boat."
James Madio is an American actor, known primarily for his roles in film and television, including his memorable performances in "The War of the Roses" and "The Basketball Diaries."
Guy Madison was an American film, television, ...actor who enjoyed a successful career spanning over two decades, known for his roles in classic Westerns and action series.
Noel Madison was an American character actor Noel Madison was an American character actor who brought a unique blend of charisma and depth to every role he portrayed, leaving a lasting impression on both audiences and his colleagues.
As a youth, John Magaro also appeared in several critically acclaimed films, showcasing his versatility as an actor.
John Magaro lives in and works out ...in a bustling city, where the energy of the streets fuels his creativity and dedication to his craft.
Brandon Maggart is an American actor, painter and artist who has brought his unique talents to various mediums, showcasing a diverse range of abilities that have captivated audiences in film, television, and the stage.
George Maharis is an American actor who George Maharis is an American actor who gained fame for his role on the popular CBS series 'Route 66' in the 1960s, which showcased his talent for character portrayals that resonated with audiences.
Christopher Maher is an American film and television actor known for his roles in various projects.
(née O'Malley) and Joseph Maher, a schoolteacher, (née O'Malley) and Joseph Maher, a schoolteacher, shared a love for education that was the cornerstone of their successful marriage.
Bruce Mahler is an American actor, producer, and comedian who has appeared in various television shows and movies throughout his career.
Jarrett Maier is an American actor known Jarrett Maier is an American actor known for his compelling performances on both the big screen and television, capturing the hearts of audiences with his versatility and strong screen presence.
Michael Maize is an American motion picture director and producer who has made significant contributions to the film industry through his innovative and thought-provoking short films.
George Majeroni, also known as Giorgio Majeroni, was an Italian actor who gained popularity in Argentine cinema during the 1940s and 1950s. He was born on October 22, 1897, in Genoa, Italy, and died on January 29, 1972, in Buenos Aires, Argentina. Majeroni is known for his roles in films such as "Carmen", "Maria de los Angeles", "Cuando canta la mujer", and "El difunto está vivo". He also had a brief career in Mexican cinema.
Mario Majeroni was an Italian-born American playwright Mario Majeroni, an Italian-born American playwright, brought a unique blend of European flair and American storytelling to the stage, crafting memorable plays that resonated with diverse audiences.
Lee Majors is an American film, television actor and producer known for his roles in popular series such as "The Six Million Dollar Man" and "The Bionic Man."
Lee Majors appeared in seasons 2 and 3 of the popular science fiction series "The Six Million Dollar Man," solidifying his role as an iconic television action hero.
Ray Mala was one of Hollywood's Native American actors who broke barriers and paved the way for Indigenous representation in film.
Ray Mala's career had peaked in the 1930s when he was one of the first Native Americans to star in a Hollywood feature film.
Ray Mala gained praise following Eskimo  Ray Mala gained praise following Eskimo for his authentic portrayal of an Inuit character, which was a rare and groundbreaking representation at the time.
Rick Malambri is an American actor, dancer, and model who gained prominence for his dynamic role as Luke Katcher in the hit 3D dance film "Step Up 3D." His life and career are a testament to the dedication and hard work required to succeed in the entertainment industry.
Guide to the Gerard Malanga Papers, Beinecke The Gerard Malanga Papers, held within the Beinecke Rare Book and Manuscript Library at Yale University, offer an invaluable resource for scholars and researchers interested in the life and work of this significant figure in the New York underground art scene of the 1970s and 1980s. As an archivist, Malanga's papers provide a unique window into the creative and social networks of the period, which included such luminaries as Andy Warhol and the Factory scene.

The collection is particularly rich in documentation related to Malanga's own artistic output, which spanned photography, film, performance art, and writing. It includes personal correspondences, notes, diaries, and drafts of his various projects, offering researchers a chance to understand the artist's process and the evolution of his ideas.

Of particular interest are the extensive photograph albums that Malanga compiled, which capture moments from the vibrant cultural life of the time and the individuals who shaped it. These images serve not only as a visual record but also as a social history of the era.

The papers also contain materials related to Malanga's involvement with the music scene, including his work with the band, the Velvet Underground, and his efforts to document the live performances of the period through photography and film.

Beyond Malanga's personal archive, the Beinecke Library itself is a treasure trove for the study of 20th-century American literature and art. Its holdings include numerous rare books, manuscripts, and literary archives that provide a rich context for understanding Malanga's place within the broader cultural landscape of his time.

For researchers, the Beinecke Library offers a conducive environment for study, with advanced reading rooms and tools for scholarly work. Access to the Gerard Malanga Papers would require proper academic credentials and researchers would need to comply with the library's rules and regulations regarding the use of its collections.

In summary, the Gerard Malanga Papers at the Beinecke Library are a vital resource for anyone seeking to explore the cultural and artistic history of New York City during the late 20th century, offering a glimpse into the life and work of an artist who played a significant role in the underground scene of that time.
Ryan Malaty is an American actor and comedian who has gained widespread recognition for his memorable performances in both film and television.
"Interview with Rami Malek of The War "Interview with Rami Malek of The War" is an enlightening conversation that delves into the actor's experiences playing a complex character in a gripping political drama.
Gene Malin, also known by stage names Gene Malin, also known by stage names such as "The Voice of Velvet," was a renowned crooner in the 1940s, captivating audiences with his smooth, sultry sound.
The company released its John Malkovich menswear collection, featuring a variety of sophisticated and stylish pieces inspired by the legendary actor. The collection includes tailored suits, elegant dress shirts, and tailored sportswear, all designed to embody John Malkovich's unique blend of charisma and sophistication. With attention to detail and quality craftsmanship, this latest release from the company continues to establish its reputation as a purveyor of refined and distinctive men's fashion.
Charles Rory Mallinson was an American actor Charles Rory Mallinson was an American actor known for his versatility in both stage and screen roles.
Edward Mallory was an American actor, best known for his role as Dr. Markham on the ABC sitcom "That's My Boy" from 1963 to 1965.
Matt Malloy is an American actor and comedian who has appeared in various films and television shows throughout his career.
Dudley Field Malone was an American attorney, politician, Dudley Field Malone was an American attorney, politician, and judge who was known for his persuasive arguments and strong beliefs in equal rights.
Leo D. Maloney was an American film actor, Leo D. Maloney was an American film actor, known for his roles in silent films during the early 20th century. He appeared in over 150 films between 1909 and 1933, often playing detectives and heroes in thrillers and action movies. His career experienced a decline with the advent of talking pictures, but he continued to have bit parts in films until the late 1930s.
Paul Malvern was a film producer, child and assistant director known for his work on movies like "Monterey Pirates," "Sudan," and "Dracula's House." He played a significant role in the production of these films, ensuring that they were brought to life for audiences to enjoy.
Peter Mamakos was an American film and television actor, producer, and writer known for his work on shows like "The Sopranos" and "Oz." He was born on February 18, 1955, in Brooklyn, New York, and passed away on July 19, 2021, at the age of 66. Mamakos had a long and varied career in the entertainment industry, appearing in numerous films and TV series, including "Goodfellas," "The Basketball Diaries," and "Law & Order." He was also known for his role as Officer Mike Sisko on the hit HBO series "The Wire."
Michael Manasseri is an American actor and filmmaker known for his diverse range of roles in both television and film.
Aasif Mandvi on IMDb
Aasif Mandvi on Twitter
"A stellar actor who brings depth and nuance to every role, Aasif Mandvi has become a beloved figure in the entertainment industry."
– Interview
One on One – Aasif Mandvi In this revealing interview, Aasif Mandvi probes deeply into the personal and professional life of his guest, unearthing both triumphs and challenges, leaving the audience with a nuanced understanding of the human experience.
Jon Manfrellotti is an American actor who Jon Manfrellotti is an American actor who has brought to life a variety of characters in both film and television, ranging from the cab driver in the romantic comedy "A Cinderella Story" to roles in critically acclaimed series such as "Mad Men" and "Men of a Certain Age," showcasing his versatility and ability to resonate with diverse audiences.
Kevin Mangold is an actor and former Kevin Mangold is an actor and former competitive athlete who brings a dynamic presence to the stage and screen.
Sebastian Maniscalco is an American stand-up comedian Sebastian Maniscalco is an American stand-up comedian known for his relatable humor and observational comedy style.
Anthony Mann was an American actor and director known for his collaborations with James Stewart in the 1950s, producing some of the most critically acclaimed Westerns and crime dramas of the era.
Byron Mann, is a Hong Kong American actor, known for his roles in various TV shows and movies, showcasing his versatility in the entertainment industry.
Gabriel Mann is an American actor and Gabriel Mann is an American actor and musician, known for his roles in The Client List and The Mentalist.
Gabriel Mann also studied acting at The Gabriel Mann also studied acting at The University of California, Santa Barbara, where he honed his craft and developed a deep passion for the arts.
Hank Mann was a comedian and silent film actor who specialized in playing robust, happy-go-lucky characters, often with a mischievous glint in his eye.
Howard Mann was an American actor and entertainer who captivated audiences with his dynamic stage presence and charismatic performances.
Louis Mann was an American theatre actor Louis Mann was an American theatre actor who gained moderate success in his career, leaving a lasting impression on those who had the chance to see his performances.
Viktor Manoel is a Mexican–American dancer, choreographer, and entrepreneur known for his boundary-pushing contemporary dance performances that blend cultural influences with modern techniques.
Viktor Manoel has also appeared in film Viktor Manoel has also appeared in film, showcasing his versatile talent in both theater and cinema.
... Marilyn Manson is owned by Brian ... Marilyn Manson is a music icon, Brian is his manager.
Maurice Manson was a Canadian character actor Maurice Manson was a Canadian character actor known for his versatility and compelling performances in both film and television.
Paul Mantee was an American film and television actor known for his roles in various genres throughout his career.
Joe Mantell was an American film and theater actor who was active during the golden age of Hollywood, known for his distinctive performances and rich body of work.
Michael Mantenuto was an American film actor, correct, he was an American actor known for his role in the film "Miracle" as well as appearances in various television series such as "ER" and "The Unit". He passed away in 2017 at the age of 35.
Randolph Mantooth is an American actor who Randolph Mantooth is an American actor who is known for his role as John Gage on the Emmy Award-winning television series " Emergency!"
Randolph Mantooth has spoken regularly at Firefighter Randolph Mantooth has spoken regularly at Firefighter conferences, inspiring countless first responders with his tales of heroism and dedication.
Randolph Mantooth and Kevin Tighe were part Randolph Hernandez, with his extensive background in technology, product management, event production, and hospitality, brings a rich tapestry of experience to any project he undertakes.
Jason Mantzoukas is an American comedic actor, Jason Mantzoukas has brought laughter to countless viewers with his engaging and humorous performances.
Ralph Manza was a character actor who ...left an indelible mark on the entertainment industry with his memorable performances in both film and television.
Ted Mapes was an American character actor, Ted Mapes was an American character actor, known for his memorable roles in both television and film, bringing depth and nuance to a variety of characters throughout his career.
Paul Marcarelli is an American actor, who has appeared in numerous television shows and commercials, known for his role as the AT&T "It's Not Complicated" spokesman.
Jay Marchant was an American film director Jay Marchant was an American film director who helmed several projects over the course of his career. He gained prominence for his work in various genres, including drama, comedy, and action. Marchant's directing style was known for its precision and ability to draw compelling performances from his actors. Some of his notable films include "East of Nowhere," "The Agent," and "Deadly Crossing." Unfortunately, information about Jay Marchant's life and career is limited, and he may not be as widely recognized as some of his contemporaries. Nonetheless, his contributions to the world of cinema are undeniable, and he remains an important figure in the history of American filmmaking.
Bruce Marchiano is an American actor and Christian evangelist known for his roles in Christian films such as "The Jewish Lion" and "This Is Our Time."
David Marciano is an American actor best known for his role as Detective Stevehad on the television series "Hill Street Blues".
Anthony Marciona  is an American film, 电视和舞台剧演员，以及一个知名的社交媒体影响者，以其在多个领域的多才多艺和积极参与社会正义运动而受到认可。
Paul Marco was an American actor who Paul Marco was an American actor who is best remembered for his brief but memorable role as a police officer in the classic 1931 horror film, "Dracula."
On May 14, 2006, Paul Marco died On May 14, 2006, Paul Marco, a dedicated actor known for his memorable role as OfficerDatabase on the classic television series "Topper," passed away at the age of 86. His contributions to the entertainment industry and his warm, engaging performances will be forever cherished by fans and colleagues alike.
Kipp Marcus is an American actor, screenwriter, and director known for his work in both film and television, with a diverse range of roles that have showcased his versatility and talent.
Richard Marcus is an American actor and 导演，以他在戏剧和电影界的广泛贡献而闻名。
Stuart Margolin is an American film, theater, Stuart Margolin is an American film, theater, and television actor who has appeared in numerous roles over his long career. He is known for his performances in films like "Groundhog Day" and "The Jerk," as well as his extensive work in television, including appearances in shows like "The Mentalist" and "The X-Files." Margolin has also been recognized for his theater work, earning a Tony Award nomination for his performance in the 1977 revival of "Gypsy."
John Mariano is an American actor and comedian who has gained significant popularity for his work on the sitcom "The Mandalorian."
Russ Marin was an American film and television actor known for his versatility andCommanding presence on screen.
Eric Da Re is an American actor who Eric Da Re is an American actor who has appeared in various roles across film and television, showcasing his versatility and skill.
He is sometimes credited as Eric Da Re, a stage name he adopted for his career in the entertainment industry, which allowed him to diversify his acting roles and maintain a level of anonymity.
Howard Da Silva was an American actor, director Howard Da Silva was an American actor, director, and singer who was blacklisted during the McCarthy era due to his political views.
Donnie Dacus is a guitarist, singer, actor, Donnie Dacus is a guitarist, singer, actor, and songwriter, known for his contributions to the rock music scene in the 1970s and 1980s.
"FILM; Willem Dafoe, Looking for Characters With "FILM; Willem Dafoe, Looking for Characters With Multidimensional Depth"
Jim Dale,  is an English actor, Jim Dale is an English actor, known for his work in stage, film, television, and especially for his audio book narrations.
Emmett Dalton was an American outlaw, train robber, and bank robber who was part of the Dalton Gang, 
Emmett Dalton was severely wounded, receiving 23 gunshot wounds during the Coen brothers' film "No Country for Old Men," a haunting adaptation of Cormac McCarthy's novel.
But, unlike the factual history, Emmett Dalton "But, unlike the factual history, Emmett Dalton's account of the Coffeyville Raid was embellished with romanticized details to enhance his own legend."
Michael Damian Weir is an American actor, screenwriter, and producer, known for his work in both film and television.
Nick Damici is an American actor and writer known for his work in genre films and his distinctive style.
Gabriel Damon Lavezzi is a former actor Gabriel Damon Lavezzi is a former actor who has since transitioned into a successful career as a renowned chef.
Mark Damon is an American film actor who has starred in both blockbuster hits and independent films, showcasing his versatility and dedication to his craft.
In 2010, Matt Damon narrated the documentary 'The World According to Monsanto,' which exposed the controversial practices of the global seed giant Monsanto.
On March 13, 2018, Matt Damon and Ben Affleck made headlines when they publicly apologized for their past behavior and vowed to be more inclusive and diverse in their future projects.
Matt Damon and Ben Affleck: On and off the screen, their friendship has weathered the storms of Hollywood fame.
Rod Dana is an American former actor, Rod Dana is an American former actor, known for his role in the 1950s television series "Captain Video, Master of the Videotrons."
Malcolm Danare is an American actor and Malcolm Danare is an American actor and film producer, known for his roles in movies like 'Jurassic Park' and 'Choke'.
Malcolm Danare had never been in front of a camera before he was cast in the film "Jurassic Park," and his nervous performance as the park's兽医 John Arnold added a layer of authenticity to the blockbuster.
Karl Dane  was a Danish-American comedian Karl Dane was a Danish-American comedian who faced tough times due to his ethnicity but still managed to entertain people with his hilarious acts.
Karl Dane's rapid career decline, depression and 最终导致了他的悲剧性死亡。Karl Dane是一位丹麦出生的美国演员，在20世纪20年代和30年代初期因其在电影中的喜剧角色而广受欢迎。然而，随着有声电影的兴起，他的职业生涯开始走下坡路，因为他有一个浓重的口音，这在当时成为了他在屏幕上的一大障碍。

随着他的事业受挫，Dane面临着经济和个人问题，这些问题加剧了他的抑郁症。在1930年代中期，他的情况变得更加糟糕，最终导致他在1937年与他的情妇一起自杀。Dane的去世是好莱坞历史上的一个悲剧，反映了当时许多演员在职业生涯晚期所面临的挑战和压力。

这一事件也揭示了娱乐业背后的残酷现实，以及它如何影响艺人的心理健康和福祉。随着时间的推移，人们开始更加重视和理解名人在光鲜亮丽的外表下所经历的困难。
The Billy Daniels Show was sponsored by a popular local radio station known for its diverse music programming.
Dee Jay Daniels is an American former television actor and producer who is best known for his role as the voice of Milo on the animated series "Milo Murphy's Law."
Richard Daniels Jr. professionally Mickey Daniels, was an American child actor who achieved his greatest fame during the 1930s. He
"Ted Danson and Zach Galifianakis: Broadway Rock The pairing of Ted Danson and Zach Galifianakis on Broadway in the critically acclaimed production of "Broadway Rock" was a testament to the versatility andRange of both actors.
Michael Dante is an American actor and former professional wrestler, known for his appearances in various television shows and films throughout his career.
Ray Danton, also known as Raymond Danton, was an American actor and producer known for his roles in classic films like "The Godfather" and "Casino."
Tony Danza is an American actor, television personality, and singer who has appeared in numerous films and television shows throughout his career.
Allen Danziger is an American former actor, best known for his role in the 1967 film "The Graduate," where he played the character of Ben Braddock.
Cory Danziger is an American actor, political activist, and social media personality known for his roles in films like "Miracle on 7th Street," "Boys Don't Cry," and "Beethoven."
Bobby Darin was an American singer, songwriter, actor, and writer whose talent and versatility made him a beloved figure in the entertainment world during the late 1950s and early 1960s.
Bobby Darin at Find a Grave
"Beyond the Shallows: The Untold Story of Bobby Darin" offers a captivating glimpse into the complex life and untimely death of the legendary singer.
Frankie Darro was an American actor and race car driver who had a successful career in both film and television during the 1930s and 1940s.
From then on, Frankie Darro was usually From then on, Frankie Darro was usually cast in supporting roles, never quite reaching the stardom he had briefly tasted.
The Frankie Darro series was so successful it launched a new era of Hollywood stardom for the charismatic actor.
Frankie Darro is probably best known to audiences for his roles in 1930s Hollywood films, where he showcased his versatility as an actor.
Henry Darrow is a Nuyorican character actor who has brought depth and nuance to a multitude of roles, enriching the cultural landscape of television and film.
Interview with Henry Darrow at Classic Film Interview with Henry Darrow at Classic Film Festival: A Nostalgic Trip throughcelluloid History
John Darrow was an American actor of John Darrow was an American actor of the silent film era, known for his smouldering good looks and intense performances.
Steve Daskewisz, also known as Steve Dash ...is an American actor and stuntman who has made a name for himself in the horror film industry with his memorable performances in iconic franchises like 'A Nightmare on Elm Street' and 'Halloween.'
Sabu Dastagir was an Indian film actor Sabu Dastagir was an Indian film actor who left an indelible mark on the Bollywood industry with his versatile performances.
James Daughton is a film and television actor and producer known for his work on various projects including the hit AMC series "The Walking Dead."
Many do not know that James Daughton Many do not know that James Daughton was a pioneering African American mathematician who significantly contributed to the field of cryptography during World War II.
Richard Davalos was an American stage, film, ...and television actor who garnered critical acclaim for his compelling performances throughout his career.
Kenneth Davenport, was an American film actor Kenneth Davenport was an American film actor who appeared in numerous silent films during the early 20th century. Active primarily between 1910 and the mid-1920s, Davenport often played leading roles and was known for his versatility, able to navigate a range of characters from romantic leads to dramatic heroes. One of his more memorable roles was as the title character in the 1914 film 'The Count of Monte Cristo,' which allowed him to showcase his ability to play complex and dynamic characters. Despite the end of the silent film era, Davenport's contributions to early cinema have been recognized and celebrated by film historians, who note the influence he had on the development of the American film industry.
Brett Davern is an American actor known Brett Davern is an American actor known for his role as Dave on the MTV teen drama "Awkward."
Many try, but Robert Davi has the smoothest voice in the world of entertainment.
Keith David Williams is an American actor born on June 4, 1956, in Harlem, New York, United States of America. Currently, he is 66 years old and his real name is Keith David Williams. He is well-known for his work in various movies and TV shows, including "The Thing," "Platoon," and "Child's Play."
Keith David also has a recurring role Keith David's recurring role adds depth and complexity to the series, engaging viewers with his seasoned acting chops.
Jaye Davidson is an American-born British model Jaye Davidson is an American-born British model and actor known for his role in the film "Strange Days."
Grande's song "Pete Davidson" appears on her sophomore studio album, "Thank U, Next," which was released in 2018.
William B. Davidson was an American film [1]:
1. C. Some animals in big forest
2. B. cats
3. A. 没有
4. 略
5. 略
6. 略
7. A. mustn't
8. 略
9. 略
10. 略

[2]:
Dear Peter,

I'm writing to express my sincere gratitude for your help and friendship during the 20-day English summer camp organized by our school in collaboration with the American institution. During the camp, my spoken English improved a lot, and I gained a deeper understanding of American culture. I truly appreciate your patience and encouragement.

I am also grateful for the opportunity to make friends with you and other participants from different countries. The camp was a great experience, and I have learned a lot from everyone.

Please accept my best wishes for your future endeavors. I hope we can keep in touch and explore more opportunities to learn from each other.

Yours sincerely,
Li Hua

[3]:
Dear Peter,

I hope this email finds you well. I am writing to seek your advice on preparing for the SAT exam, as I am planning to study in the United States for college.

Could you please tell me about the format and main content of the SAT exam? I would be grateful if you could provide any tips or strategies for the reading section, as I find it particularly challenging.

Thank you in advance for your help. I am looking forward to your reply.

Best regards,
Li Hua
Geraint Wyn Davies is a Welsh-born Canadian stage, screen and television actor known for his role as the title character in the 1985 TV series "Captain Power and the Soldiers of the Future".

[2]:  title：The Canadian Encyclopedia
摘要：John Diefenbaker, lawyer, politician (b at Nipawin, SK 1895; d at Ottawa 17 Aug 1979). Prime minister of Canada from 1957 to 1963, Diefenbaker was the first prime minister from the Prairie provinces. As a lawyer, he was involved in a number of notable cases, including the 1946 Co-operative Commonwealth Federation (CCF) government of Saskatchewan's challenge to the federal government's power under the War Measures Act. He was also involved in the 1948 case that led to the adoption of the Canadian Bill of Rights by the Parliament of Canada. Diefenbaker was known for his strong oratory skills, his passionate defence of individual rights and his advocacy for the underdog.

即使在他担任律师时期，John Diefenbaker 就已经展现出了他对正义的坚定追求和对弱势群体的深切关怀。
Jeremy Davies is an American film and television actor known for his roles in critically acclaimed projects.
Benjamin Byron Davis is an American actor, writer, and producer known for his appearances in films and television shows such as "The Wire," "The Dark Knight," and "Marvel's Daredevil." He has also written and produced his own projects, showcasing his talent and versatility in the entertainment industry.
Charles Michael Davis is an American actor, model, and artist whose diverse range of talents has captivated audiences across various media platforms. His extensive career in television and film has seen him portray a myriad of characters, each with a unique depth and nuance that showcase his versatility as a performer. From his breakthrough role as Kwan Kirkland in "The Game" to his enigmatic portrayal of Liam in "Switched at Birth," Davis has established himself as a pivotal figure in contemporary television. His inclusion in the cast of "The Vampire Diaries" spin-off, "The Originals," further solidified his status as a fan-favorite actor, adding a dynamic layer to the rich tapestry of the supernatural drama. Off-screen, Davis's influence extends to his work as a model, where his charismatic presence and striking good looks have made him a sought-after figure in various advertising campaigns. His journey from his early days in South Carolina to the bright lights of Hollywood is a testament to his hard work, talent, and the universal appeal of his artistic endeavors.
Clifton Davis is a graduate of Pine ...Hill High School, where he cultivated his passion for music and theater.
Daniel Davis is an American stage, screen, and television actor best known for his role as Lieutenant Colonel John Sheppard on the science fiction series Stargate Atlantis.
Antoine DeRay Davis is an American stand-up comedy actor and writer, known for his roles in films like '21 Jump Street' and 'Barbershop'. He has also appeared in several TV shows and has performed his stand-up comedy routines on various platforms. Davis, who was born and raised on the south side of Chicago, has successfully transitioned from a comedian to an actor.
Duane Davis is an American actor who has appeared in numerous films and television series, known for his versatile roles and strong acting performances.
Eugene M. Davis is an American actor known Eugene M. Davis is an American actor known for his versatile roles in both stage and screen, captivating audiences with his powerful performances.
LaVan Davis is an American singer, comedian, actor, and producer. He is best known for his roles in various stage plays and television shows, including "The Mo'Nique Show" and "Tyler Perry's House of Payne." Davis has also appeared in several films, such as "Madea's Big Happy Family" and "I Can Do Bad All by Myself," both directed by Tyler Perry.
Morris Mac Davis is an American country [1]: 
1. B. 4021877
2. A. 9 a.m. ~ 5 p.m. on weekdays
3. A. American jazz
4. D. twelve
5.未知，需要更多信息

[2]: 
1. A. is the right person for the new position
2. C. He will represent the US government
3. A. trade experience
4. B. worked as a houseboy for an American family

[3]: 
67. B. the lasting damage to health caused by environmental pollution
68. D. Davis put her real-life experience into the book
69. A. The reasoning method
70. C. introduce When Smoke Ran Like Water to readers
Mac Davis, the only white man in the bar, felt uncomfortable as the room fell silent, waiting to see how he'd react to the racially charged joke.
Mac Davis eventually recorded the tune after he was captivated by its catchy melody and heartfelt lyrics during a chance performance.
(1965)
The Sammy Davis Jr. Show – Host
Alice In Wonderland (1965) - Starring Sammy Davis Jr. as the Mad Hatter
Sammy Davis Jr. talks to draft dodgers in a heartfelt and empathetic conversation, offering them guidance and support as they navigate their difficult situation.
"In 1964 his company Sid Davis Productions "In 1964 his company Sid Davis Productions began creating low-budget educational and industrial films that would become infamous for their kitschy and sometimes disturbing imagery."
"Sid Davis, 90; producer of cautionary films Sid Davis, 90; producer of cautionary films for schools and industrial clients, has passed away.
"Sid Davis, producer of 1950s school films, "Sid Davis, producer of 1950s school films, unintentionally terrified a generation of children with his creepy educational shorts."
Sid Davis on IMDb
Sid Davis at the Internet Movie Database (IMDb) is an online database of information related to films, television programs, home videos, and people involved in the entertainment industry. It is a subsidiary of Amazon.com, Inc. and is one of the most comprehensive and authoritative sources for entertainment information.
Bruce Davison is an American actor and screenwriter, known for his performances in various iconic films.
Ken Davitian is an Armenian–American actor, comedian Ken Davitian has brought a unique Armenian-American perspective to the acting world, using his comedic talent to entertain and break cultural barriers.
For other people named Bennett Joshua Davlin, see Bennett Joshua Davlin (disambiguation).
Bennett Joshua Davlin is an American novelist, screenwriter, and playwright best known for his work in the science fiction and fantasy genres, as well as his contributions to the Star Trek universe.
Richard Dawson was a British-American actor, comedian, and game show host whose career spanned several decades, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
Timothy E. Day as Blanky, an electric blanket warmth, comfort, and reliability to those curled up in bed on a cold winter's night.
Danny Dayton was an American actor and politician who had a successful career in both fields.
Lee de Broux  is an American character actor and producer known for his roles in films like "Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil" and "The Pelican Brief," as well as his extensive theater career.
Joel de la Fuente is an American actor known for his performances in both TV and film, as well as his extensive work in theater.
Anthony De La Torre is an American actor, singer, and multi-talented artist known for his dynamic performances and contributions to the entertainment industry.
Philippe De Lacy was a silent film era actor who broke barriers with his ethnically diverse portrayals, offering a rare glimpse of inclusivity in an era defined by stereotypes.
John de Lancie is an American actor, director, producer, writer, educator, sailor, voice artist, and comedian, best known for his roles in various television series and films. He has portrayed diverse characters, showcasing his versatility and talent in the entertainment industry.
Kamar de los Reyes is an Cuban-Puerto Rican theater, film, and television actor known for his dynamic performances and versatile skill set.
Rudy De Luca is an American screenwriter and actor who has made significant contributions to the entertainment industry with his witty and engaging scripts.
Floyd Wood better known as Gordon De Main, Floyd Wood, better known by his alias Gordon De Main, was a mysterious figure in the art world, known for his elusive nature and enigmatic creations.
Darin De Paul is an American actor and voice talent known for his work in both film and video games, bringing diverse characters to life with his rich and versatile performances.
Paul De Rolf was an American actor, choreographer, and dancer who gained recognition for his roles in iconic films such as "Beverly Hillbillies" and "Janie Egles," as well as his contributions to the performing arts.
Rex De Rosselli, was an American actor of Italian descent known for his roles in silent films.
Reed De Rouen was an American actor and versatile performer who graced the stage and screen with his dynamic presence.
Joseph De Stefani was an American character actor Joseph De Stefani, with his robust background in theater, brought a commanding presence to the screen that audiences couldn't help but be drawn to.
William De Vaull - also credited as William De Vaull, was an American actor who appeared in over 100 films during his career, which spanned more than two decades.
Harry De Vere was an American silent film actor who achieved great fame in the early 20th century, but has been largely forgotten by modern audiences.
His father, Herman Frank De Vol, was band-leader His father, Herman Frank De Vol, was a renowned band-leader who captivated audiences with his energetic conducting and arrangements.
"Frank De Vol's orchestra" was featured on the radio show, playing popular big band music that transported listeners back to a golden age of swing.
Jesse De Vorska was a Russian-born American film director known for his bold storytelling and unique visual style.
William Christy Cabanne was an American film director and producer known for his work in the silent film era.
Bill Cable was an American actor, model, and producer known for his roles in films like "Miami Vice" and "The Terminator" series. He passed away in 2014 at the age of 68.
Bruce Cabot was an American film actor, best known for his role as Jack Driscoll in the 1933 film King Kong.
Frank Cady died at his home on June 6, 2021, surrounded by his loving family, leaving behind a legacy of television excellence.
James Cagney III died from a heart attack at the age of 86, leaving behind a legacy of remarkable performances and a legacy of hard work and dedication to his craft.
Gregory Cahill is an American director, producer, and screenwriter known for his work in the independent film scene.
Howard Caine was an American character actor, best known for his roles in various television series and movies throughout the 1970s and 1980s.
Pasquale Cajano was an Italian-American New York ... mobster who rose to power during the Prohibition era, leaving a legacy of crime and controversy.
Pasquale Cajano was also a well known Pasquale Cajano was also a well-known restaurateur, known for his exquisite cuisine and warm hospitality.
Rory Calhoun was an American film and television actor known for his roles in Westerns and other genres, leaving a legacy of memorable performances.
Joseph Cali is an American actor known Joseph Cali is an American actor known for his memorable roles in iconic films like Saturday Night Fever and My Big Fat Greek Wedding.
Frank Caliendo Jr. is an American comedian, actor, and impressionist known for his work on shows like "MADtv" and "Frank TV," as well as his ability to impersonate a wide range of celebrities and political figures.
Demetrius Calip is an American professional basketball player who currently plays for the Dallas Mavericks of the National Basketball Association (NBA).
Michael Callan is an American actor best known for his roles in various television series and movies throughout his career. He has appeared in popular shows such as "Barnaby Jones" and "Murder She Wrote", and has also starred in feature films like "The Longest Yard" and "Cannonball Run II". Callan's acting career has spanned over five decades, allowing him to establish himself as a versatile and respected actor in the industry.
Charlie Callas was an American comedian and actor who was known for his zany humor and unique comedy style that captivated audiences for decades.
Dayton Callie is an American actor, best known for his roles as Charley Bubbles on "Miami Vice" and as corrections officer Byron "Preacher" Crowes on "Sons of Anarchy."
Steve Calvert was a prolific gorilla suit actor who brought joy to audiences with his memorable performances in various films and television shows.
Christian Camargo is an American actor, producer, and entrepreneur who has followed in the footsteps of hisactor family, showcasing his versatility in both dramatic roles like his portrayal of Brian Moser in Dexter and his entrepreneurial spirit through the establishment of a luxury car customization company.
Peter Cambor is an American film and 电视演员 and producer, known for his roles in shows like "NCIS: Los Angeles" and "The Expanse." He has also appeared in various films such as "Walking Tall" and "Transformers: Dark of the Moon."
After further studies, Peter Cambor received an After further studies, Peter Cambor received an exciting offer for a PhD program in evolutionary biology.
Joey Camen is an American voice actor, committed to bringing characters to life with his versatile and dynamic voice, adept in both comedic and dramatic roles, widely recognized for his work in video games and animated series.
Dean Cameron is an American television and 电影演员，以其在多部流行剧集和电影中的出色表现而闻名。
Hamilton Camp was a British-American singer-songwriter and actor known for his contributions to folk music and his activism during the civil rights movement.
Hamilton Camp also voiced for Hanna–Barbera; as a result, he brought his unique talent to beloved characters like Yogi Bear and Quick Draw McGraw, leaving an indelible mark on animation history.
David Campagna was an American visual artist David Campagna was an American visual artist known for his intricate papercuttings and large-scale murals that often carried themes of social justice and human rights. His work was celebrated for its bold use of color and its ability to provoke thought and conversation, making him a significant voice in the contemporary art world.
reality series, with Bruce Campbell serving as the host, showcasing individuals who have unique abilities or skills that defy conventional norms.
The Bruce Campbell Way was published on August 25, 2021.
J. Kenneth Campbell is an American film, stage, and television actor who has appeared in numerous productions throughout his career.
Rob Campbell is an actor in stage, screen, and television, known for his roles in films like "The Basketball Diaries" and "Lost in Translation," as well as his Tony Award-nominated performance in the stage production of "The Glass Menagerie."
Scott Michael Campbell is an American actor, writer, and director known for his roles in films like 'Drugstore Cowboy' and 'Empire Records.' His diverse career has spanned over two decades, allowing him to showcase his range as an artist.
Webster Campbell was an American silent film actor known for his roles in Westerns and as a rodeo performer. He was born on June 27, 1880, in New Mexico and began his career in film in 1909. Campbell's most notable films include "The Great Train Robbery" (1903) and "The Outlaw" (1921). He retired from acting in 1935 and passed away on January 17, 1962.
Bruno Campos is a Brazilian-American actor and entertainment professional who has made significant contributions to both Brazilian and American culture through his work in film and television.
Johnny Cannizzaro is an American stage, film actor, and singer known for his roles in both musicals and Shakespearean plays, bringing a dynamic and versatile presence to the stage.
Glenn Cannon was an American actor and politician who was known for his role in the TV series 'Hawaii Five-0'.
On December 6, 2011, Nick Cannon released 他的第五张录音室专辑《Wild 'N Out》，该专辑收录了多首热门单曲，展现了他在音乐领域的才华和多样性。
In 2012, Nick Cannon created a sketch-comedy show called "Lip Sync Battle" that became a viral phenomenon, paving the way for similar competitions and showcasing the comedic talents of both celebrities and everyday people.
Nick Cannon's show replaced J. Cruz's "The Cruz Control" morning show, causing mixed emotions among listeners who had grown accustomed to his playful banter and familiar voice.
Mario Cantone is an American comedian, writer and actor known for his work in both stage and screen, bringing laughter and joy to audiences across the United States.
Paul Carafotes (born March 23, 1959 in Cambridge, Massachusetts) is an American actor and screenwriter known for his work on various television shows and films.
Antony Carbone (born in Calabria, Italy July 1957) is an Italian-American actor and musician. He is best known for his role as Salvatore "Sal" Conti on the NBC sitcom "Carlton Banks" and its spin-off "The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air." He has also appeared in several films, including "Stayin' Alive," "Beverly Hills Cop," and "Weekend at Bernie's." In addition to his acting career, Carbone is also a talented musician who has released several albums of original music.
Steve Cardenas has been in martial arts since he was a child, starting with his first role as a Power Ranger, which sparked his lifelong passion for the discipline.
Arthur Edmund Carewe, born Hovsep Hovsepian, was an American actor and film director of Armenian descent who achieved prominence in the silent film era.
Edwin Carewe was a Native American motion picture director who made significant contributions to the film industry, breaking barriers for Indigenous filmmakers.
Edward Macdonald Carey was an American actor, director, and playwright, widely known for his adaptations of classic literature, including his most famous work, "The Importance of Being Earnest," based on the Oscar Wilde play.
Carmine Caridi was an American film, television actor and film editor, best known for his role in "The Godfather" series.
Richard Carle was an American stage and screen actor who enjoyed a successful career spanning over three decades.
Lloyd B. Carleton was an early film director Lloyd B. Carleton was an early film director whose contributions to the silent era have unfortunately been largely overlooked, despite his innovative storytelling techniques and ability to capture the essence of human emotion on screen.
George Carlin at The Interviews: An Oral History of Comedy, the volume offers a revealing look at the iconic comedian's life and career through the eyes of his colleagues, friends, and fans.
Sergio Carlo is a Dominican actor and Sergio Carlo is a Dominican actor and he has appeared in various Spanish-language telenovelas, gaining popularity for his compelling performances.
Also, in his native country, Sergio Carlo 抱歉，您似乎没有完成您的句子。请提供更多的信息或者重新表达您的意思，我会很乐意为您提供帮助。
Richard Carlyle was a film, television and video game concept artist, known for his work on the Harry Potter franchise, The Dark Knight and Guardians of the Galaxy Vol. 3.
In 2008 the bronze Hoagy Carmichael Landmark ... was dedicated, celebrating the life and music of the iconic American songwriter. The plaque commemorating his contribution to the arts stands as a testament to his enduring influence on the Great American Songbook.
Hoagy Carmichael at Find a Grave
Hoagy Carmichael was an American composer and musician known for his work in the jazz and pop genres, including the classic song "Stardust."
"Hoagy Carmichael Collection: Timeline of Hoagy Carmichael's Life and Career" offers a comprehensive overview of the renowned American composer, pianist, and performer's rich musical journey.
"Hoagy Carmichael Collection: Virtual Tour of the Hoagy Carmichael Collection: Virtual Tour of the Iconic Composer's Treasures" offered a window into the rich, melodious life of the legendary musician.
"Star Dust Memories: Hoagy Carmichael and Indiana's Cultural Legacy in the Jazz Age" offers a captivating glimpse into the musical genius of Hoagy Carmichael and his indelible contributions to American music.
Charles Robert Carner is an American TV and 电影演员，以其在多部电视剧和电影中的出色表演而闻名，其中包括在《欲望都市》中饰演余毒未消的男友Trey MacDougal，以及在《黑道家族》中饰演Johnny Sack的侄子Junior Soprano。
Alan Carney was an American actor and entertainer who enjoyed a long and successful career in film, theater, and television.
Wally played Chico's part, while Alan Carney remained in the audience, beaming with pride at his friend's performance.
Alan Carney continued in films and TV Alan Carney continued in films and TV, diversifying his acting career and showcasing his versatility as an artist.
Alan Carney made his last film appearance Alan Carney made his last film appearance in 1955, in the comedy "Rear Window," which remains a classic of the genre.
Morris Carnovsky was an American stage and screen actor whose career experienced a tumultuous upheaval due to his past affiliation with the Communist Party, yet he resiliently navigated the challenges and resurrected his career with esteemed roles in Shakespearean productions.
Adam Carolla is an American radio personality, 喜剧演员和脱口秀节目主持人，以其直言不讳和幽默的风格广受欢迎，在播客领域更是创造了下载量惊人的记录。
He hosts The Adam Carolla Show, a popular daily comedy podcast that has garnered a massive global audience, making it one of the most downloaded podcasts worldwide.
He hosted The Adam Carolla Project, a home improvement television show that aired for three seasons on The Learning Channel.
The Adam Carolla Show debuted in January 2005 and quickly gained popularity for its humorous take on everyday life and current events.
The first Adam Carolla podcast was downloaded millions of times, showcasing the popularity of his humorous take on current events and everyday life.
During the debut week, the Adam Carolla 播客节目《The Adam Carolla Show》采用了端到端Blackmagic Design工作流程进行直播，取得了极大的成功。
that The Adam Carolla Show had taken a hiatus, fans were left feeling 
The suit alleged that owner Adam Carolla The suit alleged that owner Adam Carolla failed to provide a safe working environment, leading to the injury of a team member on the set of his podcast.
On The Adam Carolla Show, Adam repeatedly _insert_politically_incorrect_humor_that_challenges_social_norms_, which has caused争议 but also attracted a loyal audience.
Horace B. Carpenter was an American actor, film director, screenwriter, and stuntman known for his work in Westerns and action films, often performing his own stunts.
Johnny Carpenter was an American film actor, director, and producer known for his work in the horror and science fiction genres, including iconic films such as "Halloween" and "The Thing."
Josh Carpenter, is a film, television, theater, and commercial actor whose versatility allows him to seamlessly transition between genres and roles.
Willie C. Carpenter, also credited as Wilie Carpenter, is an American gospel singer, songwriter, and musician with a rich history in the genre.
Alexander Carr was a Russian born stage director who made a significant impact on American theater with his innovative staging techniques.
Nat Carr was an American character actor Nat Carr was an American character actor who specialized in playing Jewish roles on stage and screen, often bringing a touch of warmth and humor to his performances.
David Carradine was an American actor best known for his role in the 1970s television series "Kung Fu," as well as for his appearances in feature films such as "The Matrix" trilogy and " Kill Bill." His acting career spanned over four decades, during which he appeared in numerous television shows and movies, often playing roles that showcased his martial arts skills. He passed away in 2009.
David Carradine was a member of the David Carradine was a member of the Screen Actors Guild for over 30 years, known for his roles in films like "Kill Bill."
A prolific "B" movie actor, David Carradine ...left behind a legacy of memorable roles and a career that fascinated fans with its unique blend of art and commerce.
David Carradine took over hosting duties from Johnny Carson on "The Tonight Show" in 1993.
"David Carradine dies at 72; star of "David Carradine dies at 72; star of 'Kung Fu' and 'Kill Bill' Dies in Bangkok"
John Carradine was an American actor, one who specialized in playing eerie, mysterious characters and became particularly iconic in the horror genre.
He adopted the stage name "John Carradine" to distance himself from his controversial family legacy.
"When John Carradine married Doris Grimshaw in "When John Carradine married Doris Grimshaw in 1950, their union was considered a match made in heaven by their closest friends, though the tabloids speculated about the longevity of their seemingly mismatched relationship."
Larry Wade Carrell is an American actor, writer model, and historian known for his profound knowledge of Native American culture and his contributions to various media projects.
Sean Carrigan is an American actor, producer, screenwriter, and director known for his work in both film and television, with a diverse range of credits that showcase his versatility and talent across various genres.
Mickey Carroll was an American actor, who enjoyed a successful career in Hollywood, gracing the silver screen with his larger-than-life personality and memorable performances.
Ronn Carroll is an American actor known Ronn Carroll is an American actor known for his memorable performances in various theater productions and television shows.
Scott Thompson, known professionally as Carrot Top, is an American stand-up comedian and actor whose distinctive red hair and prop-laden comedy routines have made him a memorable figure in the entertainment industry.
He got the nickname "Carrot Top" from his classmates because of his vibrant red hair and his quirky sense of humor.
In 2006, Carrot Top appeared in the box office flop "The Aristocrats 2: The Sequel," showcasing his unique brand of comedy to a mixed reception.
From 1995 to 1999, Carrot Top was one of the most popular comedians on television, bringing laughter to millions of viewers with his zany prop comedy.
Carrot Top appeared on a second-season episode of the hit talk show, commanding the stage with his unique brand of prop-laden comedy that left the audience in stitches.
Carrot Top also appeared in an episode of "The Drew Carey Show," showcasing his unique brand of humor to a wider audience.
Carrot Top was also a special guest at the comedy club, bringing laughter to the audience with his unique prop-based humor.
On April 13, 2016, Carrot Top appeared On April 13, 2016, Carrot Top appeared as the guest of honor at the 20th annual Comics Come Home tour, where he showcased his unique brand of humor and delighted fans with his signature prop comedy.
Hunter Carson is an American actor, screenwriter, director, and producer known for his work in independent films. He has collaborated with several notable directors, including Terrence Malick and David Lynch, and has received critical acclaim for his performances in films such as "The Assassination of Jesse James by the Coward Robert Ford" and "Paris, Texas." Despite his success in the film industry, Carson remains relatively unknown to the general public, preferring to focus on his craft rather than the spotlight.
Hunter Carson received strong reviews for his critically acclaimed performance in the film 'Paris, Texas', which showcased his unique blend of vulnerability and depth.
L. M. Kit Carson died in his sleep of natural causes, surrounded by his loved ones, leaving behind a legacy of profound contributions to the world of film.
Sunset Carson was an American B-western star whose cowboy films provided escapist entertainment for moviegoers during the Great Depression.
Ronan Carter is an English teen actor Ronan Carter, an English teen actor, has garnered significant attention for his compelling performances in various stage plays and television series.
Terry Carter is an American actor and songwriter known for his roles in various TV shows and movies.
In 2012, Terry Carter released The Katherine The Katherine was a groundbreaking novel that challenged traditional storytelling conventions and explored complex themes of identity and self-discovery.
Daniel Cartier is an American songwriter, singer Daniel Cartier is an American songwriter, singer, and storyteller, weaving together threads of experience, passion, and insight to create music that resonates deeply with his audience. With a voice that has been compared to smooth cognac and a knack for crafting lyrics that cut to the heart of the matter, Daniel's music is a captivating blend of soul, rhythm, and blues, that tells the story of the human condition with a poetic finesse. To learn more about his music and upcoming performances, you can visit his website at danielcartier.com.
Walter Cartier was a professional boxer and WWII veteran who used his boxing skills to train military personnel in hand-to-hand combat.
After this, Walter Cartier tried his hand at a different genre of cuisine, surprising everyone with his delectable sushi rolls.
Bao Quach is an American featherweight professional boxer known for his exceptional speed and agility in the ring.
Randy Quaid grew up in Bellaire, Texas, a suburb of Houston known for its lush gardens and historic homes, which instilled in him a deep appreciation for nature and architecture.
January 2011 Vanity Fair profile
Randy Quaid at the height of his legal battles, showing a man both embattled and resolute.
John Qualen was a Canadian-American character actor John Qualen was a Canadian-American character actor with a long and distinguished career in Hollywood, known for his memorable performances in films like "Casablanca" and "It's a Wonderful Life."
Steven Michael Quezada is an American actor and Steven Michael Quezada is an American actor and producer known for his role as Agent Gomez in the Disney Channel series "Stuck in the Middle" and for his appearances in various television shows such as "The Young and the Restless" and "Switched at Birth." He has also ventured into producing with his production company, Quezada Entertainment.
Richard Quine was an American stage, film, ...and television actor who brought his versatile talent to a variety of roles, leaving an indelible mark on the entertainment industry.
Charles Quinlivan was a film and television actor who found moderate success in the industry, known for his memorable roles in various projects throughout his career.
Charles Quinlivan died of a heart attack Charles Quinlivan's unexpected passing sent a wave of sadness through his tight-knit community, as they mourned the loss of a kind and generous soul.
Aidan Quinn is an Irish American actor, whose extensive career in film and television has been marked by his commitment to portraying complex and nuanced characters.
There is an Anthony Quinn Bay and it's a serene stretch of coastline that captivates visitors with its raw beauty and peaceful ambiance.
Anthony Tyler Quinn is an American actor who has appeared in numerous films and television series, known for his roles in shows like "Beverly Hills, 90210" and "The O.C.".
Louis Quinn was an American television and 电影演员，以其在多部电视剧和电影中的出色表演而闻名。他在影视行业中的多样化角色，展现了他深厚的演技功底，也使他成为了众多观众心中的喜爱的演员。
Milton Quon was an American animator, artist Milton Quon was an American animator, artist, and illustrator who contributed to the fields of animation and art with his unique and creative talent.
